CHAP. I.
Geve place, you ladies, and be gone.
Boast not yourselves at all,
For here at hand approacheth one
Whose face will stayne you all.
Song of the Sixteenth Century
.
There
was hurrying to and fro through the principal
streets of Boston on the night of the 14th of August,
1765. A brilliant bonfire was blazing on Fort Hill.
Column after column of light died away to rise again
with redoubled grandeur, and at each succeeding burst
of flame, the loud shouts of the rabble were heard with
dreadful distinctness.
At this time, Henry Osborne was passing down
Union-street, with the rapid pace of one who struggles
with the intensity of thought. He leaned a moment on
Union Stone, listening to the distant tumult, as he said,
Be the sin on the heads of those who have provoked
this,I have done all I could to prevent it.
As he spoke, a graceful stranger, in a rich military
undress, stept from a neighbouring court. The moon
shone full on the countenances of both, and as he
approached
,
he hesitatingly said, Mr. Osborne, I
believe
.
You are welcome, Captain Somerville, replied the
other, giving him his hand.
Thank you, rejoined the stranger. I have found
you very opportunely; for I have been some time in
search of a house which every child in this loyal town
might point out to me. The spirit of rebellion,
however
,
has induced some of your promising lads to
mislead
me by four contradictory directions; and I am not,
even now, certain that I am in the vicinity of Governor
Hutchinson.
We are very near his dwelling, replied Osborne;
and I myself will accompany you thither, to meet my
sister, whom I left there this afternoon.
A few questions relative to the riot were asked by the
officer, and obviously avoided by his companion, before
they arrived at Friezel Court.
[1]
[1]
Now called Garden Court Street.
Both paused a moment opposite the Lieutenant
Governor's
elegant mansion, struck by the uncommon beauty,
and almost fearful stillness of the scene. The dim light
of a lamp suspended from the roof gave a rich twilight
view of the interior, and displayed a spacious arch,
richly
carved and gilded, in all the massy magnificence of
the times, and most tastefully ornamented with busts
and statues. The light streamed full on the
soul-beaming
countenance of Cicero, and playfully flickered on
the brow of Tulliola, the tenderness of whose
diminutive
appellation delightfully associates the father with
the orator, and blends intellectual vigour with the best
affections of the heart.
The silence was so deep that the gentlemen could
distinctly hear a light, quick step, as a young lady passed
from room to room, and paused beneath the arch in a
listening attitude.
The exquisite proportion of her aerial little figure,
and her beauty, pale and unearthly as Guido has
represented
his Madonnas, showed finely beneath the severely
intellectual brow of Cicero. In the living figure, the
soul was shrouded in its loveliest and most transparent
veil; in the marble, its glowing fires seemed gleaming
through the shrine they were consuming.
It is my sister Grace, whispered Osborne.
Grace, indeed! ejaculated his companion, in a
tone of fervent admiration.
Hark! said she, raising her beautiful finger, and
speaking to some one behind her,as I live, there is
the murmur of voices now. How could the servants
leave us thus.
She turned, and the last fold of her blue drapery was
just disappearing, when Henry exclaimed, It is I, dear
Grace.
The tiny beauty bounded to the door. I am so
glad you have come,we have been so frightened,
said she; and she paused and blushed deeply as she
noticed the handsome stranger.
My sister, Captain Somerville, said Henry,
evidently
proud of her heightened loveliness.
A dignified courtesy answered the courtly salutation
of the officer; and her brother, turning to two other
ladies that now advanced, said, Her friend Lucretia
Fitzherbert, and Madam Sandford.
The ceremony of introduction over, Miss Sandford
opened a door on the right hand, and led the way into a
dimly-lighted parlour. The pannelling was of the dark,
richly-shaded mahogany of St. Domingo, and ornamented
with the same elaborate skill as the hall they had just
quitted. The busts of George III. and his young queen
were placed in front of a splendid mirror, with bronze
lamps on each side, covered with beautiful transparencies,
one representing the destruction of the Spanish armada,
the other giving a fine view of a fleet of line-of-battle
ships drawn up before the Rock of Gibraltar. On either
side of the room there were arches surmounted with the
arms of England, in the recesses of which the company
were soon seated, forming a group of exceedingly varied
and interesting character. The sharp countenance and
prim figure of Miss Sandford, gave her the air of an
antediluvian
image; the inelegant form and very plain face
of Lucretia, though transiently lighted up with expression
that almost atoned for the want of beauty, formed a
contrast extremely favourable to the etherial loveliness
of Grace; and the Grecian outline of Henry's mild
countenance served to place in bold relief the aquiline
nose, and the open, fearless brow of Somerville, shaded
by a profusion of curls, as dark and clustering as the
beautiful locks of the Roman Antinous.
Uncle Hutchinson has expected you several days,
said Lucretia, as Somerville seated himself. You
wrote that you should sail in the William and Mary,
and a vessel arrived several days since, which had
spoken her below the harbour.
It was many miles below the harbour, however,
answered Somerville; and I was becalmed, according
to my usual fortune. After so many delays, I am really
anxious to meet my uncle.
He would, of course, have been among the first to
welcome you, had he been at home, she replied;
but, followed by all the servants, he has gone to
watch the bonfires on Fort Hill; where, I suppose,
either indignation or anxiety has led two-thirds of the
population.
I have heard some brief hints of this day's uproar,
rejoined the Englishman; but I could not have
imagined any cause powerful enough to seduce
Governor
Hutchinson from the place where beauty claimed
his protection.
Nor would there have been, in my day, said Miss
Sandford, in the squeaking tones of antiquated coquetry.
It was a toilsome process to please a lady when I was
young; but times are sadly altered now.
I dare say Cain scolded his wife about the
degeneracy
of the ladies in Nod, said Lucretia, laughing.
And Cain might have reproached his mother, since,
lacking mortals, she carried on her dangerous flirtation
with Satan, continued Somerville.
No one smiled at this speech, for its levity was
offensive
to those whose associations with the Bible were all
sacred; and to Henry Osborne, the irreverence it
argued
,
was peculiarly painful.
Anxious to interrupt the awkward silence, Lucretia
hastily said, My uncle left the servants with us; but,
after all, it seems that bonnets and hats cover brains of
very similar formation; for, one by one, the eagerness
of curiosity tempted them from us, till we were left to
the protection of aunt Sandford.
And really we have been much frightened, added
Grace. I had no idea the citizens of Boston could
utter sounds so terrific as those we have heard to-night
It would be well if their echo could reach across
the Atlantic, observed her brother.
And what would be heard, if they did? asked
Somerville.
Liberty and property! No stamps! exclaimed
Henry, with startling energy.
A darkening expression passed over the fine face of
Somerville, as rapidly as the shadows of autumnal clouds
over the sunny brow of some verdant hill.
Then you, said he, are among the unhappy men
who encourage popular outrage, and will thus drive the
mother country to severity repugnant to her nature?
You talk sir, as many others do, who know nothing
of the subject, rejoined Henry. You mistake the
unanimous voice of a free and intelligent people, for the
factious zeal of a few office-seeking demagogues.
And what farther proof need we than James Otis,
the Aaron of your tribes, the Goliath of your hosts.
Had his father been chief justice of the Supreme Court,
the world would have lost his fiery speech against writs
of assistance, as well as his never ceasing clamour about
taxation without representation.
2
That is a common, but most unjust slander upon
the character of a generous and noble-minded man.
He is disgusted, as every honest individual must be,
with that rapacity for office, which distinguishes some
friends of the administration; but he is too high minded
to place the interest of his family above that of his
country. Besides, if avarice or ambition guides the
course of James Otis, why is he not a tory? The
ministry
would gladly buy him over, on any conditions.
Crystals would fetch the price of diamonds if they
were as rare, replied Somerville. England has quite
too many great men, to come and purchase in such a
market as her Colonies.
We have some, however, that Britain herself might
be proud to boast. Such men as Adams, Hawley,
Quincy, Hancock, Mayhew, and Otis, would even there
obtain the influence and reputation which talents, joined
with integrity, never fail to procure from those who can
appreciate them.
Stop now, dear brother, said Grace, playfully
putting her hand before his mouth. Governor
Hutchinson
is coming, and I cannot have you always
disputing
about subjects on which you will never agree.
The shadow of the Chief Justice
[2]
[2]
At the period I have mentioned, Bernard was governor, and Hutchinson
lieutenant-governor. Among the various offices held by the latter, was that
of chief justice. I have applied his different titles indiscriminately.
darkened the
threshold as she finished speaking. He bowed to the
ladies with all the Parisian gallantry that usually
characterized
his manner; and after warm congratulations
had passed between him and his nephew, he inquired,
What news from England?
Nothing new to you, I imagine, sir. Lord Bute's
ministry continues to keep the king unpopular among
the commons. Chatham holds the people in the hollow
of his hand; and if his demands for himself and friends
were not so excessively exorbitant, a coalition of parties
would no doubt be formed, and he would be, what he
has long desired to be, secretary of state, and
disposer-general
of offices.
And the queen and the young princes? said
Hutchinson.
Her popularity is unbounded. She and her rosy
children unite all parties. Prince George is as
handsome
and clever a scion as ever sprung from a royal
root; the Duke of York is healthy and promising;
and a third is now added to the charming family
group.
And the king is as gallant as ever, I suppose?
Too much so to leave three distressed damsels to
guard a house on such a night as this, I fancy, said
Lucretia, smiling.
Nay, said the Lieutenant-Governor, I will not
plead guilty to that charge. I left the servants with
you, and I knew the rioters were employed at a safe
distance. Besides it would have been ungenerous in
me to have deserted Mr. Oliver, if there was the least
chance of being useful to him. Then there is your
friend Doctor Byles, Lucretia, it behoved me to inquire
about his safety; for we well know that his wit and his
loyalty make him very abominable in the eyes of this
liberty-mad race.
Mr. Osborne frowned, and Grace looked more grave
than usual.
`Oh, what a deal of scorn looks beautiful in the
contempt and anger of that lip,' said the gallant Chief
Justice, handing her a handkerchief that had just fallen
on the floor. But really, Mr. Osborne, the scenes of
this day and night must convince the most obstinate
whig that the designs of the popular party in these
Colonies are altogether subversive of good government,
and must eventually bring ruin on the people.
I know not the extent of your meaning, when you
speak of the popular party, sir, replied Osborne; but
of one thing I am very certain, and that is, that outrages
of any kind have never been incited, and will never be
countenanced, by such men as Adams, Quincy,
Hancock
,
and Whiting. Indeed it is worse than foolish,
Governor Hutchinson, to trace the present commotions
to the party spirit of individuals. The truth is,
whenever
government heap up combustibles, a hand will
always
be found ready to kindle them; and if it were
otherwise, they would take fire spontaneously.
And what damage has been occasioned by the
explosion
at this time, inquired Somerville.
They have merely suspended images of Lord Bute
and your cousin Oliver, upon the Liberty tree; razed
Oliver's stamp office to the ground; carried the images
and timber to Fort Hill; burned them before his house;
pulled down his fences; broken his windows, and
destroyed
some furniture; answered the
Lieutenant-Governor
.
This will doubtless sound well at St. James's, and
will mightily serve to heighten the king's respect for
Bostonian loyalty, said the young officer.
It may at least serve to convince his most gracious
majesty that we are in earnest, rejoined Henry.
The politics of the gentlemen and the confidential
tte--tte
of the ladies were here interrupted by the
entrance of fruit and wine. A light and general
conversation
ensued, and in a few moments Grace rose
to depart.
You have forbidden politics once this evening, Miss
Osborne, said Somerville; and I perceive by your
glances at your brother, that you think us most
disobedient
.
However, I trust you will forgive what the
circumstances of the night seem to have compelled;
and permit me to say, that I am particularly rejoiced
that in meeting Mr. Osborne, I not only meet an old
friend, whom I had known in England, but likewise
your brother.
Grace slightly blushed, and said she hoped no unhappy
political divisions would interrupt their former friendship.
Osborne warmly seconded his sister's wish, and
extended
a polite invitation to the uncle of his friend.
I see no reason why you should leave us at all
to-night
,
my dear Miss Osborne, said Hutchinson.
Why Grace would think me a lunatic if I should
propose to her to live one night without her father's kiss
and blessing said Lucretia.
2 *
And not far from right, my mad-capped niece,
replied he, playfully touching her shoulder. However,
as you both will; you know your lovely friend is
always
welcome twenty-four hours in a day.
Grace smiled and bowed. Somerville took his hat,
said that nothing but
such
a cause could tempt a few
moments' absence, and joined the young people as they
left the house.
CHAP. II.
Fortune, the great commandress of the world,
Hath divers ways to advance her followers:
To some she gives wealth, some wit, &c.
All Fools
.
Captain Fitzherbert
, the father of Lucretia, was
the youngest son in a family of noble connexions and
moderate wealth. In his youth, he was sent to Manilla,
at the request of a bachelor uncle, who promised his
immense fortune as a reward for his affectionate
attentions
.
This uncle proved tormentingly nervous, and his
whims and caprices daily became more intolerable to a
young man of the most haughty independence and
stubborn
inflexibility of character. He wrote a letter to his
father, earnestly entreating permission to return to
England. The answer he received was partly in the
language of reason, partly of authority, and ended by
expressly forbidding him to leave the East Indies during
the life-time of his uncle.
From that moment, he resolved to enter the career
of life for himself, and to spurn at the support which
must be purchased by years of servile dependence. He
collected all his money and jewels, procured the disguise
of a common sailor, and came over to America, alone
and unfriended. The new world then opened a fine
field for enterprise, and he soon accumulated property.
He had been for some time successfully engaged in
navigation, when he first met Matilda Howe, at Halifax.
She was a beautiful and destitute orphan, with great
sweetness of manners and of temper; and these
qualifications
had so much weight with the young English
Captain, that he very soon gave her legal claims to his
protection. Pride had hitherto induced him to conceal
his existence from his friends; but he was now rich, and
he felt anxious to secure their friendship for the sake of
his lovely wife. For this purpose he left her a few
months after their marriage, intending to arrange some
business in the West Indies, and from thence proceed
to Liverpool, and discover himself to his family.
A short letter from Cuba was all that she ever after
received from him; nor was it long before she heard
the dreadful tidings of his shipwreck.
After the birth of the infant Lucretia, Mrs. Fitzherbert
proposed to the executors to examine the papers of her
deceased husband. To her utter astonishment and
dismay
,
she found that his strong box had been opened,
and every paper of any value removed. It was
afterwards
reported, that during Mrs. Fitzherbert's sickness,
many of the notes were presented by a middle-aged
man, and paid by the unsuspecting debtors, who
supposed
that a legal transfer had taken place. Whoever
this villain was, no trace of him could afterward be
discovered.
The distressed mother wrote two letters to England,
imploring assistance from her husband's relations. The
first received an insolent answer, disclaiming all
knowledge
of such a being as young Edmund Fitzherbert,
and reproaching her with the grossness of her
impudence
.
The second was returned in a blank
envelope
.
Bowed down with affliction, the heart-broken widow
soon after expired, leaving her child to the care of
benevolent acquaintances.
The rent of a small house, all that remained of her
father's large property, saved the orphan from the
misery of entire dependence; but her young heart was
as blithe as if thousands had been her portion.
When Lucretia was in her thirteenth year, it chanced
that Miss Sandford, the maiden sister of Mrs.
Hutchinson
,
visited Halifax, and was taken ill at the house where
she resided. The overflowing kindness and unremitting
attention of the child won upon the stranger's heart,
and she formed the resolution of taking her under
her own immediate protection. This lady, who
possessed
many foibles, united with much shrewdness and
great goodness of heart, brought the insulated little being
with her, when she returned to the dwelling of Governor
Hutchinson.
To his good opinion, the orphan possessed two very
sure passports. One was an honourable English name,
the other, a portion, scanty indeed, but sufficient to
prevent any large expenditure on the part of Miss
Sandford, whose property he thought would eventually
devolve upon him.
Anxious to ascertain whether her father's story had
really been an imposture, he caused minute inquiries to
be made in England, but could only ascertain that the
name had become extinct, and that a large estate in
Manilla had been settled on a remote collateral branch
of the family. This last account seemed to tally with the
Captain's story, and in the Governor's mind, it established
the important point of honourable birth; and though there
was seemingly no hope that Lucretia would ever
become
an heiress, we must do him the justice to say, that
he treated her with extreme kindness, up to the period
we have mentioned.
The morning after Somerville's arrival, Governor
Hutchinson found a large package on his library table,
which his nephew had placed there at an early hour.
He opened it, and found a polite letter from Goldsmith,
accompanied by the Traveller, then recently
published
in England; two long and laboured epistles from
Lord North and Mr. Grenville; and an anonymous
production
,
with the signature of the mitre, urging
gentleness
,
discretion, and open dealing, with the discontented
Colonies. These papers were read with avidity; and
could some of them now be found, they would throw
additional light on the political hypocrisy of the Chief
Justice.
The last opened letter completely arrested his
attention
.
It was as follows:
Honoured Sir,
A friend of mine, who has lately returned to
England
,
accidentally mentioned meeting Miss Fitzherbert
at your house. May I ask who this Miss Fitzherbert
is? I have been in my native country but a short time,
I am a bachelor,and my health is exceedingly
precarious
.
It is therefore important that I should know
her history and connexions immediately.
Copley is now in New England, and I should like
to have him take her picture for me. I will pay all
expenses, whether the event be as I hope, or not.
Omit no particulars concerning her father, and have all
the documents well authenticated.
I am your obedient and humble servant.
Edmund Fitzherbert
.
A long conference between the Governor, Miss
Sandford
,
and Lucretia, terminated in sending a note to
Doctor
Byles, requesting his attendance as soon as
convenient
,
to converse on some particular business. A
servant
was speedily despatched to Nassau-street, and soon
returned with an answer that promised an early call.
Before two hours had elapsed, Lucretia heard the
well-known
sound of his gold-headed cane, as it struck on
the stone steps of the dwelling; and hastened to show
him into the library.
He was a middle-sized man, with a large, closely
curled wig, and an expression of face as strangely
contradictory
as his very singular character. There was a
sanctity about his mouth, evidently induced by long
habit
;
but nature peeped out at his eye with unrestrained
drollery.
Wherefore am I summoned? said he, planting his
cane firmly on the threshold of the door. Has Jethro
cut his little finger? Has Aunt Sandford been backbiting
her neighbours till her double teeth ache? Or have the
rebels more symptoms of the cholic?
None of these things have befallen us, answered
the Governor, smiling, I want to consult you about
Lucretia's affairs.
What affairs can she have, pray? No design of
wearing Hymen's saffron robe, I trust?
They say it is a garment often bought, observed
Lucretia; and it is money which uncle Hutchinson
wishes to talk with you about.
The Governor placed the letter in his hand, and
remarked
,
With all your contempt of wealth, you will
not wonder that its contents are highly interesting to us.
It is indeed of consequence that it should be
attended
to, said he, but what is to be done?
All the evidence that can possibly be collected, must
be immediately committed to paper. I have heard you
say, that you saw Captain Fitzherbert, in your youth.
I believe you and Madam Sandford will be my most
valuable evidence.
Now, to this lady the reverend Doctor had a most
unconquerable aversion. Some said it was because he
suspected her of forming designs on his liberty, while
he was a widower. To this charge she never
condescended
to give any other answer than, It would be
strange if I should seek such a punishment, when
nothing
worse than
Biles
could be found wherewith to afflict
Job.
Perhaps it might be this same habit of paying him in
his own coin, which had first created a dislike. Be that
as it may, he lost no opportunity of railing at her, and
when Lucretia was desired to call her, he exclaimed,
Oh dear, that Miss Sandford! I have such a
phobia
of her. From morning till night she is clattering about
the faults and follies of her neighbours; and as for her
own character, it is a dark lanthorn,nobody sees the
bright side but herself.
Governor Hutchinson looked upon his friend as a
privileged person, and took no notice of these and
similar
remarks; but they were always distressing to
Lucretia
,
and she had just whispered, I beg of you not
to talk in this way,when Miss Sandford entered and
wished him good morning.
Good morning, Madam Sandford, said the Doctor,
rising.Hem! Pray Governor Hutchinson have you
the Gossip, or the Tatler, or the Busy-body in your
library?
I thought the last was usually in Doctor Byles's
presence, observed Miss Sandford, sweeping past him
in great indiguation.
A truce with such contests, said her
brother-in-law
.
I wish to ascertain how much both of you know
concerning Captain Fitzherbert.
Doctor Byles then proceeded to details exactly
corresponding
to the story we have already told. I
remember
,
said he, hearing Captain Fitzherbert speak of his
escape from Manilla. He was a proud-spirited man,
and nothing on the earth or beneath it could
compel
him
to an action. He used to say he had rather be a
ploughboy
in America, than a prince in the East Indies.
I have heard that remark of my father's repeated
several times, said Lucretia.
3
And you know the lady with whom you boarded
after you mother's death used to tell many anecdotes
about his Manilla uncle, said Miss Sandford. Do
you remember her accounts of his chocolate-coloured
gown, the monkey that saw fit to hide his wig in the
chimney, and the favourite old servant that used to lie
on his back and fiddle all day?
All this is nothing to the purpose, said Doctor Byles,
sternly. Women should only speak when it is
necessary
.
All these trifling details will serve to authenticate
the story, observed the Governor. Do you know
whether Captain Fitzherbert ever heard from his
relations
after he left them?
I have heard that he was once taken ill with a
fever
,
and carried to Chelsea Hospital, replied Lucretia;
and that his father was one of the visiting committee,
and used frequently to give him cordials with his own
hand; but time and sickness had so changed my father
that he did not know him; and his pride would not
submit
to an avowal under such circumstances.
That was strength of nerve indeed, said
Hutchinson
,
to meet a father in a foreign land, and yet remain
incog. But bless my heart, why have none of us
thought of Mr. Townsend? he was one of the
executors
.
What, Townsend of Roxbury, who lives in a house
leaking at every pore, goes to bed before dark to save
his candles, and wears a garment woven before
Deucalion's
deluge?
Just so, Doctor Byles; and is worth thousands of
pounds for all that, replied the Governor. Lucretia,
sit down and write a note to Mr. Townsend, requesting
him to come here; and send Jethro with the carriage.
I love that scatter-brained girl in spite of myself,
said Doctor Byles, as she left the apartment. Did
you notice the tears in her eyes when we talked of her
mother? I believe there was some great villany about
her father's property.
People do say this Mr. Townsend is no better than
he should be, rejoined Miss Sandford.
Did you ever hear of any body that was? said
Doctor Byles.
If I had, I should have heard a fact you will never
know by experience, answered she.
Surely you have touched the Doctor's garments,
said her brother, laughing.
At any event, wit made a strange mistake when it
popped into her brain, rejoined her unwearied
tormentor
.
Some more conversation followed, the particulars of
which were interesting only to the parties concerned;
and the Governor was busy in committing the various
facts to paper, when Jethro arrived with Mr. Townsend.
He was an old man, with a black cap pulled closely
over his shaggy eye-brows, a wrinkled face, a
threadbare
coat, and patched small-clothes, tied above the
knee with leathern strings.
The rising smile was checked by the politeness of
the Chief Justice, who handed him a chair, and after a
few general inquiries, spoke of the business for which
he had summoned him.
Every one noticed his look of deadly paleness, when
the name of Fitzherbert was mentioned.
I am an old man, said he, in the querulous tones
of extreme age; and a poor one. That was a
troublesome
business. Papers were lost; and the world blamed
me, God knows, without reason.
Old man, swear not at all, exclaimed Doctor
Byles, with a thundering voice.
The miser looked terrified.
It is hard to perplex an old man with this business,
when he is just on the verge of the grave, said he.
I am poor,too poor to be wearing and tearing my
clothes in riding about from one end of the town to the
other; and I have been
despit
sick for years back. I
have a power of complaints on me now.
An
expansion
of the heart is one disorder you have
contracted
, is it not? inquired Doctor Byles.
I have had almost all kinds of sickness in my day,
replied the old man, without noticing the ridicule of the
remark; but then you know doctors cost a mint of
money.
That craving for sympathy which leads us all to dwell
more or less on our own miseries, would have induced
Mr Townsend to prolong this topic to a painful length,
had not Governor Hutchinson at once arrested him by
direct questions concerning the Fitzherbert estate. On
this subject, he was less garrulous. A trembling
hesitation
,
which might proceed either from conscious guilt,
or from an incapacity for business, was very discernible.
His story was but a repetition of the other, excepting
that he remembered having seen the death of Mr.
Edmund
Fitzherbert, of Manilla, in the London Chronicle.
Having given his testimony, he expressed a wish to
oblige the gentlemen in any thing that would not prove
expensive, and signified his desire to depart.
That there had been some mistake concerning the
death of the East India uncle, and that Lucretia would
be heiress to his immense wealth, was the impression of
all her friends.
The Governor congratulated her on her prospects,
but at the same time reminded her of their extreme
uncertainty, and exhorted her to keep the whole affair
secret for the present; since, in case of failure, it would
be exceedingly unpleasant to be questioned
concerning
it.
Miss Sandford did not attempt to conceal her joy.
Lucretia will be the richest woman in New England,
said she; a match for the greatest man in the
Colonies.
Mulier ad unguem, exclaimed Doctor Byles;
ideas always saffron-coloured. It would be well if
you thought as much of some other flames as you do
of Hymen's torch.
In my opinion, wrath and eternal fire are too much
talked of by some ministers, rejoined the maiden.
No doubt you think so, replied he; and when
one seems so anxious that a place should be represented
comfortable, one cannot but have a shrewd suspicion
they expect to go there.
3 *
I know of no one so fit to be master of ceremonies
as yourself, retorted she.
A young distiller has moved into your
neighbourhood
,
Governor Hutchinson, said the Doctor; and
the first business I wish you to give him is to
still
your
sister's tongue.
A heavy cannonade, upon my word, said the
laughing Lucretia; but after all, Doctor Byles, none
of my friends will be more glad of my good fortune than
yourself.
Very true, my good girl, said he, affectionately
taking her hand; but it will be that you have it in
your power to be useful,not to get a husband.
Certainly not, replied Lucretia. I am sure
Have a care, interrupted the Doctor, else I shall
be tempted to say, `Faith, I 'll believe a woman, when
I have nothing else to do.'
Lucretia blushed,for at that moment she was
actually
conjecturing whether her thousands could make
Somerville forget that she was less beautiful than Grace
Osborne.
CHAP. III.
The spirit of that day is still awake,
And spreads itself, and shall not sleep again,
But through the idle mesh of power shall break,
Like billows o'er the Asian monarch's chain.
Bryant
.
The
political principles of Frederic Somerville were
rather the result of habit and education, than of
personal
character. He was fresh from the classic schools
of Greece and Rome, and his own spirit was as free as
the untamed courser of the desert; but he had read
gorgeous descriptions of feudal power,he had gazed
on old baronial castles, the massive grandeur of the
Gothic, and the lighter and more graceful outline of
Saxon architecture, till his imagination was wedded to
pompous pageantry, and his heart bowed down before
the crown, the coronet, and the mitre.
But he was enthusiastic, ardent, and capricious; and
those who knew him well, would have felt no surprise
at seeing him as valiant a champion for the rights of
man as he now was for the supremacy of his king.
Toward the evening of the 26th of August, he was
sitting in one of the alcoves which looked out upon the
garden, talking with his uncle concerning the arrival of
stamped paper, when a small arrow whizzed between
them, and fastened in the canvass hangings of the room.
Both started, and looked out at the window.
A lad, with cross-bow and quiver, was just scaling the
fence; but he was soon out of the reach of pursuit.
To the arrow was fastened a slip of paper, with these
words:
Lieutenant-Governor, Member of the Council,
Commander of the Castle, Judge of Probate, and Chief
Justice of the Supreme Court! you are hereby
commanded
to appear under the Liberty-tree within one
hour, to plight your faith, that you will use no more
influence against an injured and an
exasperated
people.
Nemo
.
The Governor's face flushed to the very temples.
Again reproached with the multiplicity of my
offices, said he; as if talents and education ought
not to command fortune.
Where is this tree, of which I have heard so much?
inquired his nephew. It seems these people are
determined
that even their timber shall be implicated in
rebellion.
It is that large elm opposite Frog Lane,
[3]
[3]
Where Boylston market now stands.
where
the mob dared to suspend their insulting effigies on the
fourteenth of this month, he replied.
And what notice shall you take of this insulting
epistle?
Such notice as king George's representative should
take of the insolence of his subjects. I will never
compromise
with their vengeance, nor govern them by
stratagem.
Spoken like Governor Hutchinson, exclaimed
Somerville. He paused a moment, and looked
anxiously
into the street, before he added, Had I not
better go to the tree, and watch their proceedings?
As you please, sir. They will make no difference
in my arrangements, however. They will hardly dare
to touch my property; and if they do forget so far as
to pull down some of my fences, they will be compelled
to pay a pound for every penny I lose.
With high ideas of English power, and with very gross
ignorance of the colonial character, Somerville regarded
the resistance of America as the discontented murmuring
of a wayward child; and as he now passed through the
principal streets of Boston, he was absolutely astonished
at the intense eagerness and portentous activity of the
crowd.
There was something in the hurried step of those
who were walking to and fro, and in the earnest manner
of those collected in groups, that seemed like the stormy
movements of the ocean, as it rises wave after wave,
and lashes itself to fury.
There is the man that daddy calls the
Breetish
telltale
,
said a sturdy little fellow, who was helping his
companion fly a kite.
By George, say that again, if you dare, retorted
the son of a staunch tory, as he clenched his fist, and at
one blow prostrated him on the ground.
I'm up again, exclaimed the resolute little chap,
springing on his feet, and rubbing his ears.
Let those who throw the infant Hercules, beware
his rising, said a dark-eyed young man, whose flushed
cheek and sparkling eye betrayed the keen interest he
took in the scene.
Those who are the most enthusiastic in their opinions,
and the most impetuous in their conduct, are peculiarly
subject to violent reaction, and had Somerville at that
moment been alone in the world, without friends to
sway, or interest to guide him, he would have rebounded
from his long cherished aristocracy, to the extreme of
political freedom.
Desperate and wicked as he had been accustomed to
think the cause, he could not but admire the fearless
energy with which it was maintained; and with more
respect than he had ever before felt for the rebels, he
passed along to the place where a meeting with his
uncle
had been appointed. There were clusters of people
within sight; but the immediate vicinity of the tree was
perfectly quiet.
A tall, slender man passed Somerville, with the slow
and irresolute step of one who has no other object in
walking than to while away a tedious interval. He
looked at his watch anxiously, and was about to retrace
the path he had just taken, when the young Englishman
arrested his attention. For a moment he seemed to
hesitate whether to speak, or not,then suddenly
plunged into a narrow lane, the darkness of which soon
concealed him from view.
Willing to ascertain more fully the state of public
feeling, Somerville entered the White Horse tavern,
and carelessly glancing over the London Chronicle,
kept a watchful eye on those who entered and departed.
Several countrymen surrounded a gentleman in one
corner of the room, who was saying to them, Be firm
Resist unto death; but, added he, slowly and
impressively
lowering his hand, be moderatebe
prudent
.
Spoken like Samuel Adams, said a young man,
who had that moment entered. Somerville immediately
recognised the figure that he had seen passing and
repassing
the Liberty-tree, and the voice that had spoken
of the rising Hercules.
Has he come, Doctor Willard, inquired a dozen
voices.
The person I sought is not yet where we expect
him, answered he.
There was a long pause.
Do you really think, after all Governor Hutchinson
has promised us, that he has dared to write to England,
advising them not to repeal this duty? asked one of
the countrymen.
It seems to be proved beyond all doubt, replied
Willard.
Let him look to 't, then, said an old man, taking
out a huge quid of tobacco, and shaking his head most
significantly.
And do you think, sir, this duty never will be
pealed?
inquired a ruddy-faced farmer.
Franklin is making great exertions for us, rejoined
Adams; but the king is ignorant of the real state of
his Colonies, the ministry are obstinate, and their friends
here are wicked and selfish. We have much to fear.
The farmer made a nod of defiance, similar to those
which a small boy ventures, when at a safe distance, to
direct toward the champion who has just thrown him.
My friends, said Adams, remember that nothing
is to be gained by violence; much by calm and dignified
firmness. Let not the outrages of the 14th be re-acted.
Do you fear any open resistance? asked
Somerville
,
stepping forward.
The two gentlemen looked anxiously at each other,
for his entrance had been unnoticed by all who stood in
that corner of the room; and Adams replied,
I trust there will be no assault upon individual
property, sir; but there is no answering for the
movements
of a populace, goaded and trampled on as we
have been.
I need not remind you of English power, rejoined
Somerville; and what will you do if they continue to
resolve that the duty shall be paid?
In such a case, hearts and hands will not be
wanting
,
replied Willard. To the nephew of Governor
Hutchinson, I shall say no more. Good evening, sir.
Ye 're a
frind
to your country, and I like ye for it,
said the farmer. But I 'll not stay here,
nuther;
for
I guess I should give too much of my mind to that
Breetish
fellow.
With an air of evident vexation, Somerville followed
them to the street, and the traces of recent indignation
were very conspicuous on his ingenuous countenance,
when he entered his uncle's library. This room
contained
the finest collection of books then in the
Colonies
;
and bore obvious marks of the scholar, the
antiquarian, and the man of taste. It was hung with
canvass tapestry, on which was blazoned the coronation
of George II., here and there interspersed with the royal
arms. The portraits of Anne and the two Georges hung
in massive frames of antique splendour, and the crowded
shelves were surmounted with busts of the house of
Stuart. A table of polished black oak stood in the
centre, at which were seated the Governor and his
friend Doctor Byles.
You are welcome, sir knight of the dolorous visage,
said the facetious clergyman. Your uncle and I have
been two hours endeavouring to decipher the black-letter
manuscript you brought us; but like the woeful
messengers
that drove poor Job to desperation, each
succeeding
hour has brought some one with rueful face and
direful tone, to tell us that the rebels are certainly about
to commit some dreadful outrage, and that we had
better
prepare for the worst.
I come on the same mournful errand, replied
Somerville, imitating the mock solemnity of his manner.
But, to speak seriously, uncle, I have seen instances
of fearless audacity to-day, which leave no room to
doubt of the infuriated state of the populace.
Ill news are swallow-winged; but what is good walks
on crutches, said Doctor Byles. These discontented
wretches dare not insult one of his majesty's officers.
Somerville repeated, very minutely, all he had heard
and seen during his absence.
Why did you not treat the insolent rebels in the
manner they deserved? inquired Governor Hutchinson.
It was with difficulty that I did refrain in one
instance
,
replied he; but it is well I did; for you
4
know how much mischief Oliver's passionate friends
made on a similar occasion. After all, there is a touch
of spirit in this thing. I had rather see zeal in a bad
cause, than coldness in a good one. The mantle of
true English feeling must have descended on these
people, as they left our shores.
I confess, young man, I see no similarity to English
A confused noise in the distance here interrupted the
conversation For a few moments they listened with a
kind of stupefaction; and this gradually increased to a
bewildered, but intense fear of approaching danger, as
the sounds of drum and fife, mingled with the loud
shouts of men and boys, became terribly distinct.
Lucretia is in the cupola, said the Governor,
motioning to his nephew.
My private papers are in that desk, Doctor Byles,
added he. They may be safer about your person than
mine. Get them into the hands of Mr. Osborne as soon
as possible.
He was making other brief arrangements, with a
trembling eagerness that defeated his haste, when a
loud crash of falling glass announced that the multitude
had commenced the work of destruction.
Lucretia's voice was heard on the stairs, as she
screamed, Aunt! aunt! in an agony of terror.
Another tremendous wreck succeeded, as she burst
into the library.
Oh, my God! where is aunt Sandford? she
exclaimed
.
Dear uncle, save yourself. Run, run to
Mr. Osborne's.
The united voices of Somerville and Miss Sandford
were now heard, calling, This way, Lucretia, this
way.
With an involuntary wish to save something, she
caught two rolls of manuscripts, lying on the table, and
followed their direction.
[4]
[4]
One of these rolls was the original manuscript of Hubbard's History.
The other has long been before the public, under the title of Hutchinson's
History of Massachusetts.
Quicker than it can be said, the whole family were
cautiously stealing through the back yard, on their way
to Mr. Osborne's.
As they came into the street in rear of the house,
bottles of Champaigne, and barrels of claret, brought
from the Governor's own cellar, were furiously broken
by the mob, who were drinking most immoderately.
There goes stingy Tommy, cried one.
And Mather, the droll, shouted another.
This recognition was followed by hats full of wine
thrown in their faces, with loud cries of Don't it go
to your heart, stingy Tom?
With difficulty they forced their way a few steps
farther, and came in view of a large effigy, mounted on
a car, round which the multitude were brandishing their
torches, exclaiming, while hundreds of hats waved in
dizzy circles through the air, Liberty, or death! No
stamps! Hurra! Hurra! Hurra!
Down with the tyrant! down with the hypocrite!
shouted the mob, as they formed a phalanx round the
Governor.
The tumult increased. At that moment, a tall,
athletic
man pressed eagerly toward the group.
In the name of Heaven, let not a hair of their heads
be injured, said he. Is it come to this in
New-England
,
that the presence of ladies is no safeguard
against rudeness.
You are one of his nephews, or parasite officers,
muttered a bye-stander.
The arm of Somerville was raised, in the
forgetfulness
of his anger, but was stayed by Doctor Byles.
Forgive and despise them, said he; they are not
worthy of an Englishman's chastisement.
Look me in the face, John, said the gentleman
who came to their rescue. He raised his slouched hat
as he spoke, and displayed the resolute features of
Samuel Adams, as he added, Am I not a friend to the
people? But this is licentiousness, not liberty. This is
no way to redress our wrongs.
But it is the way to revenge them, shouted an
unknown voice.
Let Governor Hutchinson and his household pass!
said Adams, in a voice of thunder. I will be his guard;
and he that stops me, does it at his peril.
The multitude, awed by the boldness of his language,
fell back; the confusion subsided for a moment; and
the generous American soon conducted the family to
more quiet scenes.
But the spirit of riot again stormed; and the heads
of men seemed like the waves of the ocean, rising,
swelling, rushing onward.
The noise of shattered glass and falling timber was
mingled with horrid imprecations, in the midst of which,
down fell the magnificent cupola, crushed to a thousand
atoms.
Fire the house, boys! fire the house! shouted
one.
The crowd, whom contagious excitement and brutal
intoxication had maddened into fury, prepared to obey.
For an instant, fire-brands and torches were seen
gleaming in the air; but several voices were heard
earnestly expostulating with them,and, whoever they
were, they had power to arrest the storm in the midst
of its uproar.
The noise gradually subsided. The mob scattered
off in detached companies; and before midnight, the
moon looked calmly down on the the quiet and deserted
mansion of Governor Hutchinson. Fragments of
manuscripts
,
tattered books, dilapidated furniture, and broken
windows, proclaimed that the torrent of liberty, which
had been so long fearfully swelling, had overflowed its
banks, and left terror and desolation in its course.
In the mean time, a rapid walk had brought the
wanderers to the house of the Rev. Mr. Osborne.
There were brief salutations, eager inquiries, and
cordial
welcomes. Lucretia, who had not spoken one word
during the perilous scene, now clasped her arms around
Grace, and wept; Miss Sandford threw herself into a
chair, and rocked and sobbed violently; while Mr.
Osborne, forgetting how much he disliked the avarice
and political deception of Hutchinson, grasped his hand
most joyfully.
4 *
There is a certain point beyond which injuries cease
to exasperate, and their influence softens and subdues
the heart.
From the chamber window, the Governor watched
the movements of the rabble;saw crow-bars and axes
busy on the roof of his magnificent dwelling, and
witnessed
the cupola, as it fell, splintering into atoms.
Would to heaven, it would crush the unfeeling
wretches, exclaimed Somerville.
Say not so, my nephew, rejoined the Governor.
Ra her pray that they may live to repent of their
conduct.
Doctor Byles evinced the same spirit. He spoke of
the rash proceedings with mildness, very unusual to
him; and when they returned to the parlour, he said,
With your leave brother Osborne, we will pray that
the sins of this night may be forgiven.
At this moment, a shrill whistle was heard; and it
was immediately answered from a distance.
Grace cast a look of utter agony at Lucretia, who,
pale as death, exclaimed,
Oh, that dreadful sound! It is the mob-whistle.
[5]
[5]
This sound was so peculiar, that the inhabitants of Boston recognized
it instantly.
It is a sound terribly familiar to our ears, indeed,
said Hutchinson. My good friend, our presence
endangers
you. We must depart.
Not while there is any thing to fear, rejoined
Osborne, in a decided tone. If I cannot avert the
storm, its violence shall fall on me.
Leave this house; I beseech you, leave this house!
exclaimed Doctor Willard, abruptly entering from a side
door. There is no safety for you here; indeed there
is not.
Where can I go? asked the Governor, in an
agitated voice.
Remain with me, said Mr. Osborne, taking firm
hold of his arm. My young friend, you could not
suppose I would desert him at this moment.
Faces were now seen at the window, and the awful
sounds of an infuriated multitude were again heard.
Doctor Willard cast a look of intense anxiety towards
Grace, which spoke more than volumes.
Do you, young gentlemen, remain with the ladies.
If worst comes to worst, convey them to Doctor
Mayhew's
.
I myself will speak to these people, said Mr.
Osborne.
The venerable man stepped forth alone, and as he
stood and gazed on the crowd, the clamour of voices
ceased.
His appearance was indeed wonderfully impressive.
His blue silk night-gown and slippers,the white hair,
parted in the middle of his forehead, and falling
negligently
over his shoulders, gave him the air of an
evangelist
of olden time. The moon shone full upon him, and
displayed a countenance, in which intellect and affection
were singularly blended. The celestial light beaming
from his eye, announced that he lived above the world;
but the sweet smile that hovered round his lips,
proclaimed
how much he loved those who still enjoyed it.
What would you have, my friends? said he.
The mildness of his tones formed a strange contrast
to their own tumultuous cries; and, awed into shame,
they continued silent.
At length, some one said, Governor Hutchinson is
in your house, and he must leave it.
Not while I have a roof to shelter him, rejoined
the intrepid clergyman.
Be cautious, my dear sir, whispered a man in
disguise
,
who stood near the door. I fear your political
principles will not prove a sufficient shield.
My countrymen, said the old man, in a voice
extremely
agitated, how well I love America, and how
much I have exerted myself for her rights, you all know.
I now tell you, once for all, that the ruins of this house
shall fall upon my head before I give up one who has
sought it for shelter. I have watched for your liberties,
wept for your sins, and prayed for your advancement in
holiness. My children, will you, can you, sacrifice me
to your vengeance? Then, raising his clasped hands,
and streaming eyes to heaven, he added, Father of
mercies, keep them from further sin!
The humbled and conscience-stricken multitude
looked
upon him with veneration. Blessings, and even sobs,
were audible.
One after another came up, bowed before him, and
passed quietly down the street. So much influence has
genuine piety over the unprincipled, in their wildest
moods.
CHAPTER IV.
Then Otis rose, and great in patriot fame,
To listening crowds resistance dared proclaim.
From men like Otis, independence grew;
From such beginnings empire rose to view.
Hon. Thomas Dawes
.
On
the following day, the Court of Assizes and the
Supreme Court met in the Council Chamber. Four of
the judges wore voluminous wigs, broad bands, and
robes of scarlet cloth. The Chief Justice alone
entered
without the customary badges of his profession.
A plain suit of black, which he had worn on the
preceding
night, was all that had been saved from the enraged
populace.
A murmur of indignation ran through the court when
he appeared; and it was very evident that the citizens
of Boston deeply regretted, and severely
discountenanced
the shameless outrages they had been compelled to
witness. Nothing was now heard of the political
bitterness
and personal abuse that had, of late, mingled too
frequently with their public debates; on the contrary,
respectful and conciliating attention marked the whole
assembly;and when the court were about to adjourn,
Samuel Adams arose and requested all the lovers of
genuine freedom to meet at Faneuil Hall, to pass some
resolves concerning the indemnification of Hutchinson's
losses, and to take proper measures to prevent such
excesses
in future.
A crowded meeting accordingly took place. Without
one dissenting voice, they passed resolutions to patrole
the streets from sunset to sunrise, and to petition the
Legislature that the ruined mansion of the Chief Justice
should be repaired at the expense of the state.
The friends of government pretended to look on all
this as the artful manuvres of men anxious to ward
off the effects of their crime. To further their
tyrannical
design of obtaining military assistance from England,
the two governors chose to represent the affair as the
spontaneous movement of the whole town, suggested
and aided by its best and most influential citizens; and
one of Bernard's friends, who had accompanied
Somerville
to the hall, was impolitic enough to say aloud,
This is a sheer pretence. The legislature approve of
the transaction; and would publicly vindicate it, if they
dared. All this only serves to show that they have not
spirit enough to carry them through.
With a face of flame, James Otis arose and answered,
You assert what no honest man can believe, sir. A
policy as wicked as it is shallow, can alone induce our
enemies to give currency to such an opinion. Affect a
disbelief, if you please; but you well know that all the
nerve and sinew of the community were exerted to stem
the torrent of popular fury, during the whole of the
last fearful night.
I do not oppose the resolutions in favour of
Governor
Hutchinson. No one more sincerely regrets the
insults offered his person, and the injury done to his
property; but I cannot restrain my indignation, when I
hear the public virtue, that so promptly recoils from
undue violence, stigmatized as time-serving conwardice.
Some will mistake my zeal for personal resentment;
but those who understand me well, will hear, in my voice,
the thundering echo of a free people, who cannot be
silenced, and who will not be mocked.
Let him who dares to say we have not spirit
sufficient
to resist oppression, look at the fallen cupola, the
prostrate pillars, the tattered hangings, and the ruined
walls in Friezel Court!
God forbid that I should thus recapitulate in order
to add insult to outrage. I merely wish to prove that
the spirit which cannot be controlled by friends, will
never be overcome by enemies.
England may as well dam up the waters of the
Nile with bulrushes, as to fetter the step of Freedom,
more proud and firm in this youthful land, than where
she treads the sequestered glens of Scotland, or couches
herself among the magnificent mountains of Switzerland.
Arbitrary principles, like those against which we now
contend, have cost one king of England his life, another
his crown,and they may yet cost a third his most
flourishing colonies.
We are two millions strong,one fifth fighting men.
We are bold and vigorous,and we call no man
master.
To a nation from whom we are proud to derive our
origin, we ever were, and we ever will be, ready to yield
unforced assistance; but it must not, and it never can
be extorted! exclaimed he, striking his hand, till the
hall rung again.
Low murmurs of Treason! treason! were heard
in some parts of the room, and Henry Osborne, fearing
his vehemence might betray him into danger, gently
touched his arm. Am I not of age? said Otis,
petulantly
;
but instantly calming his irritation, he continued,
Some have sneeringly asked, Are the Americans
too poor to pay a few pounds on stamped paper? No!
America, thanks to God and herself, is rich. But the
right to take ten pounds implies the right to take a
thousand
;
and what must be the wealth that avarice, aided
by power, cannot exhaust?
True, the spectre is now small; but the shadow he
casts before him is huge enough to darken all this fair
land.
Others, in sentimental style, talk of the immense
debt of gratitude which we owe to England. And
what is the amount of this debt? Why, truly, it is the
same that the young lion owes to the dam, which has
brought it forth on the solitude of the mountain, or left
it amid the winds and storms of the desert.
We plunged into the wave with the magna charta of
freedom in our teeth, because the faggot and the torch
were behind us. We have waked this new world from
its savage lethargy; forests have been prostrated in our
path; towns and cities have grown up suddenly as the
flowers of the tropics, and the fires in our autumnal
woods are scarcely more rapid than the increase of our
wealth and population.
And do we owe all this to the kind succour of our
mother country? No! we owe it to the tyranny that
drove us from her,to the pelting storms, which
invigorated
our helpless infancy.
But perhaps others will say, we ask no money from
your gratitude,we only demand that you should pay
your own expenses.
And who, I pray, is to judge of their necessity?
Why, the king(and, with all due reverence to his
sacred
majesty, he understands the real wants of his
distant
subjects, as little as he does the language of the
Choctaws.) Who is to judge concerning the frequency
of these demands? The ministry. Who is to judge
whether the money is properly expended? The cabinet
behind the throne.
In every instance, those who
take
are to judge for
those who
pay;
and if this system is suffered to go into
operation, we shall have reason to esteem it a great
privilege
,
that rain and dew do not depend upon
parliament
;
otherwise they would soon be taxed and dried.
But, thanks be to God, there is freedom enough left
upon earth to resist such monstrous injustice. The
flame of liberty is extinguished in Greece and Rome,
but the light of its glowing embers is still bright and
strong on the shores of America. Actuated by its
sacred
influence, we will resist unto death. But we will
not countenance anarchy and misrule. The wrongs
that a desperate community have heaped upon their
enemies, shall be amply and speedily repaired. Still,
it may be well for some proud men to remember that
a fire is lighted in these Colonies, which one breath of
theirs may kindle into such fury, that the blood of all
England cannot extinguish it.
5
A murmur of delight ran through the whole assembly.
The impetuous eloquence of his manner swept every
thing before it. Loud and reiterated applause began to
resound through the building; and shouts of Otis
forever
!
the friend of the people! were heard around
the doors. Even the friends of the administration had
awaited his conclusion in breathless admiration. True,
the charm ceased with his voice; and though the
involuntary
tribute they had paid to talents and integrity
could not be recalled, it was immediately overbalanced
by threatening words and scornful smiles.
To have surprised an enemy into unwilling praise,
must give a delightful consciousness of mental power to
the greatest and best of minds; but intellect has a still
greater triumph, when genius, born in poverty and
nurtured
in seclusion, sees wealth and rank, with all their
gilded trappings, shrink to their own nothingness, and
pay reluctant homage where heaven has set its own
high impress of nobility. That Mr. Otis was too much
gifted by fortune, to enjoy this last species of exultation,
certainly did not soften the asperity of his enemies. It
was doubly provoking, that one whose situation in society
was so commanding, and whose influence was so
extensive
,
should dare, thus openly, to throw the gauntlet of
defiance; and on their way homeward, not a few talked
of the necessity of ridding England of so formidable
a foe.
Leaving them to nurse their wrath, we will follow
his friend, Henry Osborne. After apologizing to Mr.
Otis for his friendly interruption, and giving his most
cordial congratulations, he walked home through Friezel
Court, thinking it possible some valuable papers might
yet be saved.
Many people were still around the doors, intently
examining the various articles that lay crushed and
scattered in every direction.
Henry passed into the ruined library, and as the
gaunt figure of Mr. Townsend met his view, he
involuntarily
started back. The old miser thrust something
into his side pocket, with all the trembling eagerness of
dotage; and immediately began to make some
inarticulate
apologies about a paper he had lost.
Distressful times these, sir, said he, when a
man's earnings an't safe night nor day. Nothing can be
done with money, but to hide it in the bowels of the
earth.
Have you suffered from the recent riot? inquired
Osborne, with a mingled expression of contempt and
compassion.
I can't say I have, sir; but I have had great losses
in my day. I am a poor man now; and
He was going to add more, but the entrance of
Governor Hutchinson and his sister occasioned a sudden
pause. The miser changed colour, felt in his pocket to
ascertain that the secreted parcel was secure, and said
rapidly, I hope your honour will excuse my being here.
I just stepped down to see how things looked.
My doors always opened upon the inside, replied
Hutchinson; and I could not now close them against
any one, if I would.
There was a slight tremor in his voice, and the tears
actually crowded into his eyes, when he looked on the
wreck of that splendid library, which he had been more
than thirty years collecting with all the devotedness of
antiquarian zeal. Indeed the scene was melancholy
enough. Books were stripped of their covers,
manuscripts
torn to pieces, the royal portraits rent from top
to bottom, and the beautiful, swan-like neck of Mary
Stuart was all that remained of the proud line of busts.
Oh dear, cried Miss Sandford, you may say
what you will, the world never was half as wicked as it
is now. Who would think it? added she, springing
forward, and raising something from a heap of rubbish.
Here is my blue silk damask, that I wore to a ball as
long ago as the year 25, stuffed into a porridge pot;the
very gown that Mrs. Winthrop hated so much because
her husband insisted upon it that I never looked so well
in any thing else. What will this world come to?
The gentlemen gave all the condolence that so
important
a subject demanded, and the querulous maiden
began making fresh researches. At every new instance
of wasteful destruction, Mr. Townsend would signify his
horror by a sympathizing groan. At first, Miss Sandford
felt disposed to ask him to leave the room; but when
she looked up and saw his grotesque figure bending over
the ruined furniture with such a look of utter distress,
she felt strongly inclined to be merry at his expense.
Perceiving the gentlemen had passed into the adjoining
rooms, she ventured to compromise with dignity, and
began, When I wore this gown, Mr. Townsend, you
were young, and used to attend balls, I suppose.
Oh dear, yes, rejoined the miser. I have spent
a deal of money in them foolish ways; the more is the
pity.
But they say you are very rich now.
Do they? said the old man, chuckling. Then
putting on a long face, he added, 'T an't true, though.
I'm a dreadful poor man. Just enough to keep soul
and body together, that 's all.
I should not think your soul and body would be
a very weighty concern, whether together or separate.
You are very much out of health?
Yes, indeed I am. I have a power of diseases.
Perhaps you suffer for want of good nursing. It is
a pity you had not married when you were young, Mr.
Townsend,
I don't know, I don't know. Women are dreadful
expensive.
But you are rich, and it is not too late now to find
some kind notable woman, for a wife.
I hope it is, I hope it is. Women are
despit
expensive
.
Why, I don't keep a horse, because it costs
such a power of money.
But, Mr. Townsend, a prudent woman
I tell you they are all dreadful costly, exclaimed
the persecuted bachelor, pushing his cap hard over his
forehead, and making the best of his way out of the
house.
After examining the chambers, to ascertain whether
any remnant of a wardrobe could be found, Miss
Sandford and her brother returned to Mr. Osborne's,
5 *
where they had consented to take up their temporary
abode.
The interview with the miser afforded the girls many
a laugh; but when Doctor Byles heard of it, he shook
his head significantly, and said, There is many a true
word spoken in jest.
CHAP. V.
And mortals dared to ponder for themselves,
To weigh kings in the balance, and to speak
Of freedom, the forbidden fruit.
Manfred
.
When
the plague raged in London, one of the most
remarkable features of the time was the total
forgetfulness
of all religious distinctions. A house of prayer
was enough to suffice hearts broken down by many
sorrows
;
and if the soul could but prostrate itself before
its God, it was careless whether the body knelt or stood,
whether hands were uplifted, or censers waved. But
when the curse had departed from the land, again the
temple of divine truth resounded with the din of
jarring
sectaries, and its sacred courts were once more
polluted
by man's unholy passions.
In the same manner, the scene of imminent peril,
which we have described, subdued, for a while, all the
rancour of political animosity.
The disinterested firmness and the ready hospitality
of Mr. Osborne, were repaid with prompt and grateful
affection; and it was not until Doctor Willard met the
same company at the house of his friend, on the ensuing
evening, that party distinctions were for a moment
revived
.
When he regretted the depredations of the rabble,
Hutchinson answered, The rabble would have been
excusable, sir; but these things are excited by men
who would honour a nobler cause. This is the price I
pay for being Chief Justice at the expense of the elder
Otis.
With indignation I repel the charge that the late
riots were either instigated or approved by such men as
Otis and his associates, replied Willard. They will
fearlessly resist oppression, but they will never encourage
violence. Have not the community expressed their
abhorrence
with sufficient union and energy? Have not
the good citizens of Boston voluntarily taken every
precaution
to prevent such excesses in future?
That is all nonsense, exclaimed the Chief Justice.
You boast of your proceedings at Fanueil Hallbut
what was Otis's speech, but the rankest rebellion? The
people would do well enough, if they were not led on
by a few intriguing individuals.
Our confusions do not originate in the arts of
demagogues
,
but in the tyranny of rulers, sir, replied the
young patriot. The Geisslers of Switzerland, the
Granvels of Holland, the Lauds and Straffords of
England
,
were the undoubted authors of the tragedies acted
in their respective countries; and he paused a
moment
I
leave to your own conscience, who will be
answerable, if one drop of American blood is ever shed
in this contest.
The Governor appeared struck with the boldness of
his manner, and remained silent.
Yet there certainly were men above the common
mass, among the crowd of rioters, said Somerville.
True, answered Henry Osborne; but were you
at the bar of the House of Commons, could you in
conscience
,
deny that the efforts of those men were to
regulate and control the populace.
I certainly do not forget the noble conduct of
Samuel
Adams, rejoined Somerville; nor am I
unmindful
of what we owe to your father. He looked
significantly
at Doctor Willard, and added, Neither have I
forgotten that some of America's best blood did not
disdain
to seek my uncle under the Liberty-tree.
Make what use you will of the knowledge, which
circumstances have put in your power, said Willard.
I do not deny that I sought him there; but I must
add, none more heartily regretted the summons, than
myself.
I believe you, young man, said Doctor Byles;
but after all, you must be aware, that it is much like
opening the sluices of a stream, and then attempting to
stem it with sand. He who teaches a people to
distrust
their sovereign, and fills their heads with delirious
dreams of their own rights, is answerable for all the
excesses
of their fury; and I must confess I see no way
to put an end to these mischiefs, but by cutting off such
men as Hancock and Adams. Notwithstanding all that
has been said in Fanueil Hall to-day, there can be no
doubt that such men are the instigators. To reason
they will never listen; but indictments, fines, scaffolds,
and gibbets, are the strongest arguments in the world.
I never knew a man get the better in disputing with
them.
It would be but one head of the Hydra, observed
Willard, in a tone he vainly endeavoured to render calm.
Public indignation is not to be mistaken for the
personal
interest, or the factious zeal, of a few. That the
stream overruns its banks, argues that it is full even to excess; and should the waters subside into smoothness
for a while, you may rely upon it, the waves beneath
are rolling and gathering in their might. America never
will submit, sir. We have drawn the sword of
opposition
,
and we throw the scabbard into the fire.
You had better put it in your pocket, young man,
replied Doctor Byles, with a dryness of sarcasm that
was irresistibly ludicrous. You might very possibly
want the sheath in the presence of well disciplined
English
armies.
True, the British infantry can acquit themselves
well in the gay reviews exhibited for royal amusement,
in Hyde Park, or on Wimbledon Common; but they
have never fought with Englishmen, replied Willard.
Our forefathers brought the spirit of liberty from
their native land, when it was in the greatest purity and
perfection there; and it has not degenerated by change
of climate. Those who tamper with it, may perhaps
be scorched by a flame they know not how to
extinguish
.
Bravely said, Doctor Willard, exclaimed
Hutchinson
.
I was not aware you were so ready to throw off
the mask of loyalty.
The eyes of the young patriot flashed. I wear no
masks, said he, and those who do, will soon find
them useless.
My friend spoke of things
possible
, not
desirable
,
continued Henry Osborne. He must be blind indeed,
if he did not perceive that a momentous crisis was near
at hand. The cards are shuffling fast throughout
Europe
.
Where will the regiments of England, and the
horde of soldiers that her wealth can buy in from the
continent, find the strength that is to oppose their
progress
?
asked Hutchinson.
The sword that has been sharpened on the heart,
does deadlier execution than the sabre of the
mercenary
,
rejoined Willard. Besides England has not
much to expect from foreign troops. It is notorious
that the king is on exceedingly ill terms with the
emperor
of Germany. Frederic of Prussia hated his
grandfather, and it is not probable he likes the young
monarch any more for his union with the house of
Mecklenburg.
Many from the heart of this country would join the
royal standard, said Doctor Byles.
Dreadfully formidable they must be, retorted
Henry Osborne, Let me think, there would be
Justice
Sewall, the Honourable Mr. Paxton, Brigadier
Ruggles, some twenty or thirty of the relations and
dependants
of Governor Hutchinson, and perhaps we
might add a reverend pontifex, with bands and robe
floating in the air, leading them on to victory.
I wonder I have not been mobbed, said Doctor
Byles, laughing outright. I am sure I should have
been, if the people had known one thing of which I am
guilty.
What is that? asked Lucretia, who occasionally
attended to the conversation.
Why, your uncle has had all this trouble, because
he holds five
posts
. Now whoever will take the trouble
to notice, when he goes by my door, will see that I have
lately had fifteen.
The company all smiled, and Mr. Osborne said
You attribute our difficulties to causes too local,
brother Byles. A few offices bestowed contrary to our
wishes, form but a feather in the balance. It is this
enslaving principle of taxation without representation,
that we all complain of, as ruinous; and which has
already
driven some of us to frightful excesses. My son
and his friend have indeed talked somewhat openly;
but how is it possible for any of us to conceal from our
own hearts what must be the result, if the present
system
is pursued. With the lapse of time, this country
must fall from England, like ripe fruit from the tree that
has formed it; but why should the hand of oppression
shake it to the ground while it is yet unripe, because it
must drop in its maturity?
Nay, if losing you is so certain, replied the Doctor,
we had best do it at once. You know the old proverb,
`Good riddance, &c.?
England might well repeat the proverb, with regard
to Massachusetts, added Hutchinson. She has been
refractory from her earliest infancy.
And well she may be, said Henry Osborne, when
she has not the power to choose her own state officers;
and is compelled to take them from men whose interest
it is to oppress and vilify her.
The Governor frowned at this home-thrust. You
may thank your own obstinacy for that, replied he.
Had you complied with the royal pleasure in the reign
of James the Second, your original charter would not
have been condemned. But you chose to declare in
favour of the revolution ministers, those makers and
unmakers
of kings; and what did you receive for your
pains? Truly nothing more than a mutilated charter,
shorn of one half its privileges, from the hands of William
and Mary. Thus may rebellion always flourish. Have
you other grievances, weighty as those you have
mentioned
?
You, of all men, need not ask what are our wrongs,
rejoined Henry Osborne. You need not be told, that
wicked men are allowed to put their hands in our pockets,
and draw from thence pay for their parasites and
plunderers
.
Why, in being taxed, you do but share the fate of
other British subjects, answered the Chief Justice.
To take protection implies that you promise
obedience
;
and really, after England has fed you, clothed
you, and fought for you, it is not unreasonable you
should do something for your own support.
I have no patience to hear this, exclaimed Willard,
starting on his feet. Fed and clothed us, indeed!
You spurned us from you; and thanks to ourselves, we
have struggled on to prosperity. France is no enemy
to America, but to England. We have had wars,
because
we belonged to her; and if she helped us she
did but her own work. Besides we are not unwilling
6
to pay our full share toward the support of the British
empire. We only wish to have our property fairly
represented.
I know that is your favourite plea, replied
Somerville
.
But you are in fact as virtually represented in
the British parliament as our Irish brethren.
As virtually represented as the English commons
are in a council of the Cherokees! said young
Osborne
.
It was Somerville's nature to sympathzie with every
thing bold and fearless; and as he looked at Grace, he
was delighted with the fluctuating colour that betrayed
the keen interest she took in the conversation of her
father and brother. Perhaps wiser men than he would
have wavered in an opinion formed by accidental
circumstances
,
and supported by pride, for the sake of a
smile from lips as beautiful as the rose-bud, just bursting
from its calyx.
I cannot but support the supreme legislation of my
country, said he; and I shall always maintain the
right of parliament to tax her Colonies when and how
they think proper; but I must acknowledge I begin to
think that the present system of taxation is impolitic,
however just it may be.
And pray, sir, may I ask on what you found so wise
an opinion? asked Doctor Byles.
I think, that the bulk of the American people are
under so strong a delusion, and the spirit that every
where pervades them is so dauntless, that a victory,
even if it should cost us but little blood and treasure,
would take from us what is far more valuable; for,
instead
of faithful subjects, the king would have a parcel
of discontented citizens, ready to explode at every spark
of excitement. Besides, it is well for government never
to attempt what they are not sure of performing.
Nothing
is so dangerous to authority as a command
successfully
resisted.
And for fear of all this, you would have the lion
fawn, and cringe, and lick the hand of the wayward
baby; and if medicine must be given, it must forsooth
be hid in sugar; said Doctor Byles.
If you have so high an opinion of their prowess,
you had better join their cause, nephew, added
Hutchinson
,
with great bitterness of manner.
Grace, alarmed at the increasing acrimony of the
conversation, turned to Henry, and said, playfully,
I wish you gentlemen would leave politics, and teach
me how to carry war into the enemy's quarters, on this
chess board.
A wise speech, Miss Osborne, said Doctor Byles.
I have been highly amused at the folly of this
conversation
;
and was just about to say to brother Osborne,
that we would drown all heart-burnings in a good
orthodox bowl of punch, which I see he is preparing.
Pray how much does an orthodox bowl hold?
asked Mr. Osborne.
Are you not theologian enough to know? rejoined
the Doctor. It contains precisely
five pints
.
A smile again went round the room; but it gave place
to respectful attention, when, assuming the dignified
seriousness that so well became him, he took the offered
glass, and said, Do not you, my friends, forget that
we are grateful men, and we will never forget that you
are conscientious.
Mr. Osborne readily pledged the sentiment; political
discord was again hushed, and the remainder of the
evening passed in cheerful good humour.
I have not been inattentive to your game, Miss
Osborne
,
though I have been so earnest in conversation,
said Somerville. Miss Fitzherbert will be the
conquerer
,
I foresee.
As she always is in a contest with me, replied
Grace, smiling. She has taken both my castles, and
all my knights.
Both
, but not
all
your knights, Miss Osborne,
rejoined
Somerville, with a glance that could not be
misunderstood
.
The suffusion that flitted over Grace's cheek, was as
light and transient, as the rose tint that the setting sun
casts on the drifted snow; but Lucretia blushed that
deep and glowing red, which a painful sensation can
alone call to the face; and Doctor Willard turned away
from the too beaming expression of Somerville's
countenance
,
with an audible sigh.
I understand that Whitfield is to preach for you
next Sabbath, Doctor Byles, said Henry Osborne.
He is, rejoined the clergyman; and I suppose the
joints of Hollis-street church will crack with its fulness.
I have never heard that celebrated orator,
observed
Somerville; though I was very near Bristol,
when he was there, drawing such crowds after him. I
remember that one who heard his farewell address to
the good people of that city, said, Whitfield preached it
like a lion.
And he described his eloquence well, observed
Doctor Byles. Whitfield feels the importance of his
subject, and he makes others feel it.
Brother Chauncy considers him half enthusiast,
half hypocrite, said Mr. Osborne; but I must say
that I think his piety as sincere as it is fervid.
Will you accompany me to Hollis-street, on Sunday,
young ladies? inquired Somerville.
Grace looked to her father for consent, and having
readily received it, cheerfully agreed to the proposal.
And whom must you ask, Miss Fitzherbert? said
he.
Aunt Sandford is visiting one of her friends for a
few days,so I cannot ask her; and uncle Hutchinson
has already looked that I might go.
Somerville rallied them a little about being so dutiful
and obedient; and talked of Hesperian fruit, dragons,
&c.
The minutes flew away with down upon their feet;
and it was late when Doctor Willard looked at his
watch, and observed, My time must be too fast.
How can it be otherwise, when it has such
fair
reasons
for its flight? said Somerville, bowing to Grace.
The young physician turned rapidly, and bade the
company good evening.
6 *
Doctor Byles too, who had been engaged with Mr.
Osborne, in a discussion concerning the different tenets
of Wesley and Whitfield, arose and prepared to depart.
I must not lose your friendship, if I am a whig, said
Mr. Osborne, as the doctor moved toward the door.
You see, brother Osborne, that a wig is very near to
me, replied he, touching his head.
Near to your head, but not to your heart, said
Lucretia.
Those who know me well, know that they are very
near each other, responded he; and bidding them all
an affectionate good night, he returned to his home.
The family devotions, which immediately followed
his departure, were perfectly delightful to all. The
simple and impressive prayer in which the father so
earnestly entreated that the snares of youth might not
be concealed beneath its flowers, betrayed such a
mixture
of human tenderness and religious fervour, that
his guests could not but forgive the emphasis with which
he begged that God would guide the hearts of kings,
and give their counsellors wisdom.
CHAP. VI.
Soh, thought Mr. Glossin, here is one finger in, at least; and that I
will make the means of introducing my whole hand.
Guy Mannering
.
We
must now call the attention of our readers to the
miser whom we introduced in our second chapter. A
day or two after the riot in Friezel Court, he was
engaged
in earnest conversation with a desperate-looking
man, to whom he was bound by those terribly galling
chains, which link the guilty in unhallowed communion.
In tones of whining entreaty, Mr. Townsend began
by saying, So, after helping me to these Fitzherbert
papers, and after forging letters to the widow, you say
you will leave me in the lurch, if I get into any trouble
by this deuced East India uncle's coming to life again.
I heard all the name were dead and gone; and my
heart has been at rest about 'em many a year.
When it is known that Mrs. Fitzherbert's letters
never reached England, you will be suspected of course,
but there is no witness to prove any thing against you,
but myself,and you know well enough what will buy
me.
I have told you, a thousand times, that you should be
remembered in my will.
So the bird promised his wings to the mouse, that
gnawed open the door of his cage; but the first thing
the poor mouse knew, was that his wings had borne him
off to the skies. I don't mean, by the way, that there
is any danger of your taking an upward journey.
Nevertheless, you may die shortly, and what good will
your promises do me then? I want no legacy for
myself. I have already told you that every penny of
your property must be left to the one I shall name to
you, unless you are willing to have your life left at the
mercy of the law.
The miser groaned in all the various tones of
distressed
dotage.
There is no use in bewailing the matter thus, said
his rought companion. The will must be drawn,
signed
,
and attested, before this night. Else I will tell all.
You ha'n't any proof, rejoined the trembling miser;
and who is going to believe your word?
The devil, I ha'n't! exclaimed Wilson. Hav'nt
I all the Captain's papers, and the widow's letters,
locked
fast in my chest?
The features of the old man were convulsed with
rage and fear.
You told me, said he, that you lost them in the
street, the night of the fracas.
I lied for sport, replied Wilson. Do you think
I would carry such papers in my pocket, when I went
into the midst of a mob.
You stole 'em from me, with false keys, murmured
Townsend.
That's neither here nor there, so long as I have got
them, and there are marks enough on their white faces
to hang you high and dry.
I can prove to the Lieutenant Governor, that you
were among the rioters, growled the miser.
And much good may it do him and you. Tell him
to send a warrant after the fly that bites him in harvest
time. Gibbet-making will be a profitable trade, if all
who committed that offence are to be hung. Send him
word that I was in the mob, and as an offset, I will let
him know of the bank notes you picked up in his
library
,
and thrust into your pocket.
The evil one helps you! exclaimed he. How
could you know that?
If he finds time to help me, it is because you have
learned out, said Wilson. I found it out by my eyes,
which have helped me to many a useful thing in my day.
You see I have evidence enough to do what I have a
mind to; and I promise you I will make use of it, if
this day closes without your making a will in favour of
my daughter.
Daughter! I never heard you had a wife.
An agonized expression passed over Wilson's face.
I have a daughter, said he,as lovely a creature
as man ever looked on. Oh
He stooped down and covered his face with his
hands.
Mr. Townsend gazed at him in a perfect stupor of
surprise; for it was long since he had witnessed any
thing like human emotion.
Wilson rose and walked across the room several times.
Why have I betrayed the sorrows of a bursting heart
to such a wretch as he is? thought he. He stopped
before Mr. Townsend, and with a mixture of sadness
and decision, said, I have no earthly hopes or wishes,
but for this child. If you will leave her all your
property
,
it will be well for you. If not, I put the match to
a mine that will blow you up in its explosion.
There an't a charge of powder in the house,
rejoined
the old man. I never buy things I don't want.
Fool! exclaimed Wilson, The powder I blow
up, will be your own knavery. Will you, or will you
not, comply with my directions?
The miser groaned deeply. It is hard to toil the
best of one's days, and then throw the money away
upon
strangers, said he. My nephew often sends me a
pretty letter and a bottle of wine, free of expense, and
he is the only one that cares for the poor old man.
Besides
,
I don't know but I may change my situation.
One of the first ladies in the place did the same as tell
me she would marry me.
She would send to the dissection room for a
bridegroom
,
as soon, replied Wilson, with a look indicating
the deepest contempt. Shall I send for a lawyer
about this business?
If I could be sure about that box of silver, said the
old man, hesitatingly.
You may be sure of it; if you will follow my
directions. I know where it is.
And why don't you get it yourself? asked the
miser, with a look that he intended should be extremely
arch.
It would be ill work digging that depth alone; and
there must be numbers for the charm, they say.
How did you first know about it? said the old
man, drawing his chair close to the speaker.
When I was on board the pirate ship, we overtook
a richly freighted vessel a little off Cuba. We boarded
her, and seized all her cargo. A small iron chest,
directed to Halifax, was taken out of the cabin. Two
rolls of parchment were found on the top, containing
the name of the owner, and mentioning the Captain to
whose care it was entrusted, the destination of the
vessel, and so forth. On a strip of canvass were spread
twelve ingots of gold; and beneath this, the Spanish
silver lay in piles. This treasure belonged to Captain
Fitzherbert, who had left it in the care of a friend at
Cuba, with directions to send it to his widow at Halifax,
in case of his death. The Captain and mate took the
strong box to themselves, dividing the remainder of the
prize (and a noble one she was) among us sailors. To
make a long story short, we made for Boston; and
when we came within sight of the island, the Captain
despatched a boat with three men and a negro toward
the castle, about midnight. I heard them whisper,
`Place it where the shadows of the two elms meet at
twelve o'clock.'
`We know how to do the business,' was the answer;
and presently the dead silence was disturbed by the loud
dash of their oars, as they manfully rowed towards land.
`Muffle your oars,' said the mate. `D**n you,
you 'll wake the castle guard, at this rate.'
`Keep in the shade, as you pass the garrison,' said
the Captain.
The commands were obeyed; and the trickling of
the water was all I heard. The boat swept round to
the back part of the island, and I saw it no more. The
next day, the three men returned; but the negro was
not with them.
What had become of him? asked Mr. Townsend.
He was sacrificed to the devil. They always put
a corpse under their treasure.
And is the box there now?
No doubt. It is no easy work to get money that is
left in the grip of Satan, unless one knows how to loosen
his fingers.
And can that be done? eagerly inquired the miser.
There is a woman, called Molly the Witch, who
they say knows the art. I will go to her for information
if you will pay the men for digging, and give me a
hundred
crowns for my trouble; and as for this affair about
the will, if you do as I tell you, the negro buried under
that iron chest could not keep your secret better than
I will.
If I was sure there would be the
valee
of
Not less than ten thousand pounds, I promise you,
interrupted Wilson.
The old man paused, before he ventured to say,
I have not long to live; but nobody cares for that. I
shall neither be missed nor moaned. This nephew is
the only being that has a drop of my father's blood in
his veins. I cannot disinherit him.
You have been playing a game of selfishness and
guilt all your life, responded Wilson; and now that
you are completely in the nine-holes, you will not throw
your knave of trumps on the last lift.
For the first time, Wilson perceived some emotion
on the face of that lonely mortal. Old as I am, I must
expect to die soon, said he; but I would not dangle
from a halter. I should not think you would have the
heart to tumble this old carcass into the grave.
I have been familiar with blood, replied his
desperate
associate; but I don't want your wretched life,
if you will give your bags of gold instead.
The miser leaned his hands upon his knees, rocked
vehemently from side to side, and heaved his
accustomed
groan,but said nothing.
Tell me instantly what you will do! said Wilson,
seizing his shoulder with a fierceness that made him
quake beneath his grasp.
Shall I go to Hutchinson, and procure a Tyburn
tippet for you? Or will you provide for my daughter?
Half frightened out of his senses, the old man
muttered
,
If the young folks would but marry
A bright thought, by Jove, exclaimed Wilson;
and he went on talking to himself, in an under tone,
Clever fellow too; as much better than this old fool
as Gertrude is better than I am. But, continued he,
aloud, what will you do for me, if the young man has
some boyish freak, and chooses to marry another?
I will leave something to the young woman. May
be five thousand crowns.
The whole, the whole, every farthing of your
money, exclaimed Wilson. All that you have, must
you give for your life.
7
Take all, then, said the miser. Oh, the day
that I knew you was an unlucky one for me.
A lawyer and witnesses were immediately called.
Emboldened by their presence, the covetous old man
was about to recant what he had promised; but a glance
from the terrible eye of Wilson intimidated him; and amid
sighs, and groans, and tears, a deed of gift was at length
written, which made Gertrude Wilson heiress to his large
fortune, in case Edward Percival refused to marry her.
A long and earnest conversation respecting the chest
of silver ensued,and about four o'clock, P. M. an
upright
vehicle, studded with brass nails, and adorned with
wings that looked like any thing but flying, conveyed
Mr. Townsend and his accomplice to the dwelling of
the spae wife. After travelling a few miles, they
turned into a sequestered path, obviously unfrequented.
They had not proceeded far, when two half-starved
hounds sprung from the thicket, and set up a most
hideous yell.
Whist, Mars! Down with you, Hecate! exclaimed
a voice, the shrillness of which alone indicated that it
came from woman.
The travellers looked toward the place whence the
sound proceeded, and saw a tall, athletic female,
clearing
the bushes, and coming towards them with rapid
strides. Her masculine figure, of such uncommon
height and rigid outline; the grey hair, that hung in
confused masses about her haggard countenance, and
the frenzied look of her large blue eyes, would have
struck the stoutest heart with something like dread.
When asked where Molly Bradstreet resided, she
answered, In that hut at the foot of Rattlesnake Hill.
What's your want? I am the woman.
She looked at Wilson as she spoke, with an expression
that made him shudder. Had he ever known the strange
being, he would have thought it indicated personal hatred,
deep, settled, and rancorous; and though he was sure
she was a stranger, and that he could not of course be
an object of animosity, that look haunted him for days
after, like a frightful dream. Recovering from his
momentary
embarrassment, he briefly explained his errand.
Follow me, she replied; but you must leave the
horse here. You'll find no footing for the beast.
Complying with her directions, they pursued a crooked
path, occasionally intercepted by brake and briar, until
they stood before the wretched hovel.
Walk in, said she, lowering her gigantic stature
as she led the way. What questions would you ask?
she added, as she seated herself on the bed, and pointed
to a rude stool, that constituted her whole furniture.
Tell us what we come for, said the old miser.
If you don't know that, we won't give you a copper.
You are a cunning one, rejoined she, with a
hollow
laugh.
After learning the days of the month on which
they were born, she looked in an almanac, and
ascertained
through what sign the sun was then travelling,
marked it down, pressed her hand against her forehead
for a few moments,and then carefully examined two
large, dirty folios, covered, within and without, with
strange and apparently unintelligible characters. Some
tea-grounds were next deposited in a cup, which Wilson
was ordered silently to whirl round three times three.
This operation being performed with the most
portentous
solemnity, she looked alternately at the cup and the
books, till Wilson, weary of the process, exclaimed,
What answer, woman?
There is gold, hidden gold, responded the oracle.
Mr. Townsend, who had from the beginning been the
personification of extreme fear, now stole toward the
door, muttering, She has to do with the spirits of
darkness.
The sybil grinned, and showed her loosened, yellow
teeth.
What more, witch? said the impatient Wilson.
Witch! echoed she, with a malignant scowl.
Mrs. Bradstreet, then, said the inquirer, in a more
soothing tone.
In your cup, there is crime, she cried. Here
is the corpse of a woman, whom you would give worlds
to see alive, and beautiful, and innocent as she was
before
she knew you.
A withering glance accompanied these words, and
Wilson, springing forward, shook her in the intensity of
his anxiety and rage. Hag! where did you learn
that? shouted he.
With strength that almost equalled his own, she threw
him from her, and replied with affected calmness,
I have read to you what the fates have written,
nothing more.
Ashamed of having thus betrayed himself, he asked
her to proceed.
I tell you there is blood in the cup, said she.
Your right arm hath been familiar with the sword, and
the pistol has not been quiet in your hand. Good luck
is near you now, and it comes in the form of a wedding
ring; but the circle of fortune is broken before it
reaches the centre of the cup, and tears lie at the
bottom
.
A death of agony is not far distant.
Without answering a word, the person to whom she
had spoken, walked to the door, and breathed the fresh
air, as if he needed its strengthening influence; for,
though ashamed of his weakness, he could not but give
his reluctant faith to a being, who had thus
unaccountably
read his blood-stained page of life. With a trembling
hand, the miser took the cup, and performed the mystic
ceremony.
There is but little to tell you, sir, said the witch.
You have loved gold, and gained it,and you will
keep it till you die. A sword hangs over your head;
but it will not drop. Your sand is almost run out, and
until the last grain is shaken through, your deeds will
be kept secret.
Let us go hence, said Mr. Townsend, as he
staggered
toward the door; for if ever the wicked one
was in human shape .
But what of the money? inquired Wilson.
There is money hid, was the laconic answer.
And how is it to be found?
7 *
If the sea-robber buried it, let three, or nine, or
fifteen men seek for it. He who bears the witch-hazel
rod, must carry it upright till it bows down in spite of
his strength. At that spot let them dig; and let not a
word be spoken within hearing of it. Perhaps the
meeting of two shadows at twelve o'clock may mark
the place; for the pirates were ever particular about
that. Every man must fasten a Bible on his neck with
a silken cord. If none speak within a circle of nine
yards, you 'll find the treasure.
Wilson laid two Spanish dollars on the table.
It is too much, said the covetous old man, seizing
hold of one of them. Breath costs nothing.
Don't it? said the wrinkled dame, forcing open
the skinny fingers that had closed over the money.
You will think it is worth more two months hence.
Farewell, witch, said Wilson, who had recovered
the bold and savage manner most natural to him.
Farewell, muttered she, as they plunged into the
thicket; and take an old mother's curse. I know ye
well, though you know not me.
A savage exultation lighted up her eyes for a moment,
and she shook her head toward them, as she added,
I 'll have my revenge
CHAP. VII.
His peculiar manner and power arose from an energy of soul, which
nature could give, but which no human being could justly copy.
Wirt
.
On the ensuing Sabbath, Somerville joined the young
ladies on their way to Hollis-street. The crowd
presented
a strange contrast to the congregations of the
present day. Here and there a taper-waisted damsel,
glittering in embroidered brocade, with flowers even
larger than life, while close by her side walked the
dandy of that period, with bright red waistcoat, leather
small-clothes, and enormous buckles sparkling in the
sun. Then followed a humble dame, with rustle gown
and checked apron, leading a reluctant urchin,
stumbling
along with his little three-corned scraper; the
tears still trickling down his cheeks, forced from him by
the painful operation of being shoved and shaken into
his tight breeches for the first time. In the rear came
an older boy, alternately casting an envious eye on the
trim little fellow before him, and a despairing glance at
his own clothes, which, drenched by repeated rains,
hung in slovenly folds about his ancles.
Among this motley group was one individual, who
entirely arrested Lucretia's attention. She walked
before
them with a most masculine stride, and ever and
anon cast back an anxious, earnest look, as she muttered,
Aye, as good as the proudest; thanks to a poor old
woman she never dreams of.
Some insane creature, I imagine, observed
Somerville
.
Lucretia thought so too; but the expression of her
face haunted her imagination; and she was unable to
dispel the charm, until she had vainly searched around
the church for the singular apparition.
Eager and respectful attention characterized the
whole audience.
There was nothing in the appearance of this
extraordinary
man which would lead you to suppose that a
Felix would tremble before him. He was something
above the middle stature, well proportioned, and
remarkable
for a native gracefulness of manner. His
complexion was very fair, his features regular and his
dark blue eyes small and lively: in recovering from the
measles, he had contracted a squint with one of them;
but this peculiarity rather rendered the expression of
his countenance more rememberable, than in any
degree
lessened the effect of its uncommon sweetness.
His voice excelled both in melody and compass; and
its fine modulations were happily accompanied by that
grace of action which he possessed in an eminent
degree
,
and which has been said to be the chief requisite
of an orator. To have seen him when he first
commenced
,
one would have thought him any thing but
enthusiastic
and glowing; but as he proceeded, his heart
warmed with his subject, and his manner became
impetuous
and animated, till, forgetful of every thing
around him, he seemed to kneel at the throne of
Jehovah
,
and to beseech in agony for his fellow beings.
After he had finished his prayer, he knelt for a long
time in profound silence; and so powerfully had it
affected
the most heartless of his audience, that a stillness
like that of the tomb pervaded the whole house.
Before he commenced his sermon, long, darkening
columns crowded the bright sunny sky of the morning,
and swept their dull shadows over the building, in
fearful
augury of the storm.
His text was, Strive to enter in at the strait gate;
for many, I say unto you, shall seek to enter in, and
shall not be able.
See that emblem of human life, said he, as he
pointed to a shadow that was flitting across the floor.
It passed for a moment, and concealed the brightness
of heaven from our viewbut it is gone. And where
will ye be my hearers, when your lives have passed
away like that dark cloud? Oh, my dear friends, I
see thousands sitting attentive, with their eyes fixed
on the poor, unworthy preacher. In a few days, we
shall all meet at the judgment-seat of Christ. We
shall form a part of that vast assembly which will gather
before his throne; and every eye will behold the
Judge. With a voice whose call you must abide and
answer, he will inquire whether on earth ye strove to
enter in at the strait gatewhether you were supremely
devoted to Godwhether your hearts were absorbed in
him. My blood runs cold when I think how many of
you will then seek to enter in, and shall not be able.
Oh, what plea can you make before the Judge of the
whole earth? Can you say it has been your whole
endeavour
to mortify the flesh with its affections and lusts?
that your life has been one long effort to do the will of
God? No! you must answer, I made myself easy in
the world, by flattering myself that all would end well;
but I have deceived my own soul, and am lost.
You, O false and hollow christian, of what avail
will it be that you have done many thingsthat you have
read much in the sacred wordthat you have made
long prayersthat you have attended religious duties,
and appeared holy in the eyes of men? What will all
this be, if instead of loving Him supremely, you have
been supposing you should exalt yourself in heaven, by
acts really polluted and unholy?
And you, rich man, wherefore do you hoard your
silver? Wherefore count the price you have received
for him whom you every day crucify, in your love of
gain? Why, that when you are too poor to buy a drop
of cold water, your beloved son may be rolled to hell
in his chariot pillowed and cushioned about him.
His eye gradually lighted up, as he proceeded, till
towards the close, it seemed to sparkle with celestial
fire.
Oh, sinners! he exclaimed, by all your hopes
of happiness, I beseech you to repent. Let not the
wrath of God be awakened. Let not the fires of
eternity
be kindled against you. See there! said he,
pointing to the lightning, which played on the corner of
the pulpit'Tis a glance from the angry eye of
Jehovah
!
Hark! continued he, raising his finger in a
listening attitude, as the distant thunder grew louder and
louder, and broke in one tremendous crash over the
building. It was the voice of the Almighty, as he
passed by in his anger!
As the sound died away, he covered his face with his
hands, and knelt beside his pulpit, apparently lost in
inward and intense prayer. The storm passed rapidly
by, and the sun, bursting forth in his might, threw across
the heavens a magnificent arch of peace. Rising, and
pointing to the beautiful object, he exclaimed, Look
upon the rainbow; and praise him that made it. Very
beautiful it is in the brightness thereof. It compasseth
the heavens about with glory; and the hands of the
Most High have bended it.
The effect was astonishing. Even Somerville shaded
his eyes when he pointed to the lightning, and knelt as
he listened to the approaching thunder;while the deep
sensibility of Grace, and the thoughtless vivacity of
Lucretia, yielded to the powerful excitement, in an
unrestrained burst of tears.
Who could resist such eloquence? said Lucretia,
as they mingled with the departing throng.
I should think no one who had a human heart,
answered Somerville. It is as resistless as it is
untutored
.
I was never before so completely aware of my
own nothingness,never so forcibly reminded, that I
was a mere drop in the vast ocean of existence.
Some doubt Mr. Whitfield's talents as well as his
piety, rejoined Lucretia; but after what I have
witnessed
this morning, I shall never distrust the sincerity
of his enthusiastic devotion. The heart that could
dictate
such language must have been bathed in the
fountains
of life. Who that had heard him to-day, could
think of him as a lad of fifteen, making mops, washing
floors, and taking care of horses at an inn?
Yet young as he then was, replied Somerville,
it is said the singular boy found leisure, amid his
servile
employments, to read Thomas  Kempis, and to
write two or three sermons.
It is but another proof that genius will find its
upward
way, whatever obstacles may lie in its path, said
Lucretia. You have promised to join us at Mr.
Osborne's
church this afternoon, you know. You will
there hear preaching of a different kind; but I do
not think the contrast will prove unfavourable to my
friend.
Grace, usually silent and timid, said nothing; but her
beautiful eyelashes were still impearled with tears,
and her sweet face was radiant with pleasure, when she
heard the allusion to her father.
Mr. Osborne's eloquence was, as they had anticipated,
a perfect contrast to that of Mr. Whitfield. He too
seemed to feel the importance of his subject, and often
rose to majestic fervour when urging it upon his hearers.
He never appeared to them invested in the sublimity of
wrathful denunciation,but he intreated them, with all
the earnestness of a father, to kneel at the Saviour's
feet, and lay their burthens there.
The Quaker poet has described in one powerful line,
the sensations excited by the first view of the stormy
ocean, with the boundless canopy of heaven above it,
and its frightful barrier of rocks and precipices.
My spirit was mute in the presence of power!
Mr. Whitfield's eloquence left a similar impression on
the soul; but Mr. Osborne was like a calm, deep river,
reflecting the light of heaven with mildness and
splendour
.
The first left the sensitive heart of Grace in a
state of painfulness, almost amounting to anguish; from
the latter, she returned to kneel at the bed-side with
involuntary devotion, as she said, Father in heaven,
let me be guided in all things by thee. Without ever
talking of religion, or pretending to more piety than her
associates, Grace well understood this delightful state
of internal resignation. It was not because she so
often heard her father speak on the subject. Young as
she was, experience had taught her that nothing else
could exalt every feeling into the region of pure,
etherial tranquillity, and leave no void in the heart.
Lucretia had more quickness of feeling, but less depth;
and she possessed a large share of that freedom of
thought, that boldness of investigation, which renders
exalted talents a peculiarly dangerous gift. Such minds,
while they proudly avoid the shoals of superstition, are
too apt to be wrecked on the rocks of scepticism. The
same faculties which open the hidden causes and effects
of nature to our view, will not guide us aright when
studying into the state of the soul, and the nature of its
future existence. There is a point where the divinity
within peremptorily says, Here shall thy proud waves
be stayed. Very few have groped about the veil, which
8
separates revealed religion from its internal mysteries,
until they have become enveloped in the thick folds of
its drapery, without at times wishing for the simple,
undoubting
faith of the ignorant. Indeed there never was
a soul, however cold in its speculations, however wild
and irregular in its passions, that has not felt the calm
influence of devotion stealing over it, like the delicious
breathings of distant music. Such impressions were
now vivid in the mind of Lucretia; but it was her fault,
that religion was the offspring of excitement, and the
sport of impulse. Its power was as transitory as it was
entire; and before she retired to rest she had forgotten
every thing but Somerville. He had invited the ladies
to an evening sail in the harbour, and promised that the
plan should be carried into execution before the week
had expired. To think of his looks, expressions, the
very tones of his voice, furnished ample food for her
imagination during the interim; for in a heart that loves
as youth and genius are too apt to love, the progress of
affection nearly equals the rapidity of light.
CHAP. VIII.
Such as I am, all true lovers are;
Unstaid and skittish in all motions else,
Save in the constant image of the creature
That is beloved.
Twelfth Night
.
The
proposed sail was unavoidably deferred until the
9th of September, during which time our young friends
were almost constantly together. The night chosen for
the expedition was rich in autumnal beauty. It was
one of those calm, delightful evenings, when the soul
bathes itself in stillness, and thoughts pure as an infant's
dreams come crowding on the heart. Nature, like an
oriental beauty, seemed to repose on her magnificent
couch, amid the sparkling and bubbling of fountains,
the perfume of flowers, and the varied witchery of
music. At such seasons the chords of feeling are
lightly touched, as if fanned by the wings of some
passing seraph, and they vibrate only to what is calm
and holy. Selfishness, prejudice, and passion, have no
entrance there; and man is, for a while, what God
designed him, a rich-toned instrument thrilled by the
slightest influence of heaven. This capacity for refined
pleasure exists, more or less, in every mind,not like
the Apollos and Dianas, which Aristotle supposed to be
concealed in the unhewn marble, waiting for art to
fashion them; but like the music of the winds, waked
by the faintest breath into an existence as delicious as it
is fleeting. But though all may worship at the shrine of
nature, it is not given to every one to enter the holy of
holies and withdraw the veil. Such souls as Lucretia's
alone can feel the full force of its softening and
mysterious
power. Her mind, vigorous as an eagle's wing,
and rapid as the streams of Chili, had been early left to
her own guidance. Under such circumstances,
imagination
had become her favourite region; but the glowing
climate that brought the weeds to rank luxuriance,
did not scorch the beauty of the flowers. She was wont
to examine every thing in the illusive kaleidoscope of
fancy, which forms broken glass and tinselled fragments
into as beautiful and regular combinations as polished
diamonds and pearls bedded in gold. Had nature only
been seen under this bright delusion, it would have
been well. It was no harm that the mighty cavalcade
of worlds, wheeling through the desert realms of space;
the hills in their broad and mellow sunshine; the rivers
laughing and leaping in their joyous course; and the
western sky warmly blushing at the bright glance of her
departing lover, should speak to her a language deeper
than poetry; but at that susceptible age, when the
affections are fully developed while the judgment
remains
in embryo, more dangerous objects are often
invested with the rainbow-robe of romance. In our
maturer years we laugh at the eager hopes and intense
fears of youthful love; but ridicule cannot disarm the
mischievous power, and intellect frequently struggles in
chains which it cannot burst. To search out all the
involutions of a woman's heart,to describe all its
fluctuations from embarrassed consciousness, to
friendship
apparently careless, or tenderness poorly disguised,
would be more difficult than to trace the intrigues of
statesmen, or the rise and fall of empires; and were
the task well performed, it would make a very silly
appearance in print. Suffice it, therefore, to say, that
the burthen was sufficiently heavy to the foolish heart
which carried it; and that Lucretia joined the evening
party with no small portion of sadness. Grace, likewise,
came with wounded delicacy and conflicting feelings.
Not that her better disciplined mind yielded to the
infatuation
which held such undivided sway over her
impetuous
friend; but her shrinking modesty was alarmed
lest others should suppose it so.
Somerville had read the Rape of the Lock to
her and Lucretia, and had afterwards presented her
with the elegant little volume. All the passages he
admired
were marked with a pencil, his observations
written
in the margin, and the book carefully placed in a
small ebony writing desk, to which her brother alone
had access. Henry had most unfortunately left the
drawer open when his friend came to make
arrangements
for their aquatic excursion. He discovered all,
before Grace entered,and the liquid radiance for
which his eye was remarkable, expressed unrestrained
tenderness and exultation.
Pride, delicacy, feelings as yet without a name, in
short, every thing that could create a tempest in
woman's
heart, was at once active. Face, neck, and
hands were covered with blushes,but her reception
8 *
was formal even to coldness; and in a few moments
she retired to her own room. There she succeeded in
believing that respect for Somerville's talents had alone
influenced her conduct; and her only fear was, that he
would not be quite so sure of it as herself. The novice
reasoned well, and resolved well;nevertheless the
blind guest had gained admittance, unbidden and
unknown
,
with a wedding-garment stainless as the drifted
snow.
To convince Somerville that she really valued him
only as her brother's friend, Grace resolved to treat him
with marked indifference. Accordingly, when the boat
was drawn up to the wharf, she passed him, and gave
her hand to Doctor Willard. For an instant a deep
frown settled on the brow of the young Englishman,
but it immediately passed away; and giving his hand
to Lucretia, he sprang into the boat, and seated himself
by her side. Henry Osborne, ever mindful of those
ladies whose claims were the least, offered his services
to Miss Sandford; and Doctor Byles came after, saying
aloud,
The king himself hath followed her,
When she has walked before.
There was an abundance of mirth, whether heartfelt
or not. Miss Sandford was in good humour with
herself
and all the world (Doctor Byles always excepted);
and having a good stock of sense, and a talent at
repartee
,
she by no means diminished the pleasure of the
party: as for Doctor Byles, the fountain of his wit was
never known to be dry, though sage advice and dignified
admonition were frequently mingled with its playful
brilliancy or pungent sarcasm: Henry Osborne
preserved
his usual calm, unostentatious, but perfectly
delightful
manner: Doctor Willard, enthusiastic, and
easily
excited, made no attempt to conceal the happiness
which Miss Osborne's unwonted kindness inspired:
Somerville talked with unusual volubility, and surpassed
even his own accustomed gallantry: Grace with
difficulty
forced back her tears, yet she appeared
uncommonly
cheerful;while the flushed cheek, the
sparkling eye, and the unconscious deference of all
Lucretia's looks and actions, betrayed the subtle power
that produced them. The helms-man completed the
group; and to have judged by his antiquated dress, his
grey hairs, his closely fitted cap, his sonorous voice, and
his coarse but strongly marked features, one would
have supposed that Brewster or Standish was guiding
his rude skiff in the unfrequented bay of Plymouth.
As they passed the gay young group of grassy
islands
,
which decorate our beautiful harbour, Lucretia
observed, How very lovely these little spots appear,
where the moon gleams through the dense shade, and
tinges the water with its brightness.
It is like a smile on the face when the heart is cold
and breaking, said Grace.
A metaphor from the lips of Grace Osborne, as I
live, exclaimed Lucretia.
You know what is the boon inspirer of poetry,
rejoined
Somerville, looking very archly at Miss Osborne.
He was thinking of Doctor Willard when he spoke;
but Grace, with a readiness that consciousness could
alone have produced, saw nothing but vanity and
rudeness
in the insinuation.
An angry suffusion passed over her pale brow, and
she hastily turned to talk with the young physician. In
the evening light her confusion passed unnoticed by
Lucretia
,
who continued all exhilaration and romance.
She pointed out the tangled constellation of Berenice,
the brilliant beauty of Altair, and the royal circle of the
Corona Borealis. Then she talked of the graceful
gayety of Chaucer, the melodious versification of Pope,
and the witching simplicity of Goldsmith.
Her want of beauty was forgotten in her unaffected
eloquence; and Somerville looked at her with unfeigned
admiration, as he said, What a pity you had not lived
in the days of chivalry, Miss Fitzherbert. How many
lances would have been lowered before the majesty
ofmind.
I think Miss Fitzherbert will prefer what she will be
sure to receive at the present day, said Henry Osborne.
I mean the homage due to a rational being,that
homage which mind exacts from the intellectual, and
genuine goodness of heart from those who know how to
value it.
A very wise lecture, and very well delivered, Mr.
Osborne, replied Somerville, bowing towards him with
a very comic expression; but, after all, I only wish I
were a constellation, that I might be described with such
delightful enthusiasm.
You always are, when in the presence of ladies,
rejoined Doctor Willard.
Then he must be the Lyre, said Doctor Byles.
Captain Somerville, said the aged steersman,
I trust you will have grace given you
If I guess aright, you could not have wished a thing
more to his mind, interrupted the witty clergyman.
Miss Osborne blushed deeply, and the smile on
Lucretia's
face was stiff and unnatural.
The pilot continued, I trust you will have grace
enough, before you die, to relish the savoury discourses
of wisdom rather than the light conversation that
appertaineth
to this world.
An excellent, though heretical writer hath told us,
observed Doctor Byles, that piety is like certain lamps
of old, which maintained their light for ages under
ground, but as soon as they took air expired. It is a
doctrine that the
New
Lights forget, my friend, though
it seems the
old
lights acted it out, generation after
generation.
If we are to keep our religion locked up from others,
what do you make of the command, `Let your light so
shine before men?'  asked the pilot.
If I read Scripture aright, that is the light of good
works, was the reply.
Very true, rejoined the old man; and therefore
we should strive to attain to perfect holiness.
Perfect holiness! exclaimed the clergyman.
You might as well talk of such a coin as a pound
sterling, or a French livre.
I don't understand what you mean touching the
comparison, answered the steersman; but I will
never sell my reason to any man, because he happens
to be more
larnt
than I am.
If you should set it up at auction, it would be a
poor pennyworth to him that bought it, observed the
reverend doctor. However you are made for your
place, and I for mine. Some must think, and some
must labour; some must rule, and some must be ruled.
For instance, young men, Governors Bernard and
Hutchinson are born to command, and you are born
to obey.
Then I shall fail in answering the end for which I
was made, rejoined Doctor Willard. What difference
is between the duke and I? No more than between two
bricks, all made of one clay; only it may be one is
placed on the top of a turret, the other in the bottom
of a well, by mere chance. If I were placed as high
as the duke, I should stick as fast, make as fair a show,
and bear out weather equally.
Oh dear, exclaimed Doctor Byles, I am in a
sad predicament, between new lights and new fires.
One nailing heresy with a text, and the other
sanctioning
treason with the odd ends of a play.
I tell you what, Doctor Byles, said the pilot,
some folks do say you are a good man; and them
who know you, tell that you have more religion than
you seem to have. If so be this be true, you can't in
earnest deny that the New Lights and the Quakers are
the only people that have `put off the old man.'
I don't know how far they have put off the old
man, rejoined the minister; but of one thing I am
certain,they keep his deeds. Since New
Lights
are
so numerous, it is desirable we should have more new
livers;
and as for the Quakers, `they come to the
gospel not as law, but as a market, cheapen what they
like best, and leave the rest for other customers.'
The book where you found that, likewise tells you,
that `some people think their zeal lukewarm unless it
reduce their charity to ashes,'  retorted Miss Sandford.
`One man among a thousand have I found; but a
woman among all those have I not found,' complains
Solomon; and he complains with reason, said Doctor
Byles. What have you to do with subjects above
your understanding, Madam Sandford?
Above my understanding! echoed the offended
maiden; I can tell you I began the controversy with
zeal, and stuck to it with perseverance.
Aye, no doubt you stuck like a fly in a glue-pot,
retorted the Doctor. Forward you could not stir, by
reason of weakness; and the subject matter was too
thick for you to dive into.
Heard ever any body the like of that? said Miss
Sandford. There is no use in talking with you, Doctor
Byles; but tell me in earnest, what can you prove
against the Quakers?
I know the secret of your taking up in their defence,
answered the Doctor. There was a friend Isaac, or a
friend Jacob, that once spoke soft words to thee, and
told thee that thy voice was more pleasant to him than
the sound of rivulets,yea, than the voice of spring;
and you never could be grateful enough to him for the
unexampled favour.
True, there was
Well, I don't want to hear the story. Tell it to
those who believe in love and ghosts. What do I know
of the Quakers! Haven't I attended their meetings?
I once heard a wise thing there. After having sat a
long time and said nothing, one was moved to speak
from Scripture; and he rose up, and said, `Oh ye
fools! when will you be wise?' and down he sat again;
and
sat
it was in Latin, as well as English. At another
meeting, I heard nine women speak; and all the sense
could have been packed in a robbin's egg. One of
their wise ones took for his text, `Art thou better than
populous No.' Every body knows that No means
Egyptian Alexandria; but his inward light taught him
that No was the eighth preacher of righteousness, and
he was called populous, because the whole world was in
his ark. Another said he was sent on a long journey by
the spirit, and when he returned, he told that the man
was not at home. `Thou fool,' said his wife, `dost
thou suppose the Lord would send thee to a man who
was not at home?' Another came to me, and would
fain inquire for Mr. Churchman; but the name being
profane in his eyes, he asked for Mr. Steeplehouseman.
You seem to be fighting shadows, said Somerville,
since there are no Quakers here.
Only the ghost of Miss Sanford's only lover,
answered
the Doctor.
I could set you right in that particular, if I had a
mind, said Miss Sandford.
Nobody ever supposed you had a mind, retorted
Doctor Byles. However, I never knew an old
woman
that was not beautiful when she was young; I
never
knew a woman that could not have been married if
she wished it; and I certainly never knew one but that
wished it, if she could.
But, concerning the Quakers, observed Henry
Osborne,since there is so little of the genuine spirit
of religion in the world, is it worth while to throw any
away, because we find it diluted?
No man would be more unwilling to wound a really
tender conscience, than myself, returned the
clergyman
;
but when I see these foolish and blind guides
pretending to lead mankind, I lose all patience. But
come, my friend, said he, turning to the boatman, I
am willing to join in a psalm with you, though I did
hear one of your New Light preachers read: `He
rode into Jerusalem on the
soal
of an ass;' from which
he no doubt drew the certain conclusion that he had a
soul. But come let us sing a few verses; it will sound
well on the water.
You are a master hand for a minister, observed the
pilot; but folks do say you are better than you seem.
Then, taking a psalm book from his pocket, he began,
Let us sing a psalm of David.
No, no, said the Doctor, displaying a piece of
writing,Let us sing a song ofMather Byles
The piece was well written, and those who knew his
character, did not doubt that the warm devotion it
expressed
was perfectly sincere; still, the scene was
irresistibly
9
ludicrous, even to the sober-minded Henry
Osborne. A smile went round when he first announced
his own production; and it could not but increase as he
proceeded,for, at the end of every verse, he patiently
waited for his companion, who, with prolonged cadence
and nasal twang, brought up the demisemiquavers that
lingered most lamentably in the rear. The gayety of
the young people would have met with severe rebuke,
but just as the hymn was finished, Fort William, with
the red cross flag streaming from its summit, was seen
reflected in the unbroken surface of the water; and
scarcely had the oar ruffled its undisturbed beauty,
when a group on shore arrested their attention.
The stamped paper has arrived, exclaimed Henry
Osborne.
And the infernal cargo is to be lodged at the castle,
said Doctor Willard, springing on his feet.
I know that the paper has not yet arrived, replied
Somerville.
And I will add my testimony to the same effect, if
the word of a tory can be believed, said Doctor Byles.
No one doubts Doctor Byles, when he condescends
to speak in earnest, answered Henry Osborne; but I
acknowledge I have great curiosity to know what those
people are collected for.
Let us go on shore, said Somerville. If the
ladies
have any fear, I can order the guard out, in the
name of my uncle.
The ladies would not acknowledge any fear, and the
proposal was readily accepted. Henry Osborne turned
to give his hand to Lucretia,but Somerville had
already
offered his services. Grace, too, unconsciously
glanced that way, before she took the proffered arm of
Doctor Willard, but suddenly retreated, when she met
the penetrating dark eye of the young officer. At a
convenient distance they paused, and watched the
motions
of the party they wished to reconnoitre. Six men,
with bibles fastened on their necks by silken cords, stood
around a large hole, from which four others were trying
to raise something, by means of large iron levers. In
the midst of them stood Mr. Townsend, with his cap
pushed far back, and his spectacles on, examining the
rising treasure with intense earnestness.
There is money in the case, whispered Doctor
Byles; else he of the clenched fist would not be
here.
Something seemed to sink instantly; and the
crow-bars
fell heavily upon the sand.
Confound the voice that spoke, exclaimed the
miser
.
A week's labour is lost, and twenty thousand
crowns, and twelve ingots of gold.
How do you know the value of treasure you never
examined? asked Somerville.
That would be easier to tell, than why you come
here at midnight, to meddle with a poor old man, trying
to gain an honest penny to buy his bread, said he;
and he looked at the sand which covered the lost chest,
till he sobbed with all the impotence of childish dotage.
Step a little nearer, if it pleases you, Miss
Fitzherbert
,
said Somerville.
The old man turned pale. Is there a Fitzherbert
here, muttered he; no wonder that
Strike the bar down, and ascertain its depth,
interrupted Somerville, without regarding what he said.
Young man, said Mr. Townsend, your services
an't asked. If there is money, it is of my finding.
It belongs to the crown, of course, said the
Englishman
,
if no owner is proved.
Before the old man could reply, the bar was thrust
forcibly into the sand; but no metal echoed to the blow.
There never was a chest here, said one.
We have been prying up a good-for-nothing rock,
observed another.
But where, in the devil's name, is the rock?
asked a third.
As he spoke, a struggling was seen in the sand, and
a deep, low groan was heard. The ladies uttered a cry
of horror; the miser clasped his skeleton hands; and
the eyes of all present seemed starting from their
sockets. Again the mournful sound was heard, as if
from the very centre of the earth; and no longer
attempting
to conceal their fear, the ring suddenly broke
up, and every individual departed. There was indeed
something terrific in the scene. The loneliness of the
hour, the gaunt figure of the miser, the mysterious silence,
that dismal and inexplicable groan, and that
unaccountble
struggle in the sand, all conspired to produce a
dreadful effect upon their highly excited minds.
However
fear and wonder gradually subsided. Doctor Byles
and the pilot joined in expressing their abhorrence of
such profane use of the Bible, Miss Sandford dwelt
long on her favourite theme of modern degeneracy, and
the conversation at length became as general and as
lively as before. Lucretia sought her pillow with a head
full of cheerful visions; Miss Sandford related the
adventure
to Governor Hutchinson, and when she retired
to rest, she drew the coverlet over her face, quick as
thought, lest the growling spirit should appear at her
bed-side; and as Grace extinguished her light, she
gently wiped away a tear, after vainly attempting to
account for the capriciousness of Somerville.
9*
CHAP. IX.
He would have you believe
That a mouse, yoked to a pea-pod, may draw
His goods about the world.
The Wits
.
While
the current of domestic happiness was gliding
along thus smoothly, the tide of public indignation was
rising higher and higher. The evening after the one
we have just described, the cargo of paper arrived,
bearing the stamp, which Doctor Warren styled the
accursed seal of American slavery. The
Lieutenant-Governor
,
fearing the tremendous excitement that was
every where ready to burst forth, ordered the vessel to
unload at Fort William, and the hateful freight to be
guarded with the whole force of the garrison. The
avarice which grasped at so many and such incongruous
offices, the support he was known to give to the impolitic
system of taxation, and the suspicion that he would
attempt
to force the distribution of stamps, rendered him
an object of uncommon detestation. He seldom
appeared
in the street without receiving some open insult;
and there is no name connected with those times, handed
down to us with so much bitterness. Nor did that respect
for the clergy, which has always characterized New
England, prevent frequent rudeness to Doctor Byles.
His aristocratic manners, his attachment to the crown,
and his friendship for the Chief Justice, all combined
to render him odious to the populace. Young and old,
wise and simple, thoughtless and considerate, all took a
deep interest in the aspect of the times; and though no
politician could foresee one half of the important
consequences
which were to spring from that eventful crisis,
yet even then, there was a fearful looking forward in
the minds of many. Those whose keen perceptions
enabled them to appreciate the vast importance of one
single step, deliberated with cautious wisdom, and
resolved
with daring intrepidity; while those those who
were guided by them, employed themselves in ten
thousand petty stratagems, to thwart and vex their
oppressors. Mr. Townsend was well known to be a
tory in his predilections, though, like the big-headed
boy at Tatawa, he never took an active part; and the
young whigs, willing to tantalize a man who could weep
over the loss of a penny in real betterness of spirit,
resolved
to carry into execution a plan, which had more
of frolic than malice in its design.
It was a tremendously stormy night, when, after a
long and earnest conversation with Mr. Wilson, who had
lately been his frequent guest, the old man retired to his
miserable bed, totally unaware of the mischief in
store for him. The rain poured in torrents; the
darkness
was almost tangible in its density; and the
lightning
flashed across the sky, as if the fallen spirits were
brandishing their flaming swords in defiance of that
heaven from which they had been expelled forever.
The winds roared, and the thunders rolled and crashed,
as if the chariots of Gabriel were rushing on to the
combat
,
and his trumpets hurling back the challenge. Every
peal knocked hard at the heart of that selfish old man;
and unable to compose himself, he arose and crept
timidly into the chamber of his guest. Mr. Wilson,
more inured to danger, thought only of a comfortable
sleep, and had just succeeded in removing his bed to a
corner which secured him from the drenching rain.
The terrors of the poor wretch subsided in the presence
of his fearless companion, and with drowzy
indistinctness
,
he was just saying, Noah, and all them
criters
in
the ark, must have had a dreadful time o'nt, if it poured
worse than it does to-night; and what a heap of
provender
they must have devoured in forty dayswhen
he was alarmed by loud and repeated knocks at the
street door. Wondering for what purpose any one
could visit that unfrequented house on such a merciless
night, Mr. Wilson hastily arranged his dress, and obeyed
the summons.
Is this Mr. Townsend's house? inquired the
stranger
It is, sir.
Is he living?
He is, sir.
I am glad of it; I was afraid I should arrive too
late, replied the physician.
Wilson! Wilson! cried the old man, who had
groped his way to the head of the stairs. Who is
there? are robbers breaking in? boltbolt the door!
and take my gun that's at the foot of the stairs. Don't
stand in the wind with your candle.There, it is blown
out now. Light it quick! light it quick.
The light was hastily struck; but before Mr. Wilson
could assure the miser that the gentleman was well
known to him, he was startled by a second knock.
There is another one, exclaimed the old man.
Do get a light quick, and see to my gun.
Suspicions were again quieted by recognising the
second intruder as Governor Hutchinson.
Gentlemen, may I ask what drove you out on such
a night? inquired Wilson.
Why, Mr. Townsend's dangerous sickness to be
sure, answered both at once; but do make a fire
we are perishing with wet and cold.
Mr. Wilson brought forward some wood; but before
he could kindle it, Mr. Townsend was again calling him
in the feeble tones of a cracked voice trembling with
fear.
Go to your friend, said the physician. His
sickness probably deranges him.
Am I dreaming, or am I not? thought Wilson, as
he listened to the last observation.
After a long effort, he succeeded in convincing Mr.
Townsend that he knew the gentlemen below, and that
it was perfectly safe for him to come down. Thus
encouraged
,
the old man ventured into the room; but all
thoughts of robbers vanished from his mind, the moment
he saw three sticks of wood cheerfully blazing in his
fireplace.
I have told you a hundred times, Wilson, that I
never
burn more than one stick at a time, said he, as he
demolished the first hospitable fire that had been seen
there for years.
We are surprised to find you able to leave your
chamber, Mr. Townsend, said Doctor Ruggles.
I don't know what right you had to expect
otherwise
,
rejoined he, looking round upon them with a
vacant
stare, and then stooping to feel if the lock of his
chest was perfectly secure.
The two gentlemen cast a look of surprise at each
other, and the Lieutenant Governor said, Has he been
long deranged?
There is more knocking, Wilson. Give me my gun.
Hand it quick! quick! exclaimed the terrified wretch.
The gun was speedily handed, but before Wilson
could open the door, Doctor Byles entered. Hastily
shaking the rain from his hat, he inquired, Is he living,
sir?
Beginning to comprehend the joke, Mr. Wilson burst
into a loud laugh, as he said, He is alive and well, sir.
Another look of wonder passed between the gentlemen,
as they bowed to Doctor Byles, and made room for him
before the fire.
The trembling old miser had ensconced himself in a
corner of the room, with one foot on his money chest,
and his gun braced firmly on his shoulder, as if resolved
to fight for his treasure to the last moment of his life.
Did you say Mr. Townsend was really well, sir?
asked Dr. Byles.
I did, sir; and now will you tell me how you were
all brought here to night?
I was called up at midnight, and told that Mr.
Townsend
was in great distress of mind, and needed my aid
to set the joints of a broken spirit.
And I, said Governor Hutchinson, was summoned
to attend his death-bed, if I wished to hear some very
important communications.
My visit is of course explained, said the
physician
.
Some one has made this world of mischief for
a joke.
It is all a trick, do you see, said Townsend,
venturing
forward; and I trust you are not going to ask a
copper, seeing I never sent for you.
It is a hard case for doctor or patient to ride from
Boston to Roxbury such a confounded stormy night,
said the physician. However I will be content, if
you will give us shelter until morning.
Yes, we must all remain to-night, said Doctor
Byles, and our horses must not stand in that open
shed.
This suggestion was answered by a deep groan from
the miser. Oh, dear! said he, it is enough to cost
a man a fortune to live in such troublesome times.
Without noticing his murmurs, Wilson procured a
lanthorn, and placed the horses in as comfortable a
situation
as the dilapidated state of the barn would admit.
Oh, I can't afford it. This will be the ruin of me;
and to have that candle burning in the lanthorn too.
Oh, it will ruin me. There is no use in having a light
to talk by, said Mr. Townsend, when his companion
returned.
Without interrupting him, Wilson, with blunt
hospitality
,
apologized for the state of the house, and offered
whatever it contained for their refreshment.
The offer was accepted; and, notwithstanding the
old gentleman's contrary orders, such food as the house
afforded, was soon arranged before them.
The remains of a miserable soup were placed on the
table in a small earthern pan; a pitcher of water on
one corner; a few dried crusts of bread on the other;
three wooden plates, and a few broken knives and forks,
composed the whole apparatus for their frugal meal.
For a while the miser sat muttering between his teeth,
that he wished it might bode good, having three men
come in one night to tell him he was dying. He had
heard his mother tell about folks being warned of their
end; but when he saw the keen appetites, before
which his worldly goods were fast disappearing, he
sobbed
aloud.
Governor Hutchinson, almost forgetting his vexation
in the amusement of the scene, promised their bill of
fare should be paid the ensuing day. N w have you
not a little brandy to wash down this excellent supper?
added he.
No, I don't keep such things; but that soup is nice
and warming.
There is not enough of it to warm two ounces of
blood, rejoined the physician. You look as if you
needed stimulus yourself. Are you sure you are not
consumptive, Mr. Townsend?
He looks at the food we eat, as if he thought us
fearfully
consumptive
, said Doctor Byles.
The miser stared at his remark, and replied, Why
the truth is, I have been
een jest
sick these many years.
It seems you are
in jest
sick to-night; and that we
are
in jest
fools, observed Doctor Byles. However,
I believe I understand the nature of this mischievous
frolic. What are your politics, Mr. Townsend?
The miser looked around the company, and unable
to determine what answer would eventually be the
safest, he hesitatingly replied, I trust my heart is on
the right side.
If I thought it was, I would send you to a surgeon
as a curiosity, rejoined Doctor Byles. In good
truth, you look as if you had escaped from the sexton.
Yes, said Hutchinson, you are exceedingly thin;
and since there are so many witnesses present, had you
not better settle your affairs? It is well to have a will
at any rate.
So women and whigs think, replied Doctor Byles;
and the latter have had their will, at any rate, in
sending
us here to-night.
Have you done aught to offend the rebels? asked
Hutchinson.
I have already told you that I have fifteen posts,
he replied; but as for politics, I never meddle with
them. I do not understand them; and they do, every
mother's son of them. I see plainly how it will end,
they will finally do as the Quakers and New Lights say
they have doneput off the old man.
Many would rejoice to take the treasure from their
hands, said Hutchinson; but I think your people
would soon be glad to send a writ of trover in search of
talents, learning, and goodness.
Doctor Byles bowed low, and said, Since the storm
continues too furious for us to return home, had we not
10
better bottle off a little sleep against the exigencies of
the morrow?
No one dissented,and Wilson, with more kindness
than his growling manner indicated, prepared lodgings
as comfortable as the crazy situation of the building
would admit. After showing the guests to their
respective
rooms, he returned to his miserable companion.
The old man burst into tears, and exclaimed, Oh
Wilson, they'll ruin me; four sticks of wood are burnt
out; one candle is gone, and you've lit another;
to-morrow's
dinner is devoured; and you have broke the
pitcher that I have
drinked
out of more than twenty
years. Oh dear, added he, with a deep groan, them
horses are dreadful ravenous beasts. I never had such
a costly night before. No less than two crowns are
sunk this minute.
I wish as many mitres had sunk with them, said
his surly companion. Many a shilling has the king
taken out of my pocket, and never a penny did I receive
from him. But be done grumbling, old manI'm tired
of it. One word whispered to Hutchinson, you know,
would lay you on a bed of coals.
The miser grasped his arm with a most beseeching
look, just as a lumbering vehicle rattled to the door,
and a loud knock announced another arrival. A tall,
robust man, with a fear-nought coat buttoned up to his
throat, and his cocked-hat unlooped to defend him from
the tempest, impatiently inquired whether Mr. Townsend
was ready to start for Providence.
I never thought of going there, replied the old
man, stepping up to him. The stranger actually started
back; and indeed the long flannel gown, the high, red
night-cap, surmounted by an enormous tassel, the sharp,
death-like visage, and the gun, which he held tight in
his bony hand, made him seem more like one of Pluto's
stray ghosts than any human figure.
I was told to come here at two o'clock, said he,
to carry you to Providence on business that nothing in
the earth, oru nder it, must hinder.
Was it not some other Mr. Townsend? asked
Wilson.
Dn you! said the passionate man, Who does
not know Townsend the miser. I swear I'll be paid
for my trouble.
I tell you, replied the old man, I won't pay a
single stiver; for I never asked you to come.
The irritated man poured forth a volley of oaths,
which Wilson at length stopped by offering him a
handful
of money, and telling him that the whigs had already
sent three influential tories on errands equally fruitless.
If that is the case, said Jehu, lowering his tone,
I will be satisfied with a moderate compensation. I
am in king George's service; and I must take some of
his kicks for the sake of his coppers.
The crack of the whip, and the shrill whistle, soon
proclaimed his departure.
Come, 'Squire Skin-flint, said Wilson, you must
pay me your stage-fare, before you go to bed.
How can you say so? responded the covetous
wretch. You will kill me, Wilson. I shall never see
the sun rise at this rate.
That is what I should call giving the devil his due,
replied the ruffian. Open your purse.
The old man hesitated; Will you promise never to
speak of the bank notes? Was that in the bargain?
said he.
Do you think I will let go your purse-strings, now I
have hold of them? replied Wilson, with a sneer.
Besides, my oaths are brittle things; I have broken.
With a voice suddenly subdued by powerful emotion, he
added, Some have I broken, for which every farthing
of your immense wealth could not atone. He leaned
his head on his hand, and the old gentleman crept
towards
the stairs as cautiously as one that fears to wake
a sleeping tiger. Your money! thundered Wilson,
seizing his arm, and looking on him with terrible,
snakelike
power. The old man drew out a greasy purse,
but seemed reluctant to open it. Hutchinson sleeps
aboveand I have a tongue! said his tormentor.
The required money was instantly poured upon the
table, and the old man hobbled up stairs, ever and anon
saying, That man will be the ruin of me, and then
sobbing in the bitterness of his heart.
CHAP. X.
She's beautiful; and therefore to be woo'd:
She's a woman; therefore to be won.
Henry VI
.
On
the second day after this adventure, Mr. Wilson
departed from Boston, in order to obtain an interview
with Edward Percival, and ascertain the destiny of his
daughter. Aware to how much danger she would be
exposed, if she came forth into the world wealthy and
inexperienced, beautiful and unguarded, he felt
exceedingly
anxious to give her into the protection of a young
man whom he knew to be so entirely estimable as the
one we have mentioned; at the same time he was
painfully
conscious of the unfavourable impression his own
notorious character must produce; and, in order to
remove
,
as far as possible, this obstacle to the
respectability
of his child, he resolved to arrange his dress,
equipage, and manners with the most studious care. It
was indeed a striking proof how much influence the
affections have over the most reckless and depraved,
that this man, so unfeeling and unprincipled to all the
world beside, should evince tenderness and even
delicacy
,
where this one beloved object was concerned.
The young man, for whom these preparations were
making, was the son of Mr. Townsend's only sister;
but in every respect unlike his parsimonious relation.
He was generous, to a fault; and was remarkable for a
10 *
keen sense of honour, united with a lordliness of
character
,
that sometimes touched upon the very verge of
tyranny. For his covetous uncle he could not always
restrain his contempt; but he was by no means romantic
enough to despise the wealth he had accumulated, and
he really regarded the desolate old man with compassion
that bordered on kindness.
He had from his earliest infancy been educated in
Canada, and at the time we choose to present him to
our readers, he was mounted on a dapple-gray steed,
traversing the road between Montreal and Quebec,
which, at that early period, was certainly none too
smooth to typify the path of life. It was autumn,and
the earth, as if weary of the vanities of her children,
was rapidly changing her varied and gorgeous drapery
for robes as sad and unadorned as those of the cloister.
The tall and almost leafless trees stood amid black and
mouldering stumps, like giants among the tomb-stones;
the faint-murmuring voice of the St. Lawrence was
heard in the distance; and the winds rustled among the
leaves as if imitating the sound of its waters.
The melancholy that we feel when gazing on natural
scenes in the vigor of young existence, is but pleasure
in a softened form. It has none of the bitterness, none
of that soul-sickening sense of desolation, which visits
us in our riper years, when we have had sad experience
of the jarring interests, the selfish coldness, and the
heartless caprice of the world. A rich imagination, like
the transparent mantle of light, which the Flemish artists
delight to throw around their pictures, gives its own
glowing hues to the dreariness of winter and the sobriety
of autumn, as well as to the freshness of spring and the
verdure of summer; and if the affections are calm and
pure, forests and streams, sky and ocean, sunrise and
twilight, will always bring deep, serene, and holy
associations
.
Under the influence of such feelings, our
young traveller entered Quebec, just as the rays of the
declining sun tinged the windows and spires with a fiery
beam, and fell obliquely on the distant hills in tranquil
radiance. At the sign of St. George and the Dragon,
the horse made a motion to pause; and thus reminded
of the faithful creature's extreme fatigue, he threw the
bridle over his neck, and gave him into the care of
a ragged hostler, who in bad French demanded his
pleasure.
In the same language his hostess gave her brief
salutation of, A clever night to ride, please your
honour.
Percival civilly replied to her courtesy, and gave
orders for supper. The inn was unusually crowded
and noisy; and, willing to escape awhile from the
bustling
scene, he walked out into the city. The loud
ringing of the cathedral bells, summoning the inhabitants
to evening prayer, and the rolling of drums from the
neighbouring garrison, were at variance with the quietude
of his spirit. He turned from the main street, and
rambled along until he reached the banks of the little
river St. Charles, about a mile westward from the town.
He paused before the extensive and venerable-looking
hospital, founded by M. de St. Vallier, the second
bishop of Quebec. The high, steep roof, and the wide
portals, beneath which various images of the saints were
safely ensconced in their respective niches, were
indistinctly
seen in the dimness of twilight; but a rich gush
of sound, from the interior of the building, poured on
the ear, mingling the deep tones of the organ with
woman's sweetest melody.
All that painting and music, pomp and pageantry can
do, to dazzle the imagination and captivate the heart,
has ever been employed by that tremendous hierarchy,
whose roots were in another world, and whose
far-stretching
shadow awed our own. At this time, the
effect was increased by that sense of mystery so
delightful
to the human soul. Ora, ora pro nobis, was
uttered by beings secluded from the world, taking no
part in the busy game of life and separated from all
that awakens the tumult of passion, and the eagerness
of pursuit. How then could fancy paint them otherwise
than lovely, placid, and spotless? Had Percival been
behind the curtain, during these sanctified dramas,
had he ever searched out the indolence, the filth, and
the profligacy, secreted in such retreats,the spell that
bound him would have been broken; but it had been
rivetted by early association, and now rendered peculiarly
delightful by the excited state of his feelings. Resigning
himself entirely to its dominion, he inquired of one who
stood within the door, whether it was possible for him to
gain admittance.
The man held out his hand for money, and having
received a
livre
, answered, Certainly, sir. You must
be a stranger in Quebec, or you would know that there
is to be a procession of white nuns to-night, in honour
of M. de St. Vallier. So saying, he led the way into
the building.
An old priest, exceedingly lazy in his manner, and
monotonous in his tone, was reading mass, to which
most of the audience zealously vociterated a response.
An arch, ornamented with basso relievo figures of the
saints, on one side of the chancel, surmounted a door,
which apparently led to an interior chapel; and beneath
a similar one, on the opposite side, was a grated
window
,
shaded by a large, flowing curtain of black silk.
Behind this provoking screen were the daughters of
earth, whom our traveller supposed to be as beautiful as
angels and as pure.
For some time, a faint response, a slight cough, or a
deep drawn sigh, alone indicated the vicinity of the
seraphic
beings.
At length, however, the mass, with all its thousand
ceremonies, was concluded. There was silence for a
moment, and then was heard one of the low, thrilling
chants of the church of Rome.
There was the noise of light, sandalled feet. The
music died away to a delicious warbling, as faint and
earnest as woman's entreaty;then gradually rising
to a bold, majestic burst of sound,the door on the
opposite
side opened, and the sisterhood entered amid a
glare of light.
That most of them were old and ugly passed
unnoticed
;
for whatever visions an enthusiastical imagination
might have conjured up, were certainly realized by the
figure that preceded the procession.
Her forehead was pale and lofty,her expression
proud, but highly intellectual. A white veil, carelessly
pinned about her brow, fell over her shoulders in
graceful
drapery; and as she glided along, the loose white
robe, that constituted the uniform of her order,
displayed
to the utmost advantage that undulating outline of
beauty, for which the statues of Psyche are so
remarkable
.
A silver crucifix was clasped in her hands, and her
eyes were steadily raised toward heaven; yet there
was something in her general aspect from which one
would have concluded that the fair devotee had never
known the world, rather than that she had left it in
weariness or disgust.
Her eye happened to glance on our young friend, as
she passed near him; and he fancied it rested a
moment
with delighted attention.
The procession moved slowly on in pairs, the
apostles
bearing waxen lights on either side, until the last
white robe was concealed behind an arch at the other
end of the extensive apartment.
The receding sounds of, O sanctissima, O
purissima
,
floated on the air mingled with clouds of
frankincense
;
and the young man pressed his hand to his
forehead, with a bewildered sensation, as if the airy
phantoms of the magic lanthorn had just been flitting
before him.
A notice from the porter that the nuns were now at
the altar performing silent mass, and that the doors were
shortly to be closed, recalled his recollection; and
slipping
money into the hands of his informer, he left the
church, and bent his footsteps towards the sign of St.
George and the Dragon.
The wrangling and discordant sounds of an inn were
never so unwelcome to him; and with peculiar vexation
he heard a loud voice, inquiring of the landlady, Are
you sure that the tall, handsome young man I
mentioned
,
with light brown hair and blue eyes, has been here
to-night?
I tell you yes. In troth, he is not one a woman
would be likely to forget.
Where did he go, when he left here?
That is what I know nothing of. May-be he is a
New England rebel, come to raise the country in arms
against His Majesty;and yet I should not think so. He
spoke better French than the Yankees do.
The inquirer, who was none other than Mr. Wilson,
took a heavy silver watch from his pocket, looked at the
hour, and replaced it with an air of great impatience,
as he said, It is after nine. The trumpets from the
fort have sounded the hour of rest. What can have
become of him?
Perhaps he is one of your moon-struck folks that
gaze on the stars till they forget to eat their supper. So
much the better for those who take their pay whether or
no.
Just at that moment, the subject of their conversation
entered the room.
In a confused manner, Mr. Wilson stammered out,
Mr. Percival, I believe?
I think I have seen you before, Mr. Wilson,
rejoined
the young man, with a look of coldness
bordering
on hauteur.
Pardon my intrusion, sir. I have business of
importance
.
It is very well, replied Percival. Be seated, if
you please. I cannot attend to you, just now; for I
have eaten nothing since I entered Quebec.
He was about to seat himself at the table; but
compelled
himself to say, Have you taken supper, sir?
I did at an early hour; but I must acknowledge
that I am ready for another.
Move to the table, then, if you will.
The invitation, ungracious as it was, was accepted;
and though neither the quality of the food, nor its
cleanliness
,
would have tempted a New England appetite,
the hostess certainly had no reason to conclude that
either of her guests preferred star-gazing to solid food.
With hunger too keen to be fastidious, the travellers
devoured a hearty meal, with no other interruption than
an occasional bow from Mr. Wilson, as he raised the
mug of cider to his lips.
When the landlady had retired, and closed the door
after her, the young gentleman inquired what important
business had procured him this unexpected visit.
You have an uncle in Boston, said Wilson, who
seemed to be strangely awed by the gentleman-like
manner of his auditor.
Percival bowed to this unimportant remark, and his
companion continued, You expect considerable
property
from him, I presume?
I have always treated Mr. Townsend with proper
attention; and I am his only relation; but these things
are very uncertain, replied Percival.
Well, sir, I have come to inform you upon what
grounds the whole of his large property may be insured
to you.
You, sir! exclaimed Percival, with an expression
of contempt so strong and undisguised, that Wilson felt
his blood boil in his veins, as he answered, Yes, I, sir.
Your uncle has committed crimes for which the rigid
laws of England would take his life; and the evidence
of them is in my hands. To bring the matter to a
point at once, I have a daughter. If you will marry
her, the fortune is yours;if not, it all descends to her,
with the exception of a trifling legacy. The will is
made and attested; and should he presume to alter it,
his life must pay the forfeit.
Percival eyed him for a moment with extreme scorn,
and asked, What is the meaning of this artifice, sir?
It is no trick, replied Wilson; and he handed him
a letter from Mr. Townsend, and another from the
lawyer
who had written the will.
The young gentleman to whom they were addressed,
had too much pride to think of such a father-in-law with
11
any thing like complacency. Besides, he had indulged
very romantic ideas concerning love; and he was by no
means pleased with the business air of this transaction.
He thought of affection, as some people think of religion,
that it could not be genuine, unless it came upon him at
once with irresistible power; and however apocryphal
his creed might be, the white-robed vision he had that
evening seen, tended not a little to confirm it.
After one or two impatient strides across the room,
he stopped suddenly, and said, A wife is not to be
bought and sold like your southern slaves; nor are my
affections like a garment, to be put on and off as interest
may dictate. My uncle must dispose of his money as
he chooses. I trust to my own energies. Good
evening
,
sir.
Stop, I beg of you, said Wilson earnestly. Do
not decide till you have seen Gertrude. I am a wretch,
and you know it; but she has been kept from all the
pollutions of this tempting world, and has grown up in
the convent of St. Vallier, as pure, as lovely, and as
elegant as the proudest lady in the land.
Is sheis she a novitiate at St. Vallier's? eagerly
inquired Percival.
She is; and how deeply soever I may have plunged
into guilt, nobody can say that I have not been to her all
that I should be. It is impressed upon my mind that I
shall not live long. No matter whether I am a fool for
believing it or not. When I am gone, she will be left
beautiful and wealthy, an easy prey to the sharper or
the sensualist. Your character is all that I wish my
own had been; and my last earthly cares would be
over, if you were her protector.
But, said Percival, crimsoning to the very temples,
even if she is all I hope, she isillegitimate.
Mr. Wilson drew his breath hard, in the agony of his
spirit; after a pause, he replied, I was the husband of
her mother. Sit down, young man, and I will tell you
all; though it is a subject on which I never meant to
speak to mortal man. I was once as proud as you are;
and perhaps with as much reason. The world
prophesied
my success in life, and considered me a
master-spirit
,
born to sway my fellows. With a gentleman and
a scholar I still have some touches of my former spirit;
but I will say no more on that point. In my best days,
I won the heart of a beautiful young creature, the
daughter of a miserable, half-crazed woman in Halifax.
I was aristocratic then,and it was long before I could
bring myself to think of marriage with one so much my
inferior. However, her confiding fondness gained upon
my affections, and I finally made a sort of half
atonement
by a private marriage. He stopped, and his
whole frame shuddered. It must be told, continued
he. Captain Fitzherbert was then in port. He was
too handsome, and too attentive to my young wife.
Gertrude knew it gave me uneasiness; but conscious of
her innocence, and loving to exert her power, she
continued
as gay and as free as ever. Day after day passed
in this manner, till she became a mother. Fitzherbert
dared to reproach me for my ungenerous conduct; and
Gertrude, after having besought me, with tearful eyes,
to make our marriage public, told me that she had no
friend in the world but Fitzherbert. Maddened to
insupportable
jealousy, I....stabbed her. From
different
causes, both were silent for a long time; and the
convulsed features of Wilson alone betrayed his
agitation
.
She was innocent, he added; and here
here, pressing his hand upon his heart, her memory
`biteth like a serpent, and stingeth like an adder.'
After that dreadful deed, I never cared what became of
me. I have been a drunkard, a pirate, and a ruffian;
but a father still.
He wrung Percival's hand with desperate energy, as
he spoke, and the tears started to his eyes. There was
an air of majesty about him, fallen as he was, that found
its way to the young man's heart. When he first spoke
of his crime, Percival could not restrain a loathing
expression
of hatred and horror; but now he turned to
the window to conceal how much he had been affected
by such deep and frenzied remorse.
When the conversation was again resumed, Wilson
said, For a few weeks the infant Gertrude was in the
hands of her grandmother; but I could not trust the
sweet little being, now doubly dear for her murdered
mother's sake, in the care of one so low and vicious.
I therefore gave orders that she should be placed at the
hospital of St. Vallier, and that her grandmother should
never be permitted to see her. I gave money enough
to ensure a punctual obedience to my commands, and
departed for the West Indies, where many a bloody
deck has borne witness to my courage and my sins.
I have seldom seen Gertrude. Of late years, she has
so earnestly entreated to come out into the world, and
I have been so entirely unable to make her situation
respectable, that I have forborne to visit her.
To this frank avowal, Percival replied by reminding
the wretched man that it was never too late to repent
of crime, and to atone for it by a life of usefulness and
piety.
The best thing you can do, said he, is to
purchase
some secluded dwelling, to which you can retire
with your daughter, and there forget every thing but the
duties you owe to God and her.
It cannot be, young man, answered Wilson.
Here on my vitals the vulture will prey forever.
Besides
,
ought one so young and fair, to be thus buried for
a father's guilt?
She will have sufficient wealth to purchase every
luxury, replied he; and no doubt she would think the
freedom of such a situation perfect paradise, compared
with her convent.
Mr. Percival, said the father, taking his hand most
fervently, had I sooner met with one that would have
advised me thus, one whose friendship would have
soothed my tortured soul, I should not have been the
wreck I now am. Alas, how little are the strong in
virtue aware of the cruel temptations and the bitter
misery of a heart willing to return to the paths of
rectitude
,
if the voice of kindness would but give it welcome
and encouragement.
With more respect than he had yet evinced, Percival
11*
exhorted him to convert the property of his daughter
into money as soon as she came into possession of it,
and to retire to some country unacquainted with his
crimes, where he might fulfil the duties of a citizen and
christian.
Young man, exclaimed Wilson, I forced your
uncle to make a will in my favour; but I protest I am
sorry for it, from the bottom of my soul.
If it is the means of reforming one from vice, and
of making another happy, I shall esteem it well
bestowed
.
I can make a fortune for myself, rejoined Percival.
Then you reject the idea of being connected with
such a one as I am?
Percival then frankly told him of the captivating being
he had seen in the procession of White Nuns, and
expressed
his wish to ascertain her character and history.
Full of the belief that the person described was his
beloved
daughter, Wilson the next morning applied to the
Lady Abbess for an interview.
The torment of the never dying worm ceased for
a while, when the fair creature clasped him to her heart,
and exclaimed, Father, dear father.
Well, Gertrude, said he, looking on her with great
affection, I see you have not taken the black veil.
Oh, no. Did you think I ever could?
Then you still wish to go out and look upon the gay
world?
I think, said the young novitiate, with a deep sigh,
that I should come back here more contented, if I
could go away for a few years.
Smiling at casuistry dictated by the heart, her father
answered, I mean that you shall return to New
England
with me, my love.
Gertrude clasped her hands, with an exclamation of
joy.
Her father smiled and left the room. When he
returned
with Mr. Percival, animation was still glowing on
her fine features.
Both blushed deeply, when they were introduced;
for each remembered having seen the other, the
preceding
evening.
Mr. Wilson eagerly watched their countenances, and
saw that all was as he wished. It was the first moment
of pure enjoyment he had known for years; and he felt
then as if he had strength to be all that his unsuspecting
child believed him.
During the general conversation that followed,
guilelessness
of thought and childlike simplicity of manner
completed the conquest, which beauty had begun.
The hours in which novitiates were allowed to
receive
visiters having expired, both bade Gertrude
farewell
,
with a promise to call again the ensuing morning.
The Abbess said that her young favourite was
strangely bewildered during that day. She failed to
respond to the Dominus vobiscum of the priest, and
the hymn which she had daily sung to the Holy Mother
for many years, escaped from her memory.
The interview terminated much as Percival had
hoped, and even expected. Perhaps had he not
believed
the heiress of his uncle and the stately devotee
to be the same, he would not have acquiesced so quietly
in the arrangements of Mr. Wilson. We must admit
that on his way to the convent, he conjectured whether,
in case of a disappointment, he could not prove his
uncle's
will to have been obtained by force, without risking
the life of the poor old man. If Wilson is disposed
to be virtuous, thought he, surely a handsome legacy
is sufficient to give his daughter honourable support, and
to keep him from temptation.
Very different ideas occupied his mind as he returned.
He gazed on the monastery as long as its towering roof
could be discerned. How glad I am, thought he,
that I met her as I did. I could not have been in
love, had I known that it was expected of me.
As for Mr. Wilson, it was the happiest day he had
known since his youth; but when he retired to rest, he
felt a sort of uneasy, reluctant wish to palliate his own
crime,and he could not help murmuring, She does
look cursedly like Fitzherbert.
Necessary business detained the father and lover a
few weeks, which no doubt passed rapidly and
delightfully
enough. Every thing that Percival heard of
Gertrude
from the Abbess and nuns, strengthened the
impressions
he had received.
With many a sigh, and many a bitter tear, the
unsophisticated
girl bade adieu to the sisterhood; (for the
ties of habit are not easily burst asunder; especially
when formed in seclusion, and rivetted by daily
kindness
;)
and though they said they only wept at giving her
up to a sinful world, it was evident they yielded to the
strong current of natural affection.
When the bride and bridegroom stood before the
altar
in the church where they first met, it was said the
priest had never united a lovelier couple. Percival was
somewhat in the Adonis style of beauty,and might
perhaps have been charged with effeminacy, had not a
highly arched nose, and a general loftiness of
expression
,
redeemed him from the imputation.
Gertrude was as stately as the Juno of Titian; and
had the same vivid glow of life, and health, and beauty.
These charms were certainly heightened by
pearl-coloured
damask, and Brussels lace, closely fitted to
her majestic from; but they were by no means her
surest hold upon the affections of her high-minded
husband
.
Accustomed from her earliest youth to an implicit
obedience to a superior, whom she fondly loved, she
had acquired a most charming ductility of character;
and now that she was to be introduced to a world, of
which she was so totally ignorant, she peculiarly felt the
need of some guiding hand. To her husband,
therefore
,
she looked for support and encouragement, with
all the winning deference of woman's gentlest and most
exclusive affection.
CHAP. XI.
O, luve will venture in, where it daur na weel be seen;
O, luve will venture in, where wisdom ance has been.
Burns
.
Leaving
the young Canadians to enjoy the sacred
lowe o' weel placed love, we will return to the quiet
library of the pious Mr. Osborne; the republican
simplicity
of which afforded so striking a contrast to the
splendid apartment of Governor Hutchinson.
On the afternoon of the same day that Wilson
commenced
his journey to Quebec, Grace was seated at her
father's table, busily engaged in painting glass,a
fashionable amusement at that period.
The door gently opened, and the good-natured
countenance
of Lucretia Fitzherbert presented itself to her
view.
Why, Grace, how long it is since I have seen you,
exclaimed her animated friend. For three long days
we have been expecting you. Captain Somerville at
last grew quite angry,so, to please him, I came
to-day
to see what could have offended your ladyship.
Offended! and with you? said Grace, in a
reproachful
tone. I assure you, I have wished to come;
but I have been so very busy
I wonder what has busied you so suddenly,
interrupted
Lucretia. Have you been making linen for
brother Henry? or knitting warm night-caps for papa?
The first, rejoined Grace, smiling; and then all
the leisure moments I have had, I have been practising
on my spinnet, trying to learn those pretty songs that
you
like so well.
Umph, said Lucretia, with the most provoking
significance. You are taking likenesses, too, I see.
What is this you are copying?
It is the head of a young naval officer; Sir
somebody
I
have forgotten whom.
How much it looks like Somerville, said
Lucretia
.
Does it? rejoined Grace, blushing deeply.
Perhaps
it may, a very little.
Captain Somerville is enthusiastic about painting,
said Lucretia. How I do wish I could sketch as well
as you can.
Grace, in her turn, smiled significantly.
I know you laugh because he is always the burden
of my song, observed Lucretia; but really if you
lived in the same house with him, you could not but
admire
,very
much admire, his sparkling intelligence,
his ready wit, and his open gallantry.
And my enthusiastic friend places so much
confidence
in her native good sense, that she is not at all
afraid of admiring him too much, I suppose?
inquired
Grace.
I think nothing about it, rejoined Lucretia. I
am very happy; and that is all I am sure of. As for
the good sense you are pleased to talk of,Minerva's
shield has withstood many a fierce attack; but I
believe
one of Cupid's minikin arrows might shiver it.
Oh, Lucretia, how little need there is of a window
to your heart.
Yours is carefully muffled in a thick screen, dear
Grace; but the flame will shine through.
The tears started to Miss Osborne's eyes, and
forgetting
that her remark would imply a keen reproof to her
thoughtless friend, she said, What have I done, that
you should accuse me of being deficient in the delicacy
which should ever characterize a lady?
Who would think of defending herself from a charge
that has no foundation? rejoined Lucretia, putting her
arms round her neck, with girlish affection.
What is the matter, young ladies? inquired Henry
Osborne, who entered the library at that moment.
Nothing,only I have offended Grace, as I often
do the Graces, answered Lucretia; and so I hav
been trying to atone for it. What news, Henry?
None that will particularly interest such a staunch
little tory as you are.
Nay, I will not be called names, said she, gaily
striking
him with her parasol; unless you can warp your
conscience enough to call me by the old-fashioned name
of angel. In good earnest, what has happened in the
political world?
Accidents similar to those which happen every day,
rejoined Osborne. Merely a few mischievous tricks
upon the tories. Mr. Paxton's horse, after being lost
some days, was found shut up in the Town House,
almost
starved to death; and Doctor Byles, when entering
his house this morning, was assailed by a violent shower
of soot and water.
How did he bear such treatment? asked
Lucretia
.
Just as you would suppose. He made a very low
bow, and said, `My friends, you have entirely
sooted
me.'
I should like to walk there, said Lucretia, smiling;
it is several days since I have seen him.
Grace soon arranged her neat little gipsey hat,
beneath
which her golden ringlets escaped in the most
enchanting
luxuriance; and the shawl was just pinned
about her neck with Quaker simplicity, when
Somerville
entered. You are all for a walk I see, said he,
bowing to the ladies. I have arrived most
fortunately
.
His arm was offered to Grace, and he was not a
little gratified at the slight tremor she betrayed on again
meeting him; nor could she, with all her diffidence,
help being a little vain of her infantile beauty, since it
had so evidently fascinated Somerville.
True, his compliments were less frequent than
formerly
;
for Henry, with the affectionate earnestness of
an auxious brother, had cautioned him against the
flattery
so likely to tarnish the purity and artlessness of her
character. Still, however, his delighted eye
acknowledged
her power, and she was not ignorant of its
meaning.
12
During this walk, it seemed as if he exerted his
uncommon
powers of pleasing, to the very utmost. Now
his broad sail was set in the full, deep stream of
argument
;
and, now, every one was watching the eddies
of his wit, as they sparkled, and broke, and whirled
away.
The rein was held with as graceful a hand, whether
he spurred his majestic war-horse to the battle, pranced
by a lady's side over hill and dale, or appeared on the
parade ground in gala dress, performing its complicated
evolutions with careless dexterity.
The whole company were in high spirits when
Doctor
Byles met them at his door.
Was there ever such an evening? said he, as he
came out to welcome them. It is as light as a cork.
I am glad you have come, my young friends; for Mrs.
Byles and the girls have gone to see a sick neighbour,
and I was just wishing somebody would come and take
a glass with me.
A most unclerical wish, observed Henry Osborne.
Not as much so, as you think, young man, replied
the clergyman, displaying a fine brass telescope, and
motioning them to follow him up stairs.
This is the glass I offer my friends, continued he,
fastening one end in the window-shutter, and placing the
other in Somerville's hand.
I call this chamber my observatory; for, stationed
here with my telescope, I can observe-a-tory all over
Boston.
I wish the search was as seldom rewarded as that
of Diogenes with his lanthron, answered Henry.
No doubt; but `the prayer of the wicked availeth
not,'  replied Doctor Byles.
How extremely beautiful! interrupted Somerville,
placing the telescope in Mr. Osborne's hand. The
bay of Naples hardly surpasses this.
Indeed, beneath the rich gush of autumnal twilight,
the scene was indescribably enchanting.
The broad, blue harbour, like the ocean god, reposing
on his own bright throne; the numerous islands, that
seemed like infant Naiads waiting in his presence; the
neighbouring churches, like youthful devotees, pointing
the finger of faith to heaven; the foliage, rich with the
hues of autumn; the herds, quietly grazing on the
adjoining
hills; and all so delightfully mellowed in distance
and sunshine, formed a landscape that Claude would
have delighted to copy.
Each one, in succession, gazed upon it till the strained
vision was wearied. As they laid aside the telescope,
Somerville glanced at Grace, and said, To look
beyond the smoke and din of the town, to a scene so
lovely and placid as that, is welcome to the heart, as it
is to meet unpretending goodness and unaffected beauty
in the midst of this selfish, artificial world.
Here, said Doctor Byles, is something that
precisely
resembles the mind of a whig; for their reflections
are all upside down;and he placed a large concave
mirror before the young ladies.
If the images are inverted, they are increased in
beauty, observed Henry Osborne.
At a distance, I grant ye; but examine closely,
young man, and the defects are glaring enough. My
dear girl, step up, and shake hands with yourself.
The figure of the little sylph seemed to come forth
from the glass, as she advanced toward its focus.
Nobody can say there is not a shadow of grace
about that mirror, said the clergyman.
But you can say there is not a shadow of beauty
now, rejoined Lucretia, as she herself moved to the
glass.
If I did say it, replied Doctor Byles, I would
unite with the learned Bishop of Cloyne, and say, it is
no matterall is mind.
How brilliant you are to-night, exclaimed Lucretia.
Nay, it is you, ladies, who are bright, rejoined he.
When you both came in, lounging on a gentleman's
arm, I could not but think you spark-led.
Your ammunition is never exhausted, said
Somerville
;
one may always be sure of a
corps de reserve
.
There is one of my acquaintance, the famous Samuel
Johnson, to whom I should like to introduce you; but,
with his invincible hatred of puns, it might prove
dangerous
.
Wit is the least of Doctor Byle's qualifications,
said Henry Osborne.
Young man, I am not a woman. My constitution
does not need the gilded pills of flattery, replied the
Doctor.
The suddenness with which he changed from
playfulness
almost frivolous, to dignity bordering on
sternness
,
produced a momentary embarrassment in the whole
company.
Lucretia, who knew him well, was the first to break
silence. It is the way the Doctor sometimes chooses
to cut his best friends, said she.
Doctor Byles looked very angry; and Somerville
perceiving it, answered, The friends of Doctor Byles
are never cut, though often wit-led.
It is contagious, exclaimed Henry Osborne, rising.
Let us depart by all means.
I should never suspect that Mr. Osborne had a
predisposition
to the disease, replied the clergyman, with
his usual dry, sarcastic manner. But come into my
study, Lucretia. I have Goldsmith's celebrated Chinese
Letters; and you say, you have never seen them.
The first object that met their view on the library
table, was a frightful mask, with a lighted candle within
it, surmounted by the Doctor's wig.
It had been placed there by some mischievous boys.
You see the spirit of rebellion penetrates to our very
closets, observed the minister. However, the wig
does but cover what it always has, `a burning and a
shining light.'
After examining the books and some beautiful
philosophical
apparatus, the young people departed, highly
delighted with their visit.
The evening is so pleasant, observed Henry,
that I see no reason why we should not extend our
walk to Roxbury.
12 *
I trust we shall return better pleased than my uncle
did from his nocturnal excursion, said Somerville.
No one cares how much old Townsend is tormented;
but it is really carrying the joke too far, when such men
as Governor Hutchinson and Doctor Byles are harassed
in this way.
When one side carry a joke too far, it must be
expected that the other will return it by such means as
lie in their power, rejoined Osborne.
You must not begin to talk politics, said Lucretia;
for Captain Somerville never speaks all he thinks,
before
you. One would hardly believe he could be the same
man that I sometimes hear talk with uncle Hutchinson.
Somerville looked, as if he did not thank her for thus
lowering him in the estimation of Miss Osborne; and
Henry replied, I think he begins to be a proselyte to
the righteous cause. I have a mind to have him stop
to see John, on purpose to give him a good commentary
on American feeling. He lives the next door to Mr.
Townsend.
The man of whom he spoke, had once been a servant
at his father's; but had, to use his own expression,
laid by a trifle for a wet day, and was now a thriving
New England farmer.
Every thing within their doors indicated industry and
prosperity. The wife, a buxom, sweet-tempered
looking
matron, was supplying four or five white-headed
children with bountiful slices of brown bread; and if she
did not perform the simple office with as much grace as
Werter's Charlotte, it was certainly very delightful to
watch her look of maternal love, as she said, Hearty
souls! it does one good to see you eat. But hush, boys,
hush; here are strangers coming.
The mother drew her cap down over her ears,
and smoothed her checked apron,then, after giving
them a most cordial greeting, she showed the way into
a neatly white-washed room, the floor of which was
profusely sanded, and marked with a variety of fantastic
figures, according to the fashion of the times.
The children in the mean time stationed one to peep
at the door, who would now and then run to report
proceedings
to his laughing companions.
They have over much of a good thing, said the
father. The rogues love liberty. Away with you,
boys!and, waving his hand, he cleared the door in a
moment. An instance of the good old-fashioned
obedience
,
seldom practised in these degenerate days.
I must tell you, continued the farmer, that you
are heartily welcome, Miss Grace, and Mr. Henry, and
Miss Fitzherbert, and the stranger gentleman.
I forgot to mention that he was Captain Somerville,
Governor Hutchinson's nephew, observed Henry.
Perhaps you are from England, then?
I am, replied Somerville.
And may be you will tarry some time in the
Colonies?
That is entirely uncertain, sir.
Well, it is none of my business, surely. It is a
good country that you came from, and a good country
that you have come to. Both the Englands are good;
but I am sometimes
afeard
they will try to patch the old
with the new, till they make the rents worse.
England has no need of patches, my good sir,
rejoined
Somerville.
I doubt that somewhat. They say the young king
has some German notions, which he would be much
better without. Then there is a heavy debt will go
near to break the collar-bone, if it is carried much
longer
;
and them who have the care of it, are, in my
humble opinion, no more fit to set the broken bones of
a nation, than my cows are to climb a ladder.
Which I trust they never will do, said Lucretia,
laughing. Mr. Townsend would doubtless be sadly
grieved to have a blade of his grass devoured by them.
A queer man, that Mr. Townsend, beside being a
tory, answered John Dudley; but he that is with
him is far worse.
Who is it? asked Grace.
He calls himself Harry Wilson; but such men have
a name for every port. I feel scared to look at that
house, when I think of the sin there is between its four
walls. Odds luck, it was a sight to see, and a sound to
hear, the night the whigs sent the tories there on such a
Tom fool's errand. There were wheels rattlingand
knocking at the doors,and laughing, and swearing,
and there were lights glimmering round in corners that
never saw a light before. The old man was sick three
days, to think of the money it cost him. Wilson tells
folks that he holds a whip over his back, and that he
knows how to get the silver out of his grip.
Has this man a family? inquired Lucretia. How
comes he to be so much with Mr. Townsend?
There is but little known about him in these parts,
replied Mrs. Dudley; but a body needs only look in
his eye to see that he is bad enough. Howsomever,
there is One above us, who knows all things, and will
manage them as seemeth good to him.
Mr. Wilson came here t' other day, and told us that
his daughter was coming from Quebec; and he wanted
us to let her have one of our tidy chambers, as he called
them;and when we were at a stand, as it were, on
account of his character, you know, he said that if she
was his daughter, she was a lady, and had had gentle
usage. He said she was going to stay here only a few
weeks; and he seemed so affected like, that I was fain
to let her come. So I have whitened the counterpane,
and put the patch curtains up at the window, and
sanded
the floor of the best chamber.
Poor young creature! said Grace.
She is young, rejoined the matron. The matter
of seventeen, or thereabouts. May be you will come
and see her, young ladies? Her heart will no doubt be
sad in a strange land. Whist, Hancock! will ye not
whist?
What do you call your sick little babe? asked
Lucretia.
It was George, for the king, you know, Miss; but
the stamp act a'nt likely to be taken off, so my good
man would change it to John Hancock.
Miss Fitzherbert smiled, and looked significantly at
Somerville, as she said, You see the spirit of the
land.
That is a fine man, that John Hancock, said the
farmer. He is a true friend to liberty; and though
he is college
larnt
, and though he had more money than
I could reckon, left him a year ago, he is as ready to
stop and say, `How do you do, John Dudley,' as my
own wife would be. Poor, dear little Hancock,
continued
he, taking the child from his mother, and rocking
him gently in his arms, I hope you'll be as good a
man. You must make haste,yes you must,
Hancock
,you
must make haste, and grow strong enough
to be a soldier. With a more sober look, he added,
May be they'll be wanted in this oppressed land,
before
you are able to buckle on a canteen.
Hancock, dear Hancock, whispered Grace, as she
offered him an orange, and kissed the bright red spot on
his sickly cheek.
Oh, yes, Grace can kiss him, now she knows his
rebel name, said the laughing Lucretia.
Almost thou persuadest me to be a rebel, observed
the gallant Englishman.
Henry looked serious and uneasy. He did not like
Scripture quoted with so much irreverence; and he
feared the effects of a kind of gallantry to which his
sister had been so entirely unused.
I believe I must bid you good night, John, said he,
rising.
Surely not, sir, till you have tasted a drop of cider
that I made on my own farm. The king has none
better
,
though I say it that should not say it.
Upon this hint, his wife took a plate and a large silver
can, and left the apartment.
In a few moments, the children in the kitchen were
heard crying, Give me some, mamma, give me some;
and, having supplied their wants, the good-natured
mother re-appeared, with her rosy-cheeked pears and
foaming cider.
It may seem strange for the like of me to have a
silver
mug, said the farmer; but it has more value in it
than the metal tells for. Governor Dudley brought it
over himself; and there has not been many a better
man to drink after.
His ancestor, his can, and his cider having received
abundance of praise, he urged the young people to take
as much fruit as they would, and bade them good night.
The young gentlemen, in terms of unqualified
approbation
talked of the frank hospitality and downright
good sense of their host; and as the farmer closed his
gate after them, he could not refrain from saying,
They are all gentle-folks, every soul of them; and
that is a name that means a good deal to them that
understand
it right.
That's true, my good man, said his wife. That
Captain Somerville has a frank way with him; and
don't show a speck of pride,though he is
Hutchinson's
nephew.
On their way home, Somerville walked with Miss
Osborne; and Lucretia, of course, accepted the
proffered
arm of Mr. Osborne.
Oh, how dangerous may one brief evening prove to
the sliding hearts of the youthful and the guileless; and
how tasteless is every thing in life, compared with the
sparkling cup that young love offers before we know his
name.
Grace returned home with an elasticity of spirit unusual
to her placid nature; and when, after the family devotions
were concluded, she stooped to kiss her venerable
father
,
before she retired to rest, he could not but speak
of the beaming happiness her angelic countenance
expressed
.
Dear Grace, said Henry, passing his arm round
her neck, I have something to say to you; and I will
say it in the presence of our good father.
His sister looked up inquiringly.
You must have suspected how much interest Doctor
Willard takes in you? said he.
I know he is a friend to us all, replied she, with
extreme embarrassment.
Yes, dear sister, he is a friend to us all; and for
your sake, he loves us all. With a brother's frankness,
he has commissioned me to tell you so.
And what does my daughter say to this? asked
her father, in a tone of anxious tenderness.
I feel very, very grateful to Doctor Willard;
but
But what? interrupted her brother. What can a
woman desire in a lover, that is not united in his
character
?
There is virtue, genius, a good family, genteel
manners, personal beauty, and a generous heart, that
has long been most sincerely devoted to you.
He is more than I expectmore than I deserve,
rejoined Grace.
And what shall I tell him? whispered Henry.
Tell him to seek some one who deserves his
affection
,
and can return it.
Are you aware, said her father, in a tone of severe
disappointment, can you be aware what a treasure
you are throwing from you?
I amI am, exclaimed Grace, bursting into tears;
but I cannot love him.
Will you tell me why? asked her brother, in an
insinuating voice.
I have no reason to give, she replied.
Has no one else won your pure heart?
Oh no, indeed; no other one ever sought it.
I know it would never unsought be won, if you were
aware of it, rejoined Henry. But you are very
young, and I fear you will allow `a passing pleasing
tongue,' and the fascination of a polished manner, to
outweigh goodness of heart and dignity of
character
.
Talents and education are of great value,
interrupted
her father; but we must not forget that the
tree of knowledge yields not the same fruit as the free
of life. Fixed religious principles and an amiable
disposition
13
are of more consequence to domestic happiness
than all that wealth, or beauty, or genius can offer. It
was these qualities in your dear mother, that for thirty
years made me the happiest of men. It was these
inestimable
qualities that made you what you are, my
children. As he spoke, the tear that fell upon his
hand, betrayed how dear was the wife that had for
years lain in the silent grave.
With kindness which seemed like cruelty, Henry said,
Some people admire beauty wherever they find it.
Doctor Willard would love you, if you should lose that
fading flower. Other friends may have lofty and
generous
feelings,they may be greatly gifted by nature;
but their worth has not been tried like his. Something
novel in character, or more rare in loveliness, may erase
a transient impression. A meteor may be dazzling, but
we cannot calculate its orbit.
I understand you, said she; but indeed you
wrong me. If I do not love Doctor Willard, I ought
not to marry him, if I would. But indeed, indeed, I
have no such reason as you suppose.
My dear child, said Mr. Osborne, tenderly taking
her hand, you have never in your whole life told me
an untruth. Do not let me go to my pillow with the
fear that you have deceived your earthly father, and
sinned against your heavenly one.
Tears fell fast on the heaving bosom of the timid and
ingenuous Grace. She burst from the embrace of her
excellent parent, saying, Some other time, dear father,
some other time, we will talk of this.
Pitying her extreme distress, neither of them attempted
to prevent her departure. Both retired to rest
exceedingly
anxious concerning a delusion, which, from the
character of its object, they could not imagine would
terminate happily for the fair being that indulged it.
CHAP. XII.
But had I wist before I kiss'd,
That luve had been sae ill to win,
I had lock'd my heart in a kist of gold,
And pinn'd it wi'a siller pin.
Old Scotch Song
.
For
several weeks, our young friends kept the
noiseless tenor of their way, without meeting any
other danger than that of frequent and delightful
intercourse
.
Grace visited less and less frequently at
Lucretia's lodgings, but the visits she received from
Somerville were far too numerous to please her
affectionate
and judicious connexions. Perfectly aware of
this, and sometimes chilled by the fastidious reserve of
the little beauty, Somerville became more absent,
irritable
,
and negligent than Lucretia had ever seen him.
The inattention which originated entirely in
thoughtlessness
,
seemed to her to be peculiarly pointed; and she
began to fear that the gayety and frankness of her nature
had been mistaken for undue levity. Painful as this
idea might be, it was the medicine her diseased mind
required. Pride took possession of a heart transparent
as it was susceptible, and it was soon evident that she
was exerting all her good sense to overcome the
fascination
to which she had so foolishly yielded. But when
we have long allowed our feelings to spurn at restraint,
it requires a giant's hand to curb them; and though
Lucretia possessed great purity and rectitude of
purpose
,
the important lesson of self-control was one she
had never learned. The materials for a delightful and
highly-finished character were rich and ample,but
want of judgment in the artist had marred the original
design; and the mind that might have been a noble
Corinthian pillar, now only displayed a few beautiful
specimens, which, like the Elgin marbles, served to
betray
the perfection of the column.
It has been well observed that there is a time in the
lives of most people, when character fearfully fluctuates
in the balance; and when circumstances, apparently
accidental, may do much to decide it, either to good or
evil. Henry Osborne was aware that the present
period
was a very important one to Miss Fitzherbert; and
he feared that the influence of Somerville was any thing
but beneficial. The fearless reasoning, the contempt of
quiet virtues, the restlessness under the salutary shackles
of society, against which a vigorous understanding and
a glowing imagination ought to be peculiarly guarded,
were all increased by his bold and brilliant conversation.
Perhaps a long-cherished attachment to Lucretia had
made Mr. Osborne particularly keen-sighted to the faults
of his rival; but so wise, so prudent had he been while
under the dominion of that blind boy, who is wont to writhe
and stamp so furiously in the chains of reason, that the
state of his affections had never been suspected by their
object. However, it had long been sufficiently obvious to
Miss Sandford; and she could not so far overcome her
established prejudices as to prefer his simple manners
13*
and unpretending good sense, to the elegance and genius
of the high-born Englishman. With constrained
politeness
,
therefore, she received him as he entered,
according
to his usual custom, just as the ladies had retired
from the tea-table to the drawing-room. Governor
Hutchinson was engaged in his library, and Mr. Osborne
was too frequent a guest to disturb his arrangements.
Somerville laid down the paper he was busily reading,
and gave him a hearty welcome; and Lucretia, piqued
at the silence and absent manner of her companion,
received him with uncommon frankness and cordiality.
He brought with him the spirited paper at that time
edited by Edes and Gill; and smiled with much
significance
as he pointed out to Somerville the bold
resolutions
that had been passed in most of the Colonies.
The spirit of New England may break, but you
perceive that it will never bend, observed Osborne.
I should despise them if it did, after having gone
thus far, rejoined Somerville. Indeed there is little
danger of it as long as you have such writers as this,
pointing to the signature of Hyperion.
Whom do you suppose it to be?
No one can hesitate to decide, said Somerville.
Otis pours forth his eloquence like the streaming lava
of Vesuvius, melting and scorching as it runs; Mayhew
writes with the readiness of a scholar, and with a fiery
and vehement zeal, strangely at variance with his mild,
dispassionate character; but whose pages burn with a
flame so strong, bright, and fervent as Quincy's? His
style is lucid as a waveless lake; and it has the muscle
of a Hercules.
Perhaps you have altered your opinion that it is
not worth while for England to search for talents in so
poor a market as her Colonies, said Henry, smiling at
his enthusiastic manner.
Lucretia gave an incredulous and significant look, as
if she would say, He does not always talk thus.
That I have found more wealth, intellect, and
refinement
in America, than my English education taught
me to expect, is certainly most true, replied Somerville;
and whatsoever I believe, I frankly confess;
notwithstanding
Miss Fitzherbert expresses by her looks that I
am guilty of double-dealing.
These are sad times, observed Miss Sandford.
The king condescends too much, for the sake of
pleasing his refractory subjects. It is a pity the good
old days of Richard the First could not be restored, when
the eastles of the boldest barons belonged to the
monarch
,
from the corner-stone to the topmost turret.
Nay, Madam Sandford, the world is too old for such
leading-strings, replied Henry Osborne. You
yourself
would hardly wish for the return of old times with
all their appendages. I query whether the preaching
of Doctor Byles would not be more acceptable to you,
than Hugh Latimer, when he proclaimed to the female
part of his audience, Ye are underlings! underlings,
and must be obedient.
For the love of quiet, said Lucretia, do not set
that ball a rolling; for do but name the words `female
inferiority' before Aunt Sandford, and it will go like a
bullet on an inclined plane, every step accelerating its
motion.
In my youth, children were not in the habit of
dictating
what should be said to their elders, rejoined
Miss Sandford.
Lucretia whispered something that seemed to
conciliate
the offended maiden; and Somerville resumed the
conversation by saying, One must be difficult to please,
if they are not satisfied with the preaching of Doctor
Byles. His style unites the elegance of Addison with
the fervent piety of Flavel.
Of his warm and genuine devotion I have no doubt,
replied Henry; though most of his audience
remember
his jests better than they do his religious advice;
but I must confess that his style is too florid to meet my
ideas of pulpit eloquence. So rich an imagination is
singular in a man of his years and deep learning. In
his sermons it shows itself in language fanciful and
brilliant
;
and in his conversation it bursts forth in the
boldest
and most eccentric comparisons. To this we owe
the continual flashing of his wit; and though I know
him to possess uncommon erudition, sincere piety, and
the most unyielding integrity, I cannot but think this
sparkling trait of character is too luxuriantly overgrown.
I never see any one quality of the mind standing forth
so prominently, without thinking of one of the finest
passages in Bacon's philosophy: `In forming the human
character,' says he, `we must not proceed as a statuary
does in forming a statue, who works sometimes on the
face, sometimes on the limbs, sometimes on the folds of
the drapery; but we must proceed (and it is certainly
in our power) as nature does in forming a flower, or any
other of her productions; she throws out, altogether,
and at once, the whole system of being, and the
rudiments
of all the parts.'
It is a beautiful passage, indeed, rejoined
Somerville
;
but a character formed on such a plan must be
intolerably flat. In good truth, I dislike a character
formed at all. Give me nature, bold, impetuous, and
unrestrained. It is as much preferable to all your
artificial
modes, as the foaming cataracts and towering
mountains of Switzerland are to the well-built dikes
and the dead level of the Netherlands.
If it were possible for nature to pursue an unbiassed
course, replied Osborne, to give her the reins would
be a hazardous experiment, though in some instances it
might prove a fortunate one; but the fact is, we are so
much the creatures of adventitious circumstance, that it
is utterly impossible. She is always receiving impulses
from surrounding objects; and if the impetus is violent,
it is two-fold; for it gives the tendency to rebound to
the other extreme. I admire an harmonious,
well-adjusted
character, be it formed as it may. He who gives
himself up to the absorbing power of any one single
passion, may draw the eyes of all mankind toward him;
but qualities of a milder and more consistent cast
constitute
the chief charm of domestic life.
I repeat that I dislike every thing like made-up
goodness, said Somerville. It is apt to be like brass
plated with silverin the long run it will show its
materials
.
You are very right, Captain Somerville, answered
Miss Sandford. Your over-righteous ones generally
prove to be the most consummate hypocrites.
Perhaps hypocrisy is the real name of what the
world generally calls virtue, rejoined the young sceptic.
It is too much the case in these days, to be sure,
answered the maiden.
Henry was about to enter into a vindication of aspersed
humanity; but he well knew Lucretia's disdain of all
beaten tracks; and he feared the effect of new and bold
ideas elicited from the daring mind of Somerville.
Doctor Franklin is a good example of the system
I have supported, said he. Such a character, instead
of plated brass, is solid silver taken from the mine, and
skilfully fashioned into useful forms. Never was there
a man who owed so much to self-exerted discipline as
he does. I remember in the long conversation I had
with him the night before he sailed to England, he
minutely
detailed the process by which he had attained so
much self-control. He made a list of the thirteen
virtues
he thought most necessary, and to each one he paid
particular and undivided attention for one week. Thus
one week he would refrain from speaking evil of others;
another, he would abstain from every thing not
absolutely
necessary to life and comfort; and so on. At the
end of every quarter, the circle commenced anew.
There was sound philosophy in this,for as each virtue
was successively impressed upon the mind at succeeding
intervals, no one had a chance to attain a giant growth
at the expense of others.
If I found any virtue peculiarly stinted, I would
give it a double portion of cultivation. Those who are
prone to do heedless things, would do well to
appropriate
two weeks in every quarter to the very necessary
virtue called prudence.
You look as if you wished that remark should be
individually appropriated, said Lucretia; and
perhaps
you would tell the same person to foster judgment
as if it were a hot-house plant, and trust imagination to
its own wild, spontaneous growth.
Since you understand me so well, replied Osborne,
smiling, I will add, that whatever point of character
we find the weakest, should be the most sedulously
fortified
;
and for this purpose, the choice of friends and of
books is equally important.
Ah, well! said Lucretia, in the careless gayety of
her heart, you must bear with me just as I am, a few
years longer; and then I will promise to be so collected,
so prudent My feelings shall be just as calm as the
river in summer's moonlight. I will choose my friends
among the Quakers, and read nothing but `The Saint's
Rest,' or `Universal Love Established on a Right
Foundation.'
With much emphasis, Mr. Osborne replied, I should
rather see particular love established on a right
foundation
.
Fearing he had trusted himself too far, he rose, and
opening Thomson's Seasons, which lay on the
worktable
of the ladies, he carelessly looked over its
contents
,
and then observed he must return home to write
a letter, before the evening was far advanced.
Somerville
immediately proposed to Miss Fitzherbert that they
should both accompany him. Lucretia coldly declined,
pretending she feared the effects of evening dampness;
and the young men, having expressed their regret, took
their hats, and bade good evening. None of us are to
blame for having selfish and evil thoughts; for
imperfections
will cling to our fallen nature; but when we
cherish them for a moment,more especially when we
give utterance to them,we are guilty of giving form
and permanence to what would otherwise be fleeting
and shadowy.
Miss Sandford was too apt to do this; and scarcely
had the door closed, before she exclaimed, I do not
like that Grace Osborne, with all the sweetness and
modesty she chooses to put on.
Lucretia had unconsciously been tying knot after knot
in her thread, little aware that her friend suspected all
that was passing in her mind. The tears started to her
eyes, as she replied, I am sure, dear aunt, she is every
thing that is amiable and lovely.
Nevertheless, with all her pretty diffidence, I do not
doubt she tries her best to get Somerville away from
you.
Away from me! said Lucretia, with a look of
extreme surprise.
I mean, answered Miss Sandford, laying down the
screen she had been working, and sweeping up the
hearth in a great flurry, I mean that Somerville respects
you very much, and would marry you, if those deuced
Osbornes were out of the way.
Lucretia smiled at the good old lady's perturbation.
Captain Somerville's heart, said she, is like the
waves cut by a passing vessela moment after, you
can find no traces of an impression. Grace Osborne
can never be in my way. I have always loved her;
and if Somerville can win her heart, and she can keep
his, I shall surely be rejoiced to see a man I value so
much united to a being so pure and lovely.
The whole family are over good, and very prodigal
of their advice, rejoined the matron. I wonder what
right Henry has to direct the books you shall read, and
the friends you shall choose.
He did not mean to direct, dear madam; but I am
so much with Grace, that he feels the same freedom in
talking to me that he does to her. I am sure I thank
him for his friendship and candour.
It is more than I do, retorted the maiden, whose
fretfulness was not to be speedily appeased. Grace,
with all her perfections, is the veriest little coquette.
Don't look me in the face with as much wonder as if I
had said you had not common sense! I know they are
all your oracles; and I dare say you will finish the
business by marrying the prosing young man, who has
given you so sage a lecture to-night.
There seems very little chance for it, replied
Lucretia,since such a thought probably never
entered
the young gentleman's brain.
14
You need not tell me that. I have seen this thing
coming on for more than three years. He would have
made proposals before now, if he had known of the
large fortune you are to have.
The attempt to vindicate her friends from such
unfounded
charges would have been, just at that time,
entirely useless. Lucretia, who well understood the
avenues to her heart, gave a more pleasant turn to the
conversation, by acknowledging the old lady's
experience
in the affairs of the heart, and thus leading her
to dwell, for the thousandth time, on the rejected
addresses
of her youth.
When Miss Fitzherbert retired to her chamber, she
took with her the book which Mr. Osborne had opened,
intending to search for a passage particularly admired
by Somerville. The volume opened of itself, and
displayed
a note neatly folded, and directed to herself.
She opened it, and read as follows:
Dear Madam
.
I hardly know how to account for the diffidence
I feel in addressing you. The usual exaggerated
language
of affection would, I well know, appear ridiculous
to you; and coldness or reserve is but ill suited to the
present state of my feelings. The declaration that I
have been for years most sincerely and devotedly
attached
to you, may not perhaps be entirely unexpected;
and I once hoped it would not be entirely
disagreeable
.
You do not owe your influence over me to a
sudden freak of fancy; it results from a long and
intimate
knowledge of your character. Yet I will not
flatter
you, by saying I consider you faultless;on the
contrary, I think you have defects, which may prove
very dangerous to yourself and friends, unless timely
corrected. But I cannot imagine a character more
elevated than might be formed from a mind so vigorous,
and a heart so generous and candid as yours.
How largely I think you would contribute to domestic
happiness, is proved by the step I have now taken.
Whether the lovely garland of hope, that my heart has
so long been weaving, is to be scattered to the winds,
depends on your answer. At all events, ever your
affectionate friend, and obedient servant,
Henry Osborne
.
Umph, said Lucretia, as she folded the letter,
I say with Cowley,
`I could not love, I'm sure,
One who in love were wise.'
With a promptitude, for which she did not stop to
account to her own heart, she thanked Mr. Osborne
for the confidence he had placed in her, and expressed
an affectionate interest in his welfare and happiness;
but declared that it was utterly impossible for her ever
to reciprocate his attachment.
CHAP. XIII.
He dies, and makes no sign!O God, forgive him!
So bad a death argues a monstrous life.
Henry VI.
On
a damp and chilly evening, at the commencement
of November, the peaceful family circle at Mr. Osborne's
was disturbed by a loud and hasty knock at the outer
door. It proved to be John Dudley, evidently
agitated
,
and out of breath with exertion.
You will excuse me, sir, for coming upon you in
this way, said he, bowing to the elder Mr. Osborne;
but where there is good to be done, I know you are
always fond of going.
Very true, John; and of what service can I be
now?
Why, Miss Grace remembers that my good woman
told her about Wilson's daughter, that was coming to
board with us. Well, sure enough, she came with a
young man, who, they say, is her new married husband;
and as comely a couple they are as ever I looked on.
She has a noble way with her, that makes her seem like
a duchess; and he is as rosy and fresh as seventeen.
Howsomever, that's neither here nor there.They are
are as unhappy now as the oldest and the ugliest. Her
father is dying,and oh,such a hard death. The
doctor says he is
pisoned;
and my Rebecca looks hard
at old Townsend.
To their brief inquiries, Dudley rapidly answered, that
about half an hour before, Mr. Percival had come in as
pale as ashes, and begged him and his wife to go to Mr.
Townsend's; and that when they arrived there, they
found Mr. Wilson in dreadful fits, crying out for a priest
to whom he might confess. And so, continued he,
I ran off for you, thinking you might speak a word of
comfort to his poor soul.
Mrs. Dudley was right in her conjecture. The shaft
of death had been winged by the hand of Townsend.
Two or three unsuccessful expeditions to Castle William
had given rise to a suspicion that Wilson had himself
secreted the treasure supposed to be concealed there:
this, together with a daily increasing fear of detection,
induced the old man to remove his guilty associate by
means of poison; but no sooner had the deadly potion
commenced its work, than the poor wretch, rendered
cowardly by wickedness, sought to drown the voice of
conscience in a copious draught of laudanum.
When Mr. Osborne arrived, he was met at the door
by Doctor Willard. You have come to a terrible
scene, my dear sir, said he. Being at my father's,
I was sent for, as the nearest physician; but I assure
you, I would gladly have avoided the task.
It was indeed a melancholy sight to see two who had
long been supposed companions in guilt, lying on
miserable
pallets in the same room of death.
The miser, gasping for breath, seemed insensible to
all around him; yet his right hand clutched a bag of
gold with all his remaining energy, as if he thought the
14 *
filthy lucre would assist him beyond the grave. His
nephew stood rubbing his stiffened hand with a look of
mingled distress and compassion.
The sufferings of Wilson were more severe than
those of his murderer. He would shriek and struggle
till his strength was quite exhausted, and then his weak
limbs would quiver with the acuteness of bodily pain,
and his features become convulsed with the violence of
internal emotion. His daughter knelt by his bed-side
in tears; and pale and anxious as she was, Doctor
Willard
saw in her exceeding beauty an ample excuse for
Percival's degrading marriage.
She had loosened the rosary from her neck, and she
held the sacred emblem of salvation before the sufferer,
as she said, Try to pray, dear father. He gazed on
her for a moment with a dreadful expression of remorse
and terror, and then turned his face the other way
without
speaking a word.
Doctor Willard prepared an opiate, and as his child
stooped down to arrange his pillows, and apply the
laudanum to his throbbing temples,with the frightful,
hollow laugh of insanity, he exclaimed, Where is your
bloody gown, Gertrude. I have been told that heart's
blood will not wash out in any earthly stream.
He looked up as he spokehis expression suddenly
changed; and he shaded his face, as he murmured,
Oh, how much like Fitzherbert!
It's a lie, squeaked the old miser, in tones hardly
audible, I never touched Fitzherbert's money.
Ha! are you there, old raven? said his
accomplice
,
trying to raise himself on his elbow.
The exertion was too much for him, and with a deep
groan he fell backward. His spasms were, for a while,
more violent than ever. Percival left the bed-side of
his uncle, where he had long been pouring words of
kindness and consolation into ears that regarded him
not; and when his wretched father-in-law had an
interval
of comparative quiet, he took Mr. Osborne's
hand, as he said, Here is a clergyman come to pray
with you.
I know what to say to please him and all his tribe,
replied the hardened sinner; but it would do no good.
There is an accusing spirit with a bloody robe, that will
undo all that he or I can do to save me.
But there is One who has the power and the will
to save the penitent, observed Mr. Osborne.
Mr. Wilson scowled deeply. I have something to
confess, said he; but he is not one of the confessing
sort.
Is there no holy priest in Boston, who could give
ease to my father's parting spirit? inquired Gertrude.
There is no Catholic, God be praised, replied Mr.
Osborne, with a look that expressed his compassion for
her deluded faith.
I have much to say, and brief space to say it in,
rejoined Wilson; but it touches the life of that old
man. I meant to have reformed from my evil ways, if
the Almighty had given me timeas it is, I must take
my chance.
A loud groan at that instant directed all eyes toward
Mr. Townsend's couch. Percival instantly sprang
forward
,for,
unnoticed by any one, he had fallen into
strong convulsions. Doctor Willard tried to open his
hands; but with strength that seemed almost
miraculous
,
he clasped the golden treasure, and in broken and
indistinct accents, complained that they were taking
away his last farthing.
I won't, I won't, said he, struggling with the
physician
,
I say I won't pay a farthing; for I never
wronged her.
Sinking back as he spoke, his muscles twitched,his
limbs drew up, and he expired.
The tears coursed each other down the cheeks of his
nephew, as he gazed on the corpse of him who had
lived unbeloved and died unlamented.
It is always melancholy to see a desolate mortal
venturing
into the fathomless abyss of eternity, without one
friendly voice on shore to bid him God-speed; and
perhaps
the mixture of regret and self-reproach, which we
feel when standing by the death-bed of those whom we
ought to love, yet cannot, has more of anguish in it than
belongs to any other species of sorrow.
Wilson, himself tottering on the verge of the
precipice
from which his companion had just dropped,
seemed
to be the only one unmoved.
So he has gone to hell before me, and my story can
do him no harm, said he.
With a look of unutterable agony Gertrude fell on
her husband's neck, and sobbed out, Oh, I cannot
hear him talk thus.
The action seemed to soften the heart of her father;
and, seizing the favourable moment, Mr. Osborne said,
You are a dying man, Mr. Wilson; and something
seems to weigh heavily on your conscience. Remember
there is One to whom it is never too late to kneel for
pardoning mercy.
Wilson waved his hand impatiently. I have
something
else to say now, answered he;when I have
done, I will listen to you. Mr. Townsend was executor
to the Fitzherbert estate. He embezzled most of the
property. I broke open the widow's house; I
intercepted
her letters, and he paid me for it.
Before he could say more, his fits again came over
him. He writhed and groaned,and the sweat stood
on his brow, in the intensity of his pain. With
self-command
wonderful in one so young, his daughter
leaned
over him, and assisted Doctor Willard in his attempts
to restore him.
When he revived a little, Mr. Osborne, impelled by
his anxiety for Lucretia, asked where the proofs of this
transaction could be found.
In a small iron box, at John Dudley's house,
answered
Wilson. I got them from the miser by the
help of false keys; and I held the whip over his back
forever after. There are two other things I would tell
of,perhaps it may help me through purgatory. There
is a chest of gold buried in the ground, behind the store
No. , King-street. I meant to have left it to
Gertrude
,
continued he, looking at her with earnest
affection
,
but she will have enough, if justice has all her
due.
Oh, tell the truthtell all the truth, said Gertrude,
stooping to kiss his pale face.
Delighted approbation shone in the expressive
countenance
of Percival. She is richer in her husband's
love than gold or silver could make her, observed
Doctor Willard. May I ask if this chest of gold is
the same Mr. Townsend dug up on the island last
September
?
The old fool never dug it up, said Wilson, with a
hideous laugh. Did he think I'd know where
treasure
was, and not get it myself?I kept it as a sort of
lure for him; but it was dug up in August, and a smooth
stone placed in its stead.
And what, inquired Doctor Willard, was the
meaning of the noise, and of that struggling in the
sand?
A slight smile of contempt curled the lips of the
dying
man, as he asked, Had you not a favourite dog?
I had.
And did you ever see him after you left Castle
William?
I never did;though I have offered large rewards
for him.
How superstition blinds itself, replied Wilson.
The men were startled by the voice of Doctor Byles;
they suffered the stone to slip, and your dog was
crushed
beneath it.
To whom does this gold belong? asked Percival.
Some accursed fatality has always joined my
fortunes
with Fitzherbert's, said he. The box was his.
There is that within it will explain all. There is one
thing more. In Mr. Townsend's third drawer, you will
find a book of bank notes belonging to Governor
Hutchinson
.
Why did you not tell all this before? inquired
Percival. I could have persuaded my poor uncle to
restore all to the rightful owners.
No such easy matter that, replied Wilson.
Beside
,
to tell the truth, I could not bear that Gertrude
should lose a penny, until death began to stare me in
the face. I knew your romantic generosity would
betray
all. I respect you for it; and in a moment of
weakness I once trusted a fearful secret to ita secret
which you alone of all the world are privy to.
Is he? cried a voice, startling in its shrillness.
The eyes of all present were directed to the quarter
whence the sound proceeded. A tall, gaunt figure, in
a bright red cardinal, stood near the door. A wrinkled,
smoke-coloured arm was thrust forth from the cloak, and
her hand rested on a cane covered with snake-skin. A
rusty black bonnet had fallen back on her shoulders, and
gave a full view of her countenance, gleaming with
expression
perfectly satanic. Where should your crime
be so faithfully recorded as on the heart you have
crushed? said she. I told you a violent death was
not far distant. You call me Molly Bradstreet,but I
am the mother of the murdered Gertrude May!
A piercing shriek came from Wilson's inmost soul.
Her eyes seemed to flash with infernal fire, as she
exclaimed,You did kill her, then? Own it, wretch!
own it!
I did stab her, said Wilson; but you do not know
the cause.
The frenzied mother threw her cane upon the floor,
and springing to the bed, shook the dying man with the
strength and fury of an Amazon.
Take her away from himtake her away, cried
Gertrude, in a voice suffocated with emotion.
Her husband and Doctor Willard forced her from the
apartment; but as they retreated, she fixed her
withering
gaze upon Wilson, and shook her bony fist in
impotent
rage, as she exclaimed, A mother's curse go with
you; and the torments of the damned be your portion,
murderer as you are.
The pains of death are coming over me, thanks to the
hand that hurried them, said Mr. Wilson. Stoop down
and kiss me, while I have my senses; for bad as I am,
I love you, my child.
Oh, my father,my poor father,would I had
never known all this, said Gertrude; and as she
covered
her face with her trembling hands, the scalding tears
forced their way between her slender fingers.
The dying parent gave her one fervent kiss,and
would have clasped her to his aching heart, but the
paroxysms
came on more violently than ever. In the
terrible
contest, reason was forever hurled from her throne.
He seemed to wrestle with some imaginary being, and
screamed and struggled, as he said, Let me go! let
me go! She is standing there to heap red hot coals
upon
my head. Oh, save me! save me! This
dreadful
conflict could not last long. Life yielded to the
torturing
fiend; and he expired amid shrieks and agony.
The distressing scene came upon the innocent heart
of Gertrude with double power; for till now she had
been ignorant that a shadow of crime could be imputed
to her father; and she was carried from the room in a
state of insensibility.
Delicacy prevented any one from alluding to the
shocking causes of the deaths they had just witnessed;
though none doubted the distressing truth.
I sincerely thank you for your kind exertions,
though they have been so fruitless, said Percival to the
worthy clergyman. It is but lately that my
father-in-law
made a firm resolution that a virtuous old age should
atone, as far as possible, for his early sins; but late
reformations
are always dangerous.
The stains of evil are indeed washed out with
difficulty
when they have long been drying and deepening
beneath the scorching heat of the passions, replied
Mr. Osborne. Such instances should teach us all an
impressive lesson. They serve too well to confirm the
awful truth, that the threshold of hell is paved with
good resolutions.
I trust the fearful warning will not be lost upon us,
rejoined the young man. A priest of our own
persuasion
would be more pleasant to myself and Mrs.
Percival; but as this is not altogether practicable at
this time, will you, my good sir, attend these funerals
the day after to-morrow?
Mr. Osborne readily assented; and after Doctor
Willard
1
had generously offered his services in any way they
might be required, the young husband retired to console
Gertrude with all the arguments that good sense or
tenderness
could suggest.
Grace and Lucretia spent the ensuing day in the
house of mourning; and their ready kindness and
unaffected
sensibility rapidly made their way to the heart
of the fair mourner,while the guileless simplicity of
her ideas, aided by the witchery of foreign accent, made
a claim on their affections equally powerful.
They were all at that happy age, when the heart,
elastic and pliable, bounds forward to receive an
impression
,
and gives back its image in lines broad, deep,
and distinct.
When they parted, Percival smiled, as he said, You
have taken the heart of my Gertrude by a
coup de
main;
had you been nine years in the St. Vallier's
convent
,
I think you could hardly have been greater
friends.
In no point of view could the death of the two
unhappy
men be considered a misfortune;yet the
funeral
was a crowded one.
The novel and exciting circumstances attending their
decease, the handsome Canadian stranger, and the
desire
to explore a house which they had never been
allowed
to visit during the life time of its owner, led the
populace thither in throngs.
When every thing was arranged for the procession,
the sexton, according to custom, announced that any
one had liberty to view the bodies. The crowd rushed
in with eagerness. Every one that looked on their
convulsed
and blackened features, turned away with an
expression
of horror; and others, with redoubled
eagerness
,
pressed forward to ascertain the cause of such
obvious emotion. He must have indeed been ingenious
in torture who first devised this cruel custom, still
common
in the interior of our country. Oh, how the
mother
is thrilled with anguish, when the blessed little face,
that has so often nestled to her heart in cherub
playfulness
,
is exposed to the view of the rude and unfeeling;
and how the husband's heart swells almost to bursting,
when the loved countenance, once all radiant with
affection
,
is given in its cold and lifeless beauty, to the
heartless
gaze of a multitude.
There were no such feelings to be aroused on this
occasion; but Gertrude was oppressed with a deep and
distressing sense of shame, that the violent death of her
father should thus needlessly be made public. Her
husband sympathized with her feelings, and beckoned
to Doctor Willard, who in a low voice requested the
sexton to screw down the lids of the coffins, and
dispense
with further ceremony.
`Not till I have looked my last, said a discordant
voice. The crowd made way for some one, and
presently
the grandmother of Gertrude stood by the coffin,
eyeing the lifeless remains of her son-in-law with the
malignant triumph of a vindictive fiend. I told him
it would end thus; but he little thought how much more
I could have told him, murmured she, as she seated
herself among the mourners.
Who is she? who is she? was whispered among
the crowd; but those who were able to give the
information
did not choose to impart it, and no further
notice
was taken of the interruption.
In a long and fervent prayer, Mr. Osborne alluded to
the insufficiency of wealth, and dwelt much on the
never failing mercies of the Saviour. What he said
was so exactly appropriate, and what he forbore to say,
evinced so much delicacy and tenderness, that Gertrude
half forgot her Catholic prejudices; though she
internally
resolved that mass for her father's soul should be
said for three months in the convent of St. Vallier.
When the procession formed, Mr. and Mrs. Percival
rose and led the way. With a sudden and rapid stride
the grandmother approached Lucretia, and seizing her
arm attempted to follow. Lucretia shrank from the
contact with loathing and terror; but the singular
woman
held her in a strong grasp, as she said, Thus,
thus it should be. I am no mourner,neither are you;
nevertheless our place is here.
Fearing her violence would create confusion,
Lucretia
passively yielded to her guidance,though partly
from fear, and partly from the inequality of their stature,
she found it nearly impossible to keep pace with her.
Nothing was said till they arrived at the burial ground.
The harsh, grating cords lowered the coffins into the
earth; the heavy clods were heaped upon them, and
slowly and with measured tread the mourners left the
melancholy spot. Lucretia Fitzherbert, said the old
woman, stepping aside from her companions, and
warmly
clasping her hand, You'll may-be never see me
again; or if ye do, I'll may-be bring you unwelcome
tidings. I am sometimes strongly moved to make
reparation
for all I have done; but it will not come out.
A good name will do much for you; but when you come
to your rich relations, and your heaps of silver, do not
forget a poor, half-crazed creature, that has watched for
ye, wept for ye, and kept an eye on ye,but never for
evil. You are the only one left to pray for her now.
Her chin quivered, her lips moved convulsively, and
the pressure of her hand was painful in its desperate
fervour.
With mingled surprise and pity, Miss Fitzherbert
answered, If there is any thing I can do for you, poor
woman
Your love and your prayers, interrupted she;
oh, if I had them, I could tread my wearisome
pilgrimage
in peace.
My grandmother, said Gertrude, who had often
looked back, and now timidly approached them, is
there nothing you will allow us to do for you before we
go back to Canada?
You! you! replied she, with a vacant laugh.
You owe me nothing; but your painted outside has
done well for you.
Without waiting for an answer, she suddenly struck
into a little winding path, and was soon seen towering
among the distant bushes.
It is very strange, said Gertrude; we invited her
to this funeral, and offered her a suit of mourning; but
15 *
she refused to come. My husband voluntarily promised
her a house and a pension for life, but she treated it all
with the bitterest scorn.
On their way homeward, it was agreed that her
grandchildren
,
accompanied by Lucretia, should seek her
dwelling the ensuing day. They did so accordingly;
but no traces of the unhappy creature could be found.
An old woman who lived a few rods from her wretched
hut, said that, Molly had gone off the day before, bag
and baggage; and that it was borne in upon her mind,
that she meant to lay violent hands on herself; but then
there was no telling,for she always had a rambling
way with her.
There were but few affairs left for Mr. Percival to
arrange before he left New England. Four thousand
pounds, the amount proved to have been sequestrated
from the Fitzherbert estate, was paid into the hands of
Governor Hutchinson. The chest of gold was found
where Wilson had directed, and its contents were
precisely
what he stated in his conversation with Mr.
Townsend
.
At the bottom of the silver was a letter, worn
and blackened by the metal, but still enough of it
legible
to make out, with slight assistance from imagination,
I was induced to collect my property, lest the
settlement
should trouble you in case of my death.
Ever your loving husband,
Edmund Fitzherbert
.
Lucretia kissed the precious document, and steeped
it in her tears. How well it is, said she, that we
never know the event of what we undertake. Could
my poor father have foreseen that his dear wife would
have died of a broken heart, without ever being aware
of the kind provision he had made for her comfort, how
wretched he would have been.
The identical handwriting of Captain Fitzherbert was
immediately sent to England, together with an account
of Wilson's confession; and Mr. and Mrs. Percival
returned
home, blessed by the numerous friends whom
their integrity and kindness had procured for them.
A few days after their departure, Doctor Byles
entered
the breakfast parlour before Governor Hutchinson
had arisen from the table.
I have made you an early call, said he; for since
there are no moles stirring, and since the talk about
Wilson and Townsend begins to die away, I think you
must be in need of excitement.
That was a gloomy business, replied the Governor.
Those who were witnesses of it will not speedily
forget
it. With all Mr. Osborne's abhorrence of Wilson's
superstitious creed, he said it made him feel melancholy
to see a poor, dying sinner, craving the only spiritual
consolation in which he had the least faith, and yet
unable
to procure it.
It is a pity that brother Osborne had not as much
political charity as he has religious, answered the
Doctor
.
That these two wicked mortals went to the bar
of an offended God with all their unrepented sins upon
their heads, is melancholy enough; but as to the
Catholic
priest, I am much of the opinion of `the ever
memorable
Hales.' `Pliny somewhere tells you,' says this
bold and witty writer, `that he that is stricken by a
scorpion, if he go immediately and whisper it in the ear
of an ass, shall find himself immediately eased. That
sin is a scorpion, and bites deadly, I have always
believed
;
but that to cure the bite of it, it was a sovereign
remedy to whisper it into the ear of apriest, I do as
well believe, as I do that of Pliny.'
Probably Mr. Osborne's faith is about tantamount
to yours and `the ever memorable Hales',' said
Lucretia
;
but it is not surprising his feelings were touched.
What news do you bring to excite us?
What would you give to know? said Doctor Byles,
drawing a package from his pocket with the most
tantalizing
moderation.
Only tell me one thing,is it from England?
inquired
Lucretia.
It is.
Nay, then, you must not keep us one moment in
suspense, said Governor Hutchinson.
Oh, if a letter from Mr. Fitzherbert has arrived!
exclaimed Miss Sandford.
With a most provoking air, the clergyman replaced
the letters in his pocket, as he observed, Self-denial
is a very necessary virtue, madam Sandford. Women
in particular should learn it well.
Small danger of their lacking lessons, as long as
society affords such lordly and tyrannic beings as
yourself
,
she replied.
This is too bad, said the Governor, half angry and
half amused at his friend's childishness. In the name
of his most christian majesty, George the Third,
Defender
of the Faith, and by the grace of God, King of
Great Britain, Ireland, and the American Colonies, I
command you to deliver up the sealed parcel wherewith
you have been entrusted.
Prove your credentials, and I yield to royal
authority
,
answered Doctor Byles.
Might makes right, replied his antagonist, and
making a sudden plunge, he snatched the package from
its hiding place.
Since you have it, observed the Doctor, I will
give an account how I came by it. I walked unusually
early this morning, and perceiving the Queen Caroline
at the wharf, I went on board to search for letters; and
finding two parcels, one for yourself, and one for me, I
took charge of both.
Two epistles in the well known hands of the Lords
Hillsborough and North, were laid aside to be read at
leisure. The third, though directed to his Excellency
Governor Hutchinson, began:
Dear Niece,
I have only time before this vessel sails, to tell you,
that the important papers,certificate of marriage,
birth, &c., came duly to hand. Evidence is ample and
satisfactory. There is no doubt that your father was my
dear, but very headstrong nephew,though your
miniature
shows not a shadow of family likeness. I rejoice
to see by your letter, that you have been educated as a
Fitzherbert should be. As a trifling acknowledgement
of this kindness, present the articles that accompany
this, to Governor Hutchinson and his sister. A voyage
at this season would be cold and dangerous, but as soon
as the spring opens, you must make for England.
Your loving uncle,
Fitzherbert
.
Grosvenor-Square, London,
Sept. 28th. 1765.
This laconic letter was in a fair Italian hand; and the
upright, heavy signature, was evidently the only part
written by the rich old bachelor. A few hours after, a
small box, directed to Lucretia, was brought from the
newly arrived vessel.
It contained a superb work-box mounted on golden
claws, and ornamented with a lion couchant, of the
same precious material, designed for Madam Sandford;
a gold repeater, of splendid workmanship, bore the
family arms of Hutchinson, marked with the initials,
T. H. A miniature, richly studded with rubies and
pearl, gave to Lucretia's view the bluff, sun-burnt
features
of her wealthy uncle; and last of all, appeared a
draft on the bank of England, to the amount of one
thousand
pounds.
Again and again was the transaction talked over, and
the munificent presents were examined and
re-examined
.
In the course of the day, the Osbornes called to
congratulate their young friend on her good fortune, of
the prospect of which they had, till within a week, been
entirely ignorant.
Joy, joy! cried Miss Sandford; Lucretia goes
to England early in the spring, and she can have the
retinue of a duchess, if she chooses.
Grace said but little, but her eloquent looks spoke
satisfaction without the slightest tinge of envy.
Mr. Osborne folded his hands over her in paternal
benediction, as he said, Your brain must be steady,
indeed, if you can stand on this dizzy height unmoved.
Pray that you may be strengthened for the trial, my
child.
Henry gave her hand a lingering pressure, as he
whispered, I rejoice that I was kept in ignorance of
all this. Wherever Miss Fitzherbert goes, and
whatever
may be her fortune, she will at least remember that
Henry Osborne was a friend, sincere and disinterested.
CHAP. XIV.
Men such as these, could brave a monarch's frown,
Could pluck the diamonds from a tyrant's crown,
And when th' oppression ceas'd, such men could show
A god-like greatness, and forgive a foe.
Pierpont
.
The
winter passed away without any domestic
occurrences
worthy of repetition; though trifles, seen through
the illusive medium of young affection, were
abundantly
magnified by the individuals concerned.
In public, there were angry messages from Governor
Bernard, and high-toned answers from the intrepid
legislature
.
Offices were closed, public business
suspended
,
and the creditor left at the mercy of his debtor,
because the untamed spirit of our fathers would not
cower to take the yoke that an impolitic government had
prepared. Nor did Massachusetts tread her proud and
daring course alone. All the neighbouring colonies
joined her ranks, with union as voluntary as it was
energetic
.
The lakes gave back the signal of resistance,
and the thundering sound reverberated along the
Atlantic
coast, until it was lost among the uninhabited prairies
of the south. The first loud burst of indignation was
indeed hushed for a time, and some superficial politicians
mistook the calmness of fixed resolution for the
tameness
of submission; it was, however, but suppressed
resentment, still as the hours that watch the
earthquake's
birth.
The very first men who dared attempt to enforce the
odious law, found that the giant had but paused to place
his lance in rest, and to rein in his steed for the combat.
Britain discovered the strength of her antagonist, and
though too proud to quit the lists hastily, she slowly and
cautiously retreated before her youthful foe.
In March, 1766, a repeal of the stamp act arrived in
Boston;and notwithstanding it purported to be a mere
act of condescension, and haughtily maintained the right
of England to tax her colonies, it was received with
every demonstration of joy.
Muffled drums, and flags half-mast high had
announced
the unpopular duty,and scarcely had the news of
its revocation spread through the town, before standards
were seen fluttering high in the air, and God save the
king, rung from the bells in many a loud and merry
peal. Liberty was blazoned on hat-bands and
shoulder-belts
,
and the drum rolled its deep response to the
spirit-stirring fife, until the going down of the sun. In
the evening, the streets were brilliantly illuminated.
Liberty, No Stamps, The Repeal, were every
where traced in characters of light.
Somerville and the young ladies, the two Osbornes,
and Doctor Willard, walked out together, to enjoy the
animation and excitement of the scene. Opposite the
Province House, they all paused to examine the fanciful
devices that had been hastily prepared in the eagerness
of gratitude and joy. A full length picture of Liberty,
hurling a broken chain to the winds, particularly
attracted
their attention,and while they were wondering how
16
the appropriate emblem had been so suddenly made
ready, John Dudley, with his group of boys, bustled up
to them. Grasping Doctor Willard's hand, he
exclaimed
,
Indeed, I am almost for going to England to thank
the king myself; but then I'm thinking it is not wise to
thank folks for what they would help if they could.
Strong hands and fearless hearts will not be wanted
so soon as we feared, replied Henry Osborne.
Little
Hancock need not hasten to grow large enough for
a soldier now.
The honest farmer gazed on his children as they
clustered round him, and passed the sleeve of his coat
across his eyes, as he said, I have looked on them
hearty boys by the hour together, and thought I could
see them all fall in the cause of liberty, and not shed
one tear over their graves. But I am glad the trial was
spared me; I had rather they would be left to help me
plough the fields.
The distant roar of cannon from Castle William,
mingled
with a deafening clang from the Old South steeple,
here interrupted their conversation, and Dudley joined
a crowd that was then passing, rending the air with
stunning hurras.
No one refused to unite in this national jubilee; but
there were many who thought the gratitude of the
people
excessive and premature. Mr. Osborne was among
the number. He heartily rejoiced at any overtures
towards
reconciliation; but his penetrating eye could not
but observe that the repeal so reluctantly given, still
claimed the right against which America had so
strenuously
contended. We have no security against
oppression
,
said he, until this tyrannic principle is
renounced
.
I coincide with you in doubting the permanence of
all this, rejoined Henry. Our joy may be suddenly
turned into mourning.
Oh, never be peeping into the shade, when the sunny
side is next you, observed Doctor Willard.
Franklin's
energetic answers in the House of Commons have
taught them to respect us. The young and animated
Burke, and Chatham, with all the assistance that age
and decaying health can give his powerful eloquence,
will work wonders in our favour.
If Americans are satisfied, I strongly suspect the
English will not be, said Somerville; for the
principles
of neither party are recognised in this repeal.
The friends of Mr. Pitt will be angry that the bill is
accompanied by any declarations of parliamentary
power
;
and Mr. Grenville will be indignant that the
factious
spirit of the colonies is conciliated, rather than
conquered.
To keep the medium between dangerous extremes
has been the wise policy of Lord Rockingham's
administration
,
answered Mr. Osborne. In the present
state of political division, it is perhaps the best system
that can be pursued for the general interests of that
great country. However, this plan of tacking and
veering
will not always last. We must have liberty on a
foundation as broad, sure, and permanent, as any other
British subjects, before we shall be satisfied.
England will never relinquish a right she has once
asserted, replied Somerville, somewhat proudly. The
effect of this unaccountable obstinacy must eventually
be a desperate struggle, in which America will surely
be overcome.
Our spirit may never be put to the proof, rejoined
Doctor Willard, if government are contented with
keeping
the power without ever daring to exert it. But if
on any pretence, or under any modifications, it is again
resumed, we must indeed either conquer, or fall in the
contest; and the eloquent Chatham has said, `If
America
falls, she will fall like a strong man. She will
embrace the pillars of the state, and pull down the
constitution
along with her.'
Much wild matter has been poured forth by that
lover of ultra freedom, answered Somerville.
Lucretia smiled as she looked back and said to Grace,
Captain Somerville's English prejudices and tory
predilections
seem to have returned with full power.
As she spoke, Somerville pointed down a court they
were just passing, at the extremity of which was a
beautiful
collection of shrubbery, very tastefully illuminated.
This is an unusual sight in Boston, said he; do let
us examine it more closely. The rest of the party
went on without noticing what had attracted their
attention
,
and were nearly out of hearing, when they entered
the alcove, where the flowers were smiling in their
sheltered beauty.
Are any of these for sale? inquired Somerville.
I should not like to disturb them to-night, replied
the owner; but to-morrow they will be at the service
of any who wish to purchase.
Will you, dear Grace, select the one you think most
beautiful? said Somerville.
The tender monosyllable had unguardedly escaped
his lips, and the emphatic accent with which it was
spoken, thrilled her to the heart. Without suspecting
his purpose, she timidly pointed to a full blown rose, as
delicate and shadowy in its tint as the maiden suffusion
from which it takes its name.
Send it to Governor Hutchinson's at ten
to-morrow
,
said Somerville,and drawing the arm of Grace
closer within his own, he left the court.
You would forgive the political bitterness with which
I have spoken to-night, Miss Osborne, if you knew how
much reason I have to hate this repeal. When the
vessel
which brought the tidings returns to England, I must
depart with important despatches to the Court of St.
James.
The painful, suffocating sensation of impeded
utterance
for a moment prevented any reply. Shall you
never return to America? she at length said, in a voice
low and tremulous.
If your life and mine are spared two years, I shall
most certainly see America again before I die, he
replied
.
My heart will never leave it.
This was the first time that Somerville had given
utterance
to his feelings, even by the most distant allusion;
yet they had long perfectly understood each other. The
powerful artillery of the eye, and the thousand nameless
16 *
signs in love's freemasonry, express more than language
can possibly speak with her utmost unassisted power;
and if Grace with intuitive readiness had construed their
meaning, Somerville on his part had argued much from
the transient gleams of tenderness that now and then
shone through her habitual reserve.
However, that the declaration had been long expected,
did not prevent it from being anticipated with the most
tumultuous agitation, and the most embarrassed silence.
To the great vexation of Somerville, this was
disturbed
by the elder Mr. Osborne and Lucretia, who had
returned
to meet them.
The purchase of the rose was briefly explained in
excuse for their absence, and the conversation took a
general turn, until they parted at the threshold of Mr.
Osborne's dwelling.
The next day the flourishing rose-bush, removed into
an elegant vase of transparent china, was left at the door
by one of the Lieutenant Governor's servants, who at
the same time delivered a note for Miss Osborne.
Grace hastily withdrew to her chamber, and read as
follows:
Dear Grace,
This flower, pure and beautiful as yourself, was
purchased for you. Will you accept it from your
faithful
lover? Will you cherish it for his sake, during the
tedious absence to which he is doomed?
Your beauty and fascinating gracefulness, will
attract
others as powerfully as they have me; and amid
the attentions of some more favoured lover, I may
perchance
be forgotten.
Were I sure that my memory would be fostered in
the recesses of your heart,that my image alone would
be enshrined there, I should have no other boon to ask
of indulgent Heaven.
If the ring which accompanies this is permitted to
encircle your snowy finger, I shall consider it as a tacit
promise of all I have dared to hope. If not, the world
has nothing to offer, for which I care to live.
Ever most ardently and devotedly yours,
Frederick Somerville
.
Had Grace been entirely uninterested in the writer,
she would have thought the flattery and inflated
language
of this epistle absolutely disgusting; but we are
all apt to excuse the folly which we imagine proceeds
from excessive affection for ourselves. The billet-doux
was locked in a secret drawer, with feelings that certainly
widely differed from disapprobation; and the ring,
ornamented
by a single sapphire, surrounded with pearl,
was placed upon her finger.
I shall not repeat the wise speeches and expressive
looks to which this circumstance gave rise. Those who
cannot imagine them, must forever remain in their
ignorance
.
During the winter, letters had again been received
from Mr. Edmund Fitzherbert, expressing great anxiety
to see Lucretia, and urging her to come to him as soon
as the season would possibly admit.
The whole of these epistles had been written by an
amanuensis; for a severe stroke of the palsy had
rendered
the old gentleman unable to add his trembling
signature.
All these circumstances considered, Governor
Hutchinson
thought it expedient that Lucretia should
accompany
his nephew to England.
Perhaps the money-loving magistrate had a more
powerful motive than that of securing a pleasant
companion
and protector for Miss Fitzherbert's voyage. He
was well aware that daily intercourse is a powerful aid
to matrimonial schemes; and he thought the immense
wealth of the young heiress a prize well worth his
nephew's
attention. Had he been injudicious enough to
hint such an idea, Somerville would have spurned at it
with indignation, and would have been strongly tempted
to refuse his attendance. Governor Hutchinson,
however
,
was sufficiently wise to leave all to the effect of
time and chance.
Whatever might be the workings of Lucretia's mind,
they were concealed by pride; and she herself firmly
believed that she thought of Somerville only as an
agreeable
companion, whose gayety and eloquence would
serve to enliven a wearisome voyage.
The event had been too long expected, to bring with
it any hurried preparations. True, Miss Sandford had
been in a continual bustle from the moment she heard
of the arrangement.
Jewels, lace, gauze, and ribbons were purchased; and
blue, white, and rose-coloured damask packed and
repacked
,
from morning till night.
Do you be sure and wear your pink silk, with the
set of rubies, when you are introduced to your uncle,
said she. That colour becomes your complexion
best, and I would wear it a good deal, if I were you.
Besides Captain Somerville admires it very much.
You need not blush so. You are going to take a long
voyage together; and, let me tell you, my dear,
propinquity
is a great thing.
Lucretia was about to speak of the certainty of his
attachment for Grace Osborne, but she knew it was a
topic on which the good lady was peculiarly irascible.
Besides, from complicated causes, both the young ladies
carefully avoided any allusion to the state of his
affections
;
and though, in every other respect, they treated
each other with the most girlish unreserve, Lucretia was
left in a state of painful uncertainty with regard to this
delicate subject.
During the brief space that intervened before her
departure
,
the young friends seemed to feel a feverish
anxiety to meet,yet when they met, they were
disconsolate
and silent.
When absent from each other, a thousand kind things
to be said would rush into the mind; but when present,
every thing gave way to a painful sense of approaching
separation.
At length the dreaded day arrived; and Governor
Hutchinson and his sister, Mr. Osborne and his children,
Doctor Byles and Doctor Willard, assembled to bid
farewell to the travellers.
Doctor Byles grasped Lucretia's hand with
affectionate
fervour, as he said, God bless you, Miss
Fitzherbert
,
and make you as happy as you deserve to be.
It was a moment of unfeigned regret, yet he could not
entirely dispossess himself of the spirit of raillery.
With a laughing glance, he added, And that is not
saying much for you, my young friend.
Doctor Willard expressed his good wishes with his
usual warmth and frankness. Governor Hutchinson,
always courtier-like in his manners, gave his parting
kiss with saddened and affectionate politeness.
Miss Sandford again and again strained her beloved
protege
to her heart. You have been a good child to
me, she said, and if I have not always guided you
as I should, you must take the will for the deed. She
tried to say something more, but unable to keep back the
crowding tears, the kind-hearted lady left the
apartment
.
Mr. Osborne's benignant countenance seemed to
express
anxiety as well as love; and Henry's voice lost a
little of its firmness as he pronounced, God bless you,
Lucretia.
As for Grace, her heart was too full for utterance.
Her breathing was quick and agitated; and she grasped
Lucretia's hand with a strength of which her tiny palm
seemed totally incapable. Her friend returned the
pressure in a manner equally earnest and protracted;
and as their hands parted, Somerville's ring burst
asunder
,
and fell at Miss Fitzherbert's feet. As he returned
it to Grace, she gave him a most eager and expressive
look. Its meaning he could not then inquire into, for
the carriage was at the door, and their farewell must
be brief and hasty.
The accident was unquestionably owing to defective
workmanship; nevertheless superstition painfully
mingled
with Miss Osborne's grief, as she laid the broken
relic in her casket;and as the carriage rolled the
young Englishman toward the wharf, he could think of
nothing but that trifling circumstance, and the look that
accompanied it.
CHAP. XV.
Mid foreign scenes, to fancy dear,
Remember still thy
home
is here.
Since
the various personages in our history are
removed
to such a distance from each other, we must take
the liberty to inspect some of the letters that passed
between them. During the last week in July, sooner
than her anxious friends had ventured to expect them,
letters arrived from Lucretia Fitzherbert. One of them
was as follows:
TO MISS GRACE OSBORNE.
Dear Grace,
Here I am, in the favoured land of the brave, the
intelligent, and the free. Yet even while I now repeat
it, I scarcely credit it. I feel as if I were walking in
my sleep; and it is only when I look out upon the
princely buildings around me, that I can realize I am
indeed
in London. Our voyage was very pleasant, with
the exception of sea-sickness. That, however, is a tax
we must all pay to
lord
Neptune for rocking us in his
cradle somewhat too roughly. (Pardon me. I forget
that the odious word
tax
is banished from the American
vocabulary.)
It was not until we came within sight of this ancient
city, that I felt the desolate sensations of an exile from
my native land. We cast anchor in the evening, among
a forest of tall black masts. The bowsprits threw their
grim shadows on the water, and seemed like so many
ugly sea-monsters, grinning defiance at each other.
The very stars looked terrific in their sublime beauty.
I gazed on them till I could almost imagine the Great
Bear shook his shaggy head above me, and that the
various fantastic shapes with which Chaldean
imagination
has peopled the zodiac, were frowning upon me in
their wrath.
Far off in the distance twinkled the many hundred
lights of London; and among all the busy haunts they
illuminated, poor Lucretia had not a single friend. It
was a sad, sickening thought, dearest Grace,and my
heart yearned for beloved America. I fancied you
seated at your work-table, listening to Henry as he read
some newly arrived volume, and the tears started to my
eyes.
Captain Somerville saw that I was melancholy, and
he did all he could to cheer me. We sat leaning over the
stern of the vessel, until a late hour, talking of you, and
watching the motion of the little boat as it rose and fell
with the rippling tide. The shore on either side was
noiseless as death; and the creaking of the rigging, and
the loud, protracted Hoa up Hoy of the distant
sailors
alone reminded us that they were from New
England.
Very early in the morning, a message was sent to
uncle
Fitzherbert,and according to aunt Sandford's
directions
,
I dressed myself as splendidly as possible; for
I must acknowledge, I felt exceedingly anxious
concerning
17
my reception. At our usual breakfasting hour,
Captain Somerville came to my cabin, and told me that
a carriage and four, with servants in the Fitzherbert
livery, were on the bank of the river. A boat was
immediately
sent from the vessel, and a footman returned
in it, bringing an invitation to Captain Somerville and
myself to breakfast at Tudor Lodge. Had you seen
my equipage, you would not wonder that my eyes were
a little dazzled. Phaeton himself might have been proud
of the horses; the servants were in rich liveries of grey
and silver; the polished harness glittered in the morning
sun; the Fitzherbert arms were gorgeously blazoned on
the pannels of the carriage; and the carriage itself was
much more superb than any thing I had ever seen in
New England.
We were whirled along by villas, hospitals, and
hotels
,any
one of which seemed to me sufficiently
magnificent
for a royal palace.
The coachman stopped before a large, noble-looking
building of Portland stone, with a piazza in front,
supported
by a range of Corinthian pillars. In a state of
dizzy incredulity I was handed up the steps, and paused
in the drawing-room until my arrival was announced.
After considerable delay, during which my heart
throbbed high with expectation and anxiety, I was
ushered
into the presence of my uncle. He received me
with great pomp and etiquette, scated in his crimson
velvet chair, in a morning robe of the same materials.
For the moment, I only remembered that he was the
first of my kindred I had ever seen, and I would have
rushed into his arms and wept. However, I
immediately
discovered that an oriental
salam
would be much
more acceptable to him. Indeed it was too evident that
my personal appearance disappointed him; but when
Captain Somerville introduced me, he took my hand
with stately courtesy, and bade me welcome to England.
Mrs. Edgarton, a distant relation, of middle age,
whose polished manners indicate habitual intercourse
with the fashionable world, superintends his
establishment
.
She seems intelligent and cultivated; but she
too is cold, dignified, and reserved.
The papers are full of the arrival of Miss Lucretia
Fitzherbert, the newly discovered American heiress,
niece of the Honourable Edmund Fitzherbert of Tudor
Lodge.
What would the world say, if they knew that, with
`all my blushing honours thick upon me,' I often
retire to my chamber, to think of Boston, and give
vent to my tears as they start up from their
fountain
of bitterness. Wealth is a glittering and much
coveted bauble; but the heart cannot nestle in it,
and cling to it, in its hour of loneliness. What do I
care for Turkey carpets, Parisian mirrors, and Chinese
vases, when every being around me is as chilling as the
tessellated marble of our grand saloon? Splendour may
please the unsated eye, but it cannot relieve a heart
bursting with the full tide of unemployed tenderness.
Do not think by this that I am unhappy. It only means
that I am not yet used to stiffened elegance and
magnificent
formality.
You cannot imagine with how much delight I have
accompanied my uncle around London and its environs.
The city itself, so varied in its beautyso crowded in
its grandeur. Then there is such lifesuch energy
such never-ceasing bustle. It is well called the heart of
Britain; for it seems heaving and bounding with the
vitality
of a whole empire. Of the suburbs, I am almost
tempted to say nothing; for I despair of giving you an
idea how lovely are the scenes among which the Thames
has spread the silver drapery of his couch. Turrets
and steeples peer above the foliage, as if on tiptoe to
view the dimpled course of this majestic river; clusters
of ancient elms dance gracefully to the wayward music
of the winds; venerable oaks stand like a firm phalanx
in their towering strongth; the fragile willows bend over
their watery mirror, sad and drooping, as if
passion-stricken
with their own shadows; and the blossoms are
so abundant in their luxuriant beauty, that one would
think Flora, enamoured of the spot, had flung all her
garlands there in frolic. The goddess, however, is not
so partial in the distribution of her favours. Your
American pastures are doubtless covered with wild
flowers. The Violet lifts up its timid blue eye in
supplication
,
as if loath to be crushed, even by your fairy
foot; the Anemone is gradually changing its rose-tint to
the purest white, like maidens outgrowing their
youthful
blushes; and the beautiful Trillium bows its starry
head beneath its dark green leaves, like a scared and
petted infant hiding its bashful face behind a mother's
sheltering arm.
Oh, when I think of all our pleasant rambles, our
unreserved
communications, and our playful disputes, it
seems as if my heart would burst its tenement, and
bound forward to meet you. I told Somerville so, this
morning; and I thought he sympathized in my
impatience
most warmly.
By the way, he called to take me to Westminster
Abbey,the first public place I have visited since my
arrival.
If Henry had not told you about it again and again, I
would inform you how I stood in the Poets' Corner, and
`held high converse with the mighty dead;' what
exultation
I felt when I saw that the sceptre had fallen
from the powerless hand of Queen Elizabeth,that
self-same cruel hand that signed the death warrant of
the beautiful Mary Stuart; and how, amid all this `pomp
and circumstance' of morality, the figure of Mr.
Nightingale
,
shielding his beloved wife from the impending
dart of death, was the only thing that touched me with
melancholy. I was indeed powerfully excited by the
whole scene. Association seems to hold her court in
this mansion of departed glory; and as her magic
fingers
touch the octaves in the human soul, imagination
runs rapidly over the intermediate notes. When I came
from the long and gloomy labyrinths of this ancient
abbey
,
I felt as if I had actually been in Elysium, talking
with kings, heroes, statesmen, and poets. Why did not
Henry tell us how his heart ached when he passed from
that still, solemn sanctuary of the dead, into all the
tumult
of this noisy city? But then he never speaks with
17 *
enthusiasm; unless, indeed, you rouse him up about
American taxation. Well! perhaps the glowing
embers
,
kept alive on the secret shrine of Apollo, burned
with more intense and consuming heat, than Cybele's
torches, flaring on the midnight air.
I shall never have done, if I write all I wish to say;
for the thoughts rush into my mind so furiously that they
push each other down in their course. Most sincere and
respectful affection to your good father; and to all my
friends the kindest wishes they can desire from me.
Write soon, and remember to speak of Gertrude
Percival
.
Do not forget me, dearest Grace, nor suffer any
one I love to forget me.
With heart-felt, soul-felt affection for you all, I am
as ever,
Lucretia Fitzherbert
.
Grosvenor Square,
June 10, 1766.
Letters of similar import arrived for Governor
Hutchinson
and Miss Sandford; but none other was sent to
the Osborne family.
Has wealth and splendour so soon dazzled him?
thought Grace. Have a few brief months extinguished
the love he said would be eternal? If he can be so
capricious
,
it is well for me that I was not united to him.
My father and brother never confided in his principles
why did I doubt their judgment? Well, it is but a
painful struggle with myself at the most; and I can
make it the more cheerfully since they are ignorant
of it.
Whether to hear of a lover so gay, gallant, and
attentive
to another, without receiving one line from him to
indicate his kind remembrance, would not have awakened
similar suspicions in any mind, we know not. Certain
it is that every allusion Lucretia had made to Captain
Somerville, was exceedingly painful to Miss Osborne,
excepting where she wrote, We talked of you till a
late hour. She thought upon the subject until her fears
ripened into conviction; and though she resolved to
rejoice in the prospects of her friend, she could not read
her letter without weeping in the bitterness of her heart.
To these feelings may be partly attributed the sadness
that pervades the following epistle.
TO MISS LUCRETIA FITZHERBERT.
Dear Lucretia,
We last week received your long and affectionate
letter. I was delighted, but not dazzled, with your
picture
of London. I love my own quiet chamber better
than I should marble saloons or Corinthian piazzas.
Yet our humble mansion has been sad enough since you
left us. My father's health fails daily; and long, long
before you return to us, Lucretia, I fear the dear
venerable
old man will have gone to his last home. It
grieves me to think of it. Yet why should they whose
lives have been stainless, and their purposes all holy,
shrink from the hand that enrobes them with
immortality
.
Young as I am, there are times when I would lay
down my weary, aching head, and sleep, never more
to wake in this cold world, as cheerfully as the tired
infant presses the soft pillow of its cradle.
I know this is not the right spirit. Those who would
take up the cross and follow their Divine Master, must
be resigned to live as well as to die. Yet how hard it is
to endure life, when those we have loved are dropping
around us like the leaves of autumn;when the smiles
that have been as sunshine to the soul, have left it all
dark and lonely; and tones that have been dear, yea,
very dear to us, are heard no longer. I am foolishly
melancholy just this moment; and I am childish enough
to dip my pen in my heart.
My father's sickness and uncommon depression of
spirits casts a shadow over every hing. Not only has
it rendered our dwelling dismal,but the sky does not
seem so blue, nor the grass so green, as it did last
summer
.
You, I dare say would make some sparkling
metaphor concerning such a state of things; but I have
not the gift. Henry smiled when I showed him your
letter, and said it did one as much good to read any
thing of yours, as it did to see a bed of tulips blown
about by the wind. You see that he has imagination,
my dear friend. He has enthusiasm, too,though few
discover it. Ought I to tell you, or ought I not, that when
he returned your letter, I found what you had written
of him cut out? He seems in excellent spirits,always
doing something to make us happy and cheerful; but
there are things the heart never forgets, you know, how
calmly soever it may remember them. I have not seen
him roused on the subject of taxation lately. Indeed
the times are now so peaceful and quiet, that it is
seldom
mentioned even when Doctor Willard is here. By
the way, I read a part of your letter to him; and I
assure
you, his expressive black eyes grew brighter and
brighter at every line. I wonder he was not captivated
with you, Lucretia,you are so very much like each
other. You cannot tell how solicitous he is concerning
our good father,how anxious about every symptom,
how enlivening in his conversation whenever the invalid
can bear it,and how still, kind, and careful, when his
spirits are exhausted. It is very painful not to repay
the love of a heart so generous and tender; and when
day after day I meet the same affectionate glance, and
hear the same mild, insinuating tones, it seems such a
deep and stinging reproach to my ingratitude, that I
half believe it possible;but the affections are
stubborn
things and are not easily bent according to our
wishes.
I have received two letters from Gertrude since you
left. They reside at a beautiful country-seat, not far
from Montreal; and they have both sent the most
urgent
invitations for us to visit them this summer. She
has improved wonderfully in her hand-writing. `Who,'
she asks, `can do otherwise, when Edward Percival is
the instructer?' Still her letters are as stiff, straight,
and precise as Madam Sandford. Will you pardon the
comparison? With regard to Canada, even if my father
were well enough, I should not have spirit sufficient to
make the exertion. Long may they live to enjoy their
romantic attachment. Mr. Percival has sent me a very
neat and handsome set of jewels. I thanked him,
because
I knew he meant it kindly; but I shall never wear
them. If you had not a variety much more elegant, I
would send them to you. Do you know Henry has at
length persuaded me to have my portrait taken? Yes,
there I am in our little breakfast parlour, smiling as
graciously
as if I looked on absent friends. My brother
says, `Tell Lucretia I am the same sincere
well-wisher
;'
and my father adds, `You must leave a corner of
your paper, that I may try to hold a pen long enough to
give her my blessing.' In order to comply with his
request
,
I must close by saying,
I am your very affectionate
Grace Osborne
.
After this letter had been twice read it occurred to
Miss Osborne that Captain Somerville might have
possibly
sent a letter, and that the precious document might
have been detained by accident or misfortune. With a
trembling hand she wrote,
P. S. I forgot to tell you that we have inquired
after
Molly Bradstreet to no purpose. I regret it; for
our curiosity was as much excited as yours. Should
Captain Somerville ever ask about the rose, he left with
me, you may tell him it is carefully nurtured and
blossoms
finely.
On the last page were a few sentences written in a
weak, irregular hand. They were as follows:
My dear Child,
Never was `news from a far country' more
welcome
than your letter. None of us knew how dear you
were, till you were gone from us. Poor Grace goes
from room to room, and looks at every memento of you
with such utter sadness, that one would think you were
actually in your grave; and when she hears a knock,
she will sometimes start,and then check herself, as
she says, `I was thinking Lucretia was at the door.'
Alas! how apt we all are to give the freshness and
vigour
of our affections to earthly objects, and thus have
nothing to offer our Heavenly Father, but `the lame, the
halt, and the blind.' The heathen offered the fairest
flowers and the choicest fruits to their gods, and shall
we, on whom the gospel has shone, do less than they?
While the cup of life is sparkling at your eager lips, do
not forget the kind hand which offered it. Remember,
my dear, there is a friend on whom to rely when all
others fall us. There is no public news of importance.
It has pleased the Lord to give us peace, if not security.
One `burning and shining light' has been removed from
us. I mean the much lamented Doctor Mayhew. I
need not talk of his talents to one who heard his
eloquent
sermon on the repeal of the Stamp Act; but of
his piety, his integrity, his industry, and zeal, I would,
had I strength, write for hours. During his short life,
he did much in the cause of civil and religious liberty.
I do not believe there ever was mortal man that more
faithfully served his country and his God. Alas! that
he left not his mantle behind him.
I have written this at many different times, and with
great pain, my dear girl. My heart says more; but my
trembling hand will not convey it. Yet a little while
longer, and the soul will drop its burden of clay. I can
only add, God bless you,even with the greatest of all
blessings,a disposition to do his will.
Your affectionate father,
James Osborne
.
Queen st.
August 1st, 1766.
Some readers may have the curiosity to break the seal
of Somerville's letter to Governor Hutchinson; though
perhaps when they find it so deeply tinged with the
politics
of the day, they may think they pay somewhat
dearly for their whistle.
TO HIS HONOUR THOMAS HUTCHINSON.
Dear Uncle,
I delivered your letters according to their directions;
and I do not hesitate to say that the general opinion here
is entirely in favour of your views. It is, however,
very difficult to ascertain what course will be taken, for
never was there such a heterogeneous, unintelligible
mass as the present ministry. They are made up of the
shreds and patches of all political opinions,a confused
jumble of every shade and hue of whiggism.
The Marquis of Rockingham did indeed come into
the government at a peculiarly difficult crisis. The
Regency Bill of course made an enemy of Lord Bute,
because the public chose to implicate him in its
odium
;
the Duke of Grafton has forsaken their standard,
because he is offended at their treatment of Wilkes;
Chatham is as wavering and inconsistent as ever, and his
powerful friend, the excellent Duke of Cumberland,
died soon after his administration began. On the whole,
it is evident that another transformation will soon take
place. Pitt seems to have the power to lord it over
king and parliament; how he will exert his influence
nobody knowsunless he has some conjecture himself,
which his undecided character renders very doubtful.
That confoundedly clever lawyer, young Burke, gashes
him deeply in the public papers. The articles in
question
possess abundance of good sense as well as cutting
irony. The resolution against general warrants, passed
in the House of Commons, has brought Wilkes back to
London. He is here threatening to annoy the
government
,
or make his fortune out of its fears. The plan of
American taxation is by no means given up. Charles
Townsend is as eager for it, as he is for office. He
thinks to make it go down, by giving it a different name.
He has not, like me, seen an American mob, heard Otis
speak, and Doctor Willard talk. You will judge what
views he and others entertain by the letters and
documents
that accompany this.
Mr. Fitzherbert talks much of what you have done
for his niece; and seems to think he cannot load me
with favours enough to evince his gratitude. He is a
formal, and somewhat fastidious old man; but when the
crust is once broken, he proves to have a warm heart.
He is a professed connoisseur in female beauty,and he
was of course disappointed in Miss Fitzherbert. He
is unbounded in his hospitality, and his servants' hall
shows much of the prodigality of feudal times. I shall,
if possible, induce him to keep open doors for the choice
literary spirits that are now clustering together in this
18
metropolis. This will bring Lucretia forward to the
best advantage; and perhaps we all love our friends
better when we have reason to be proud of them. I
can see that her vivacity and good sense gain upon his
affections daily. She is indeed a fine girl. No one
can know her without admiring her.
The mystery concerning the report of Mr.
Fitzherbert's
death is all explained. When you sent to
England
in 1760, to inquire concerning Lucretia's
connexions
,
he was very sick at Manilla, and a profligate
relation
of his palmed the story upon his creditors, in order
to relieve himself from temporary embarrassment. Mr.
Fitzherbert is so indignant at this unfeeling deception,
that he will not consent to see him.
There is a great intimacy between Mr. Fitzherbert
and the Marquis of Rockingham. He procured Burke
the situation of private secretary to his lordship.
I send you an elegant edition of Swift, lately
published
,which
please to accept.
Respects to Madam Sandford,and kind
remembrance
to Doctor Byles and the Osbornes.
I am your humble and obedient servant.
Frederic Somerville
.
Piccadilly,
June 12th, 1766.
CHAP. XVI.
There are feelings that no human agency can limit; and mental wounds
too deep for the art of man to heal.
The Spy
.
Mr. Osborne's
prediction with regard to the repeal
of the Stamp Act proved too true. The subject of
American taxation was again discussed in the British
parliament, and eventuated in the Revenue Act of '67;
which consisted of sundry duties on tea, glass, paper,
and painters' colours. This law was palmed upon the
Colonies under the name of an
external
tax for the
regulation of commerce; and the framers of it
presumed
it would not interfere with their established
prejudices
with regard to
internal
taxation.
However, Burke has well said that to tax and to
please, no more than to love and to be wise, is not given
to men. This fine-spun scheme of policy was received
with even more indignation than had yet been expressed.
Mr. Osborne, weakened by lingering illness, traced
the consequences of this second attack on the liberties
of his country, with such intense anxiety, that the
faculties
of the venerable patriot were completely deranged;
and America was thus deprived of his counsels at a time
when she most needed the wisdom of all her sons.
His insanity seemed to take its colouring from the
mildness and humility of his character. It never
assumed
a wild and boisterous appearance; but there
were times when he would refrain from food for days in
succession,and pray with the earnest pleadings of
indulged
infancy, that the eyes of the king might be
opened
,
before they awoke on the blood and ruin of his
fairest
territories.
The heart of Henry would ache almost to bursting,
when he watched him in these wayward moods. Oh,
England! he would say, as he pressed his hand to his
forehead,Oh, England! what a wreck has thou
made.
Did you speak of England? cried the unfortunate
father, starting from his trance,I tell you, young man,
that the sceptre shall depart from her; and the lawgiver
from between her feet. The time will come when she
will rend her purple robe, and mourn her folly in
sack-cloth
and ashes. I saw it, muttered he, looking
upward
with a vacant and frightened aspect,I saw it in
the clouds. Blood and destruction were in its train.
My dear father, said Henry, think of the God in
whom you have always trusted.
I do, my son, I do. I have prayed to Him; and
verily He hath heard me in my affliction. But. added
he, lowering his voice to a most impressive whisper,
Liberty is in her shroud! I saw her pass by in the robes
of the tomb. Then the habitual associations of the
pulpit would come over him; and he would point to
heaven as he exclaimed, But there is a resurrection,
my hearersthere is a resurrection.
The imagination shrinks from decay of any kind;
but what is so dreadful as the wreck of our proudest
prerogative? What so awful as the ruins of mind? To
poor Grace, her father's situation seemed an almost
insupportable burthen of distress; yet it was really
salutary. One great absorbing affliction left no room
for petty griefs; and the disappointed girl found in
constant occupation and unwearied anxiety, the very
best medicine for a heart sickening with hope deferred.
A beloved object is always encircled with a radiant
halo, which brightens every thing around it; and
notwithstanding
its absence had rendered the sky less blue,
and the grass less green, Miss Osborne, fortunately for
herself, had not leisure to be always dwelling upon the
change. Her father was now her daily care, and her
nightly dream; but though his children often succeeded
in their attempts to sooth and divert him, their kind
attentions produced no permanent effects.
Doctor Willard had hopes that new scenes and change
of air might restore him; and therefore recommended
a journey to Canada. Accordingly, in midsummer,
1767, the whole family set out upon their northern
expedition
.
Mr. Osborne had been beyond Albany in 1753, when
most of the country was in primeval wildness. But
fourteen years had elapsed, yet the scenery had in many
places great pretensions to rural beauty; and so rapid
had been the growth of towns and villages, that it
seemed
as if the hand of magic had at once invested its
grandeur with the robe of gracefulness.
In his intervals of rationality, the invalid noticed these
changes, and would speak of them with rapture;then
18 *
he would compare the past prosperity of his country
with its future misery, and the light of reason would
again glimmer, and sink in its socket.
His weak state of mind and body rendered it
absolutely
necessary to travel by short stages, and keep him
free from all mental excitement; but the spirit of the
country was so universally roused, that they found the
latter exceedingly difficult. The rumour that a
gentleman
from Massachusetts, crazed in the cause of liberty,
was travelling to the North, went before them; and not
only did they every where meet with the most
compassionate
sympathy, but frequently, as their humble
equipage
drove from the inn, a few, less judicious in their
kindness, would shout, Hurra for New-England!
Long life to the patriot! At Albany, Grace
watched
by her father until she saw him in a quiet slumber,
before she descended to the supper room. At the door
she met the landlady, who, in a cautious whisper, asked
if they had ordered tea. The mild and timid beauty
answered in a tone of unusual decision, No, madam,
I am an American.
Henry, suspecting the nature of the question, added,
And no American woman ought for a moment to forget
that she can do much for a cause in which husbands and
sons, fathers and brothers, are alike suffering. The
countenance of the hostess brightenedshe courtesied,
begged a thousand pardons,said they were exactly of
her way of thinking, and left the apartment.
Our good father sleeps quietly, does he not?
inquired
Henry. On being answered in the affirmative,
he observed, I need not caution you, my dear girl, to
be careful about giving such spirited answers when he is
waking.
I am not very apt to speak on politics, replied
Grace; for it is a subject on which I do not love to
hear ladies talk; but in these times, it is fitting they
should act. If John Dudley, and all the honest farmers
in the country, can refrain from mutton, in order to
raise wool enough to manufacture our own cloth, and
vex the English merchants,I surely can dispense with
the petty luxury of tea.
Well said, my patriotic sister, rejoined Henry,
playfully kissing her forehead. I really think you
could proselyte the most inveterate tory to the good
cause, if you were to set about it in earnest.
A shade of melancholy passed over her face. There
was something in that word tory that called up a
thousand recollections of auld lang syne. Captain
Somerville had written one letter to her brother, in a
style strangely studied and formal. She herself had
not received a single line; and Lucretia, ignorant how
much she was wounding her friend, spoke of him as
her almost constant companion.
Perhaps this unaccountable neglect had given
additional
fervour to political feelings, ever deeply imbedded
in Miss Oshorne's heart, though her bashful lips had
seldom given them utterance. Certain it is, that our
best and most disinterested motives will always, upon
strict inquiry, be found more complex than we had
imagined.
The place which their Canadian friends had chosen
for a residence, seemed like an Eden, pure and lovely
enough to drive away the disease and misery attendant
on mortality. It was one of those numerous islands,
which the St. Lawrence so well loves to encircle in his
arms. The house was situated at the foot of a thickly
wooded hill, then rich with the verdant foliage of
summer
.
The trees threw their broad, deep shadows along
the mighty river; and the tasteful simplicity of the
cottage
,
reflected on its majestic surface, seemed like the
dove of contentment folding its soft wing over the
waters.
The heart could not, in its most craving mood, require
a more cordial welcome than our travellers received
from Edward Percival and his young wife; and Henry
eagerly indulged the hope that their unpretending
kindness
,
together with the tranquillity of their sequestered
situation, would ultimately win back the scattered
intellects
of his venerable father.
However, it seemed, for a while, as if the very
peacefulness
of his retreat was converted into a source of
uneasiness. With the waywardness of lunacy, he
connected
every thing around him with the painful subject
that had unnerved his system. Even the melody of
the woods was torture to him. Here we are, said
he, listening to the singing of birds, when every soul
should be up and active in the cause of freedom.
Hark! Do you hear the oar of the smuggler, as he
sweeps round the cove? He goes to offer to New
England what she should never taste.
Sometimes the bright, still surface of the river, with
luxuriance and beauty reposing on its bosom, awakened
sensations of utter wretchedness; and he would lay his
hand impressively on Henry's shoulder, and exclaim,
Young man, you will live to see that water stained with
the blood of your brethren. I see it, continued he,
covering his eyes,I see it gushing at every pore
At a later period, when the St. Lawrence foamed and
dashed its angry answer to the autumnal storms, he
would say, Yes,fret and roar in thy wrath,the
storm will come, and burst in fury over us all. The roar
of the cannon, and the burden of the fleet will come
upon you in an hour when you think not of it.
Grace and her friend watched over him in these hours
of desolation, with that soothing and judicious
tenderness
in which woman alone is skilled. Day after day,
the sick man might be seen taking his slow and
circumscribed
walk, leaning on his daughter and Mrs. Percival.
Those who have seen Peele's fine moral picture of the
Court of Death, could readily imagine Grace, with her
perfect symmetry of feature, and transparent fairness of
complexion, personified in the figure of Virtue guiding
the feeble step of Age; and had the expression of
Pleasure been innocent rather than voluptuous, the
dark-brown hair, brilliant eyes, and glowing cheek of
Gertrude, might well have been mistaken for the living,
breathing original of the painting.
A rational and placid smile would sometimes play
around the old man's lips, as he looked on his youthful
nurses; and his spirit, softened and bowed down within
him, would pour itself forth in prayers for their
happiness
.
The mind is a noble instrument.Even the discord
of its broken keys has something of music in its
wildness
;
and oftentimes, when it seems all disordered and
defaced, there is one uninjured string that thrills
responsive
to the musician's touch.
The ideal forms of beauty still float, in all their
correctness
of outline before the painter's eye; the ear of
the minstrel is still tremblingly alive to every combination
of sound; and the heart that has been bewildered by
sudden bereavement, needs but a glance or a tone like
those of the beloved object, to recall in a connected
series the whole detail of its pleasures and its pains.
Thus it was with Mr. Osborne. The latent divinity,
which had so long been shrouded in darkness, gleamed
only in the avenues of piety; and the frequency of
prayer, mixed with the consolations of Scripture, by
degrees scattered the clouds that obscured its
brightness
.
Business had recalled Henry at the end of a few
weeks; but Grace and her father, at the urgent
entreaty
of their friends, remained in Canada until the
Spring of 1768.
Henry's letters during this time were once or twice
accompanied by packages from England. In these
epistles, Lucretia made no further complaints of
magnificent
formality; on the contrary, her expressions
were those of a heart reeling with its fulness; and
poor deserted Grace felt them enter into her soul, like
sharpened steel. These feelings were the harder to be
borne, because no one sympathized with them; for what
timidity and a fear of disapprobation had at first
concealed
,
pride would not now suffer her to reveal.
Gertrude
did indeed notice that too close attendance on a
sick bed had sunk her cheek, and dimmed her eye; and
she affectionately remonstrated with her on the danger
she was incurring. Mr. Percival, at the suggestion of
his wife, made a slight allusion to her ill health in one of
his letters to Henry, which immediately brought the
affectionate
brother to her side. Grace denied that she
had been ill; and so much was she enlivened by
Henry's
unexpected presence, that her assertion was not
difficult to be believed.
Another pleasant disappointment awaited his arrival.
His father had enjoyed two months of uninterrupted
rationality; and now talked of England and taxation
with calmness and consistency.
When his son congratulated him on his recovery, he
replied, I was too anxious to work out our deliverance
by human wisdomI did not place my trust in Him
who holdeth the nations in the hollow of his hand. Let
my chastisement teach us humility. And now, as
soon as the roads are sufficiently settled, I suppose you
will be ready to go home and tell of the good effects of
a Canadian winter? said Grace.
Never speak of home, said Mrs. Percival; you
have almost taught us to be unable to live without you.
Yes, our hearts as well as our habitation are large
enough for you all, added her husband. Your
health is too slender to continue your pastoral duties,
and young men like your son are needed in the
Canadas
.
But more needed in New England, answered
Mr. Osborne. We must not suffer the prospect of
wealth or ease to seduce us from the standard of truth
and liberty. Besides, my friends, we are already
under obligations which money can never repay, had I
millions to offer you.
We too have had our obligations, said Gertrude;
and she sighed when she thought of the deathbed of
her father;but to tell the truth, I crave still more
from you. If Grace would but remain a year with me,
it would add very much to my happiness
She may do as she pleases, said the father,at
the same time looking very sorrowful.
I would do any thing to evince my gratitude to you,
Mrs. Percival, said Grace; but I cannot leave my
only parent; and truly never did a home-sick child so
long for a mother's smile, as I do to see Boston.
Lucretia will be there soon, I suppose, observed
Mrs. Percival; and her claims are of course prior to
mine.
I forgot to tell you that I had a letter from Doctor
Willard this morning, said Henry. He mentions that
two regiments of royal troops are about to sail for
America
;
and that Captain Somerville is one of the
commanders
.
He likewise wrote that it was rumoured he
would be married before be sailed.
Grace looked deadly pale,but dared not trust
herself
to ask a question. To whom inquired Mrs.
Percival.
To Miss Fitzherbert, replied the younger Osborne.
Very probably, however, it is a mere report, founded
on the circumstance of their going out to England
together
.
But really, dear Grace, you cannot conceal
from me that you are ill, very ill.
His father gave him a look of much meaning. It
said, as plainly as looks could say it, That fatal
delusion
is strong as ever; and Grace perceiving herself
the object of distressed attention, kindly replied to their
inquiries, and retired to her own chamber.
Is it not very strange, said Mr. Osborne, that
Captain Somerville has not fulfilled his promise of
writing to you?
Not at all strange, replied Henry. Ambition is
the only steady principle that guides his course. In all
things else he is as volatile and changeable as the wind.
My acquaintance was a pleasant recreation to him while
in Boston, no doubt; but of what consequence is the
friendship of a young lawyer, who has neither wealth
nor patronage to offer him?
You judge more harshly than usual, said Percival.
I speak my cool, unbiassed opinion, rejoined
Henry
.
I always admired his talents,but I never
respected
his character; and I was always aware that our
acquaintance was of that bright, meteor-like kind, that
often happens between people of no real congeniality.
And what do you think of this rumour about royal
troops? inquired Percival.
19
It is what I have long expected. And I think they
will soon be recalled,else few will live to carry back
a description of New England.
I believe you most heartily, rejoined Percival;
and the God who has kindled such a flame in the breast
of two millions of freemen, has surely ordained that
the rebels shall be free.
And we ought to be on the spot, my son, said Mr.
Osborne. Boston will soon need all the strength and
wisdom of her children.
Next week, if you please, sir, replied Henry.
Mr. and Mrs. Percival warmly contended that it was
too soon; that the roads were bad; that Grace was not
strong enough to endure the fatigue; and that they could
not yet part with them. Grace, however, exerted
herself
to appear in good health and spirits,the Spring
was unusually favourable for travellingand on the
first week of May they departed for Boston,where
they soon after arrived in health and safety.
CHAP. XVII.
Alas! the tale is quickly told
His love hath felt the curse of gold!
And he is bartering his heart
For that in which it hath no part.
There's many an ill that clings to love;
But this is one all else above;
For love to bow before the name
Of this world's treasure; shame! oh, shame!
The Improvisatrice
TO MISS GRACE OSBORNE.
Dear Grace,
How very seldom you write; and how wo-begone
are your epistles. Do not think me heartless with
regard
to your father's sickness. Indeed, I have felt most
keenly for you and for him; but I have not the least
doubt that the fine, clear climate of Canada will restore
him; and even if the event should be the worst that we
can fear, you must not thus mourn away your young
existence. When you wrote last, you were just on the
point of starting for Montreal; and I assure you I
envied
you the excursion. I wish I could have visited
Gertrude before I came to England. Not only because
I loved her more than I ever loved any one in so short a
time; but I am really ashamed when asked about
Niagara
and the Lakes, to say that I have never seen them.
People here are not aware how very unusual it is for
American ladies to go out of sight of their own
chimnies
;
and as for space, they do not seem to imagine
there is such a thing on the other side of the Atlantic.
They would ask a Vermontese about the Blue Ridge,
or a Georgian about Niagara, as readily as I should
question a Londoner about St. Paul's, or beg a
description
of Snowdon from a Welchman born and bred
within
sight of its cloud-kissing peak.
During the whole of last winter we had the finest
collection of company in the world. Johnson, Burke,
Sir Joshua Reynolds, Garrick, and Goldsmith, spent an
evening with us, almost as regularly as they did at the
Turk's Head, Gerrard-street, Soho. The mere contact
of such great minds is enough to inspire one with genius.
I have the good fortune to be a favourite with that
famous
cynic, Samuel Johnson;principally, I believe,
because I treat him with the most profound reverence,
and never contradict his opinions. To Sir Joshua, I
could listen forever,because he talks of what I
understand
and love. He has described half the fine
paintings
in Italy so vividly that I imagine I have seen them.
Burke is becoming famous as a speaker; and if he is
half as delightful in parliament as he is in the
drawing-room
,
I do not wonder at his fame. `His talk,' says
Johnson, `is the ebullition of his mind; he does not
talk from a desire of distinction, but because his mind
is full.' It would amuse Henry to hear the political
disputes between these two great men. Johnson sneers
about `whig dogs,' speaks of America as an uncivilized
land,and says it would puzzle any one to tell what
good the discovery of it has done the world. Burke
contends that our country will eventually be one of the
greatest on the globe,and says that if Britain ever
loses her American Colonies, she will part with a jewel
worth her whole regalia. It is curious to observe how
sharp contention will call forth passions, which we little
folks can hardly imagine to exist in such mighty minds.
These great men remind me of Alfred's horse, cut in
the side of a chalk-hill in Berkshire. At a distance, it
looks like a fine warlike steed; but as you approach it,
all its fine proportions are lost; and at last you begin to
doubt whether it be really an animal, or merely a surface
accidentally indented by wind and storm. Among all
the geniuses to whom I have been introduced, Goldsmith
is my favourite. He loves a broad laugh, but never a
malicious one; and his constant flow of humour
originates
in fulness,not in vacuity.
We shall soon return to the city. I must say I
regret
to leave our country-seat; for thickly as this
beautiful
island is gemmed with mansions and parks, cottages
and gardens, it can boast few spots so cultivated and so
varied. The Thames sparkles before it, like a broad,
bright line of silver on the green robe of Summer. In
the distance are seen the verdant hills of Kent and
Surry
;
around whose majestic brows the setting sun daily
twines his topaz coronet of light. In every direction
the foliage is delightfully interspersed with majestic
domes, venerable turrets, and light, airy, graceful spires.
Boats of all sizes and descriptions, from the eight-oared
barge to the slender skiff, are gliding up and down the
river, like a troop of wild swans on the Potomac, giving
life and motion to its slumbering beauty.
19*
Within doors, I can feast my eye on a fine gallery
of paintings. Here are the pictures of Rembrandt,
steeped in sunshine; the gods and goddesses of Guido,
more like the seraphs of a Christian heaven, than the
deities of Olympus; and the sublime productions of
Raphael, beaming with an expression of soul, which his
pencil alone could give. But there is one picture here
that seems to me like dreaming of a distant friend,
troubling while it pleases me. I is among the family
portraits which decorate my bed-chamber; and was
taken, I am told, for my grandmother Fitzherbert. It
is Gertrude Percival to the life! The same high,
intellectual
forehead; the same Aurora freshness of
complexion
;
the same majestic contour of neck and
shoulders
.
I do not know how they would compare together;
but I thought the likeness so striking, that I have
employed
Sir Joshua Reynolds to make me a copy to bring to
America. What associations that name awakens! how
much the very sound makes my heart leap toward you.
Yet my affections cling to good old England. I love
her country scenes embosomed in forests, and garlanded
with flowers; I love the rapid pulsation of her mighty
capital; I love to gaze on her far-stretching galaxy of
genius; and, `last, not least' I love the bravery,
frankness
,
and hospitality of her sons.
One other association knocks at my heart, dearer
than all that taste or reason can furnish. It was here I
first heard declarations of love from the only man I ever
wished to please. There was a time when you
indulged
yourself in a little gentle raillery about my sliding
heart;and why, dear Grace, did you cease to be
unreserved
on the subject? I once supposed that Captain
Somerville had a powerful advocate in your own feelings.
Was it so? and did you reject him from the dictates of
judgment? Or are you still a stranger to that mysterious
affinity which draws two young souls toward each other?
Perhaps timidity was the only enemy our patriotic young
friend had to contend with; and after all that is past
and gone, Mrs. Willard may stand ready to greet Mrs.
Somerville, on her return to America.I forgot, when I
said Mrs. Somerville,for uncle will not consent to our
marriage, unless the Captain will take my family name;
and he is now going through the necessary forms for
that purpose. I wish you could have a share in the
ceremony that gives me a hand invaluable to my heart,
though it proved unacceptable to yours.
When you write again, I trust your father will be
quite recovered. You do not know how grateful I am
for the kind wishes he always sends me. Kiss his
venerable forehead, and tell him that, to such a generous
creditor, I shall never be a bankrupt in affection. I
thought happiness had dried up the fountain of my tears;
but your last letter was so sad that I wept in spite of
myself.
Ever yours with all the intense affection I am
capable
of feeling.
Lucretia Fitzherbert
.
Fitzherbert Hall,
Nov. 15, 1767.
TO MISS LUCRETIA FITZHERBERT.
Dear Lucretia,
I found your letter dated November 15th, waiting our
arrival, when we returned from Canada. Gertrude and
I wrote you a crowded epistle last autumn; I wonder
you had not received it before you wrote. She is very
happy. Indeed her affectionate heart deserves it. Had
she been a sister in very truth, she could not have
loved me more, or been more kindly attentive to my
father.
I have heard you speak of people in whom delicacy
and refinement seemed like instinct. Mrs. Percival's
certainly is so. She perceived that images and pictures
of the saints distressed my good father (his soul you
know entereth not into their strange worship)nothing
was said;but the morning after our arrival, I noticed
they had all disappeared. I cannot tell such fine stories
about my Canadian excursion, as you tell of England.
I was ever seated at my father's bed-side, or supporting
his arm as he walked. You will think this was
wearisome
;
but I assure you it is like cordial to the spirit to
meet affection in the languid eye of sickness, and to see
blessings and thanks quiver on lips that have not strength
to utter them. Truly, I would not have exchanged my
solitary task for all the treasures of Burke's eloquence,
or Goldsmith's wit. Your speaking of pictures reminds
me of a Magdalen which an Italian artist painted for
Mrs. Percival. It would doubtless appear mean to your
practised eye; but it found its way to my heart. The
countenance is pale and melaneholylike one who has
loved and been forsakenone who has early learned
that the flowers of earth wither away; but there is
devotion in the uplifted eye, which speaks of better
hopes than this vain world can offer. So purely did it
breathe of celestial joys, that my spirit fluttered like a
captive bird,and I would fain have gone away and
slept the last quiet sleep.
My father is recovering fast. A gentle light beams
from his eye, and his step is firm even as it was wont to
be, when you and I and all of us were happy together.
Long long, Lucretia, may you enjoy the scenes
you love so well, and the society you so well know how
to adorn. I am often selfish enough to wish you were
here. However, the luxuriance of the park and the
green-house must be yours;enough for me, the
trembling
little wild flower that breathes its fragrance at my
feet. Blessings on its innocent beauty! It smiles
through a delicious existence, and at the end of one
brief season droops its dying head on the bosom of the
turf that nourished it. Why should we envy them?
Are not mortals as fragile as they? I love flowers.
They speak of nature, and they speak of God. I would
rather have them cluster around my grave and moisten
it with the dew-drop of morning and evening, than to
repose beneath the cold, heavy monuments of
West-minster
Abbey.
May you ever be happy, dear Lucretia;
particularly
may you be fortunate in that important stepthe
only one, save death, which can never be retraced.
Your allusion to Doctor Willard was very painful to me.
My heart is not cold and unfeelingperhaps it has
thought on domestic happiness too deeply,too fondly;
but the day dream has vanished.
My kind remembrance to your intended husband.
The blessing of Israel's God be with you.
Your affectionate
Grace Osborne
.
Queen st.,
June 30th, 1768.
TO MISS SALLY SANDFORD.
Dear Aunt,
I last week received a package from Boston,
containing
letters from uncle Hutchinson, Grace Osborne,
and yourself.
Many thanks for your bridal sash. I shall most
certainly wear it at the important time for which it was
designed.
Captain Somerville now writes his name Frederic
Somerville Fitzherbert. I was sorry uncle's family
pride required this sacrifice. There seems to be
something
degrading in the bridegroom's losing his name
instead
of the bride. However he seems resolved to
repay this acquiescence by the most rapid promotion.
He is now Colonel of his Majesty's 14th regiment of
dragoons. I have repeatedly told you, that uncle is one
of the most formal, precise men in the world. You
would have been amused with his reception of Captain
Somerville, the day he came to make proposals in due
form. It was at an hour when he did not usually receive
visiters; Mrs. Edgarton had just placed the bolster of
the couch so that he could recline comfortably; and I,
like a dutiful niece, stood ready to read the newspaper,
which had just been brought in,when the servant
entered
,
and, making a low bow said, `Captain
Somerville
is in the library, wishing to speak with your
honour.'
`Show him up, John.'
`He wishes to speak with you alone, if it pleases
you.'
I guessed his errand,for I had heard some
intimation
of it in the picture gallery, the day before. My uncle seemed to suspect too; for he chucked me under
the chin, as he rose, and said, `These nieces are dear
creatures to an old, ease-loving man.'
Captain Somerville afterwards told me that when he entered the library, he made one of his most stately
bows, and inquired, `What is your business, sir?'
`I came to speak of your niece,and to ask
permission
'
`Tomorrow at four o'clock, post meridian, I will give
you an audience, sir. You are aware this is not my
hour of business;'and with another haughty
inclination
of the head, he left him to his meditations.
Captain Somerville, somewhat daunted by his
repulsive
manner, came at the appointed time. Without
answering his salutation, or even requesting him to be seated, uncle said in a hurried, business tone, `Are you willing to take the name and arms of Fitzherbert?'
After a moment's hesitation, Somerville replied in
the affirmative. `Follow me then,' said he; and he
led the way to the gallery, where I was seated, copying
a Flemish landscape. He threw the door open with an
air of great importance, pointed to a vacant seat, and
said, `Whatever you value in this apartment is yours.'
If my uncle had mistaken the real nature of his
business, it would have been very embarrassing; as it
was, however, there was no mistake about the matter.
You would be surprised to see how much I have
improved in my painting. Somerville is a great
amateur
,
you know; and there is no exertion too great for
a woman who loves. I have actually improved more
within the last three months than I ever did in my whole
life.
Uncle Fitzherbert is evidently much pleased with
my approaching marriage; and from uncle Hutchinson's
letter, I should judge he was well nigh mad with joy.
I do not exactly know why it is,but I do wish the
wedding could be deferred until I have visited America.
My friends here will not consent to it, I know;
especially
as I should find it difficult to give them any very
good reasons for it. If I must tell the truth, I have
certain
undefined apprehensions about Grace Osborne.
She seldom mentions Captain Somerville in her letters
which is very strange, considering how much he was
with us, in the winter of '65,and how obviously she
was a favourite. Once indeed, she requested me to tell
him that the rose-bush he had given her was flourishing.
When I mentioned it, one of those dreadful shadows
passed over his face, and the blood seemed starting
from his temples. `Tell Miss Osborne,' said he, `that
no flower can be fairer than herself.' These
circumstances
brought to my recollection that when we parted,
there were certain very expressive glances about a
broken ring, which I had never seen before. As
Captain
Somerville had then treated me with nothing more
than gallantry and politeness, I was confirmed in my
supposition that they were betrothed to each other.
After our engagement, I once ventured to say to him
that I had thought him very much fascinated by a certain
friend of mine in Boston. That darkening frown,
always
so terrible to me, again came over his face. `She
is a most beautiful creature,' said he; `and you will
forgive me, Lucretia, if I did love her, since she did not
consider my love worth her acceptance. I have long
ceased to regret it; for I am convinced she has not
mind enough to make me happy.' I began to vindicate
Grace,but he interrupted me with an earnest, almost
authoritative request, never to mention the subject to him
again. This interdiction might originate in wounded
pride. But why was the rose kept? From whence
came the ring? During the winter he spent with us,
my own heart taught me how to judge of another; and
I would then have risked my life that Grace loved him
with all the pure, deep tenderness of which she is
capable
.
Her letters seem to come from a weary and
broken spirit; and she dwells upon the peacefulness of
the grave with a sort of sickening impatience very
remarkable
in one so contented and devotional. If my
rank and wealth have purchased me his hand, while his
affections are lingering in America, mine will indeed be
splendid misery.
20
I loved Grace at that early age when the soul sends
forth its waters in warm and gushing torrents. I have
seen her the idol of every circle, while I, poor and
homely, was neglectedI have seen Love pass by me,
and shower his wreaths among her beautiful flaxen hair
but she never was the less dear to me; and if I now
supposed that her breaking heart was a steppingstone to
Hymen's altar, my own would burst, ere I trod upon it.
In your last letter, you sneered at the possibility of her
having refused such a match;but you do not know
her, aunt Sanford I never saw one who had such
power
to curb and to endure. If she doubted the firmness
of a man's principles, or feared her father's
disapprobation
,
she could tear an image from her heart, if every
fibre bled at the parting.
However, in one fortnight I shall be a wedded wife;
and I ought not to indulge any doubtings and misgivings;
for I never had reason to doubt Colonel Fitzherbert's
integrity. (It is the first time I have thought to give
him his new title.)
I have introduced all my acquaintance, in town and
country to you, I believe,unless Miss Anne Pitt be
excepted,whom I have not met till very recently.
She is the sister of Lord Chatham, and almost as
celebrated
as he is. Mr. Burke told me he thought her the
most perfectly eloquent person he ever saw. There is
indeed a charm in every thing she says. Her ideas
have great beauty; and she mingles her syllables in a
liquid cadence which gives to the English tongue the
far-famed softness of the Tuscan.
Last Sabbath, I went to Stepney old church, St.
Dunstan,a pile venerable for its extreme antiquity.
An inscription on one of the corner-stones imports that
it was brought from the ruins of Carthage. Colonel
Fitzherbert laughed at me for paying court to St.
Dunstan
just at this time. You know he consecrated a
fountain, which ever after had the blessed effect of
making wives obedient. The servant has just come up
to say that Sir Joshua Reynolds and Garrick are below.
I may thank you and uncle Hutchinson that I am not a
disgrace to the society in which fortune has placed me.
Good night. August 14ththe anniversary of Oliver's
mob,and of something far more importantviz. of
the evening on which I was introduced to Captain
Somerville
.
August 24th,
1768.
How mutable are all human prospects! My last
lines were written on the 14th; and uncle Fitzherbert
was then in fine health, and animated to a remarkable
degree. On the night of the 15th, he was suddenly
attacked
by violent convulsions. The fits continued with
increasing power until the third day,when, with
anguish
that cannot be described, I saw the only relative I
had on earth stretched on the bed of death. I have never
before seen Mrs. Edgarton subdued by emotion; but now
I am obliged to exert all my fortitude to support her.
Alas! I shall never again be idolized as I was by that
dear old gentleman. He seemed to consider me the
prop of his house,the stay and support of his age.
Why did my heart ever accuse him of coldness and
formality?
Colonel Fitzherbert wrote all the particulars of his
death to uncle Hutchinson, immediately after his
decease
;
but grief and the pressure of cares, to which I
have been unaccustomed, have hitherto prevented my
writing to you. Mrs. Edgarton has 5000; and all
the servants have legacies. To every thing else I am
sole heiress.
All preparations for the wedding are, of course,
delayed
.
It was the earnest request, indeed the command,
of my dying uncle, that the marriage should be
solemnized
in three or four weeks at the utmost.
I thought this arrangement very heartless and
unfeeling
.
I therefore told Colonel Fitzherbert that I
thought it best to go to America with several ladies of
my acquaintance, who sail in September; and added
my resolution to be married at the house where we first
met.
At first, he urged me, with all possible eagerness,
to comply with my uncle's request; then offered to
throw up his commission, and remain in England, until
the period of mourning had expired: and when he
found that I continued firm in my purpose, he flew into
the most violent rage, and said he should not consider
the engagement binding, if I chose to display my
obstinacy
in this way. I answered, it was very well. He
was left entirely to his own choice in that matter.
He went away in great anger. The next day,
however, he called to apologize, and to express his
reluctant
acquiescence. I had rather die than doubt him;
but all this powerful emotion does increase my
suspicions
,and
yet they do not amount to suspicions, either.
You will be displeased, I know;but I must, Aunt
Sandford, I must have confidence in the man I marry.
I merely wish to see Grace, and satisfy my doubts.
Doubts, do I say? I will not suffer myself to doubt the
word of Colonel Fitzherbert; and if, as I believe, no
blame can be attached to him, I assure you I love him
too well to require from him any romantic sacrifice.
You have often wished to be present at my wedding;
I trust you will not be angry if your wish is gratified.
Give my grateful, fervent affection to uncle
Hutchinson
.
I have been collecting a library more splendid
than the one destroyed by the mob; which I intend to
bring with me.
Most affectionately your dutiful niece,
Lucretia Fitzherbert
.
Miss Sandford scarcely read the concluding line,
before
she dipped her pen in ink, and rapidly scribbled as
follows:
TO MISS LUCRETIA FITZHERBERT
.
Silly Girl,
I am indeed angry with you. In my day, a child
of six years old would have been whipped and sent to
bed, for taking such foolish whims. Is a man of
Colonel
Fitzherbert's rank and talents, and the nephew of
your greatest benefactor, to be treated in this
unbecoming
manner, because a simpleton of eighteen chooses to
talk about dying, as if it was a matter of pleasure or
convenience? I suppose brother Henry had scolded
her,or papa had frowned on the trembling little one.
20*
As for the ring and the flower,they weigh nothing at
all in my mind. If girls of the present day will suffer
a gentleman to see as plain as daylight that they are
living
and breathing only for him, what can you expect
from human vanity? I dare say Colonel Fitzherbert
made up the story about her rejection, wholly from
motives
of delicacy and generosity. I am not surprised
that he was in a passion when he found you refused to
obey your uncle's dying command.
To say nothing about the foolish jealousy you
indulge
,are
you not ashamed to cross the seas with a
regiment of soldiers? In the days of my youth, a single
lady would have thought twice before she undertook any
thing so grossly improper; but blushes are out of fashion
now-a-days, I find.
My indignation may have betrayed me into
unlady-like
expressions; and perhaps it may have made me
seem very indecorous with regard to Mr. Fitzherbert's
death. You no doubt feel his loss very severely,and
under any other circumstances, a year ought certainly
to be given to his memory; but your destined husband
loves the army too well to quit it; he is ordered to
America; and you are anxious to accompany him. As
for staying in England unmarried, at the head of such a
large establishment, it would neither be pleasant nor
proper. To be sure, you have no thoughts of the last
scheme.You must forsooth see Grace Osborne, and
ask her if she is willing you should marry her old
favourite
.
Such whims might pass in a girl of fifteen,
who had never read any thing but romances; but for
one of your good sense, great advantages, and
uncommon
attainments, it is highly ridiculous;and let me
tell you, that to set your judgment against your elders
in this way, is paying a poor compliment to those who
brought you up. Come to America as Mrs.
Fitzherbert
,
and you will find all hearts open to receive you.
There is no chance to send this letter, for a week
or more. I earnestly hope you will not have taken any
rash step before you hear from me. I mentioned in my
last, that your portrait by Sir Joshua Reynolds had
safely arrived;and who do you think came, a few
days since, and craved permission to see it? Assuredly
no other than Molly Bradstreet, or Polly May, as she
styles herself. She marched in with a very
unceremonious
stride,looked earnestly at the picture for a few
moments, then threw herself into your uncle's chair, and
burst into tears, moving her right hand up and down all
the while, as if beating time to some funeral dirge.
When she arose, I ventured to ask her what interest
she took in that young person. She looked at me very
keenly for a moment, and turned away as she answered,
`I knew her mother in Halifax; and she did me many a
kind turn, while she' (pointing to your picture) `was a
baby.'
She would neither eat nor drink in the house, and
hurried out of it, as if afraid to trust herself to look
back. Mr. Hutchinson seemed to think of nothing else
for two or three days,and he finally went off in search
of this mysterious creature; but she could not be found.
A woman who lives near her has been here to get
work, several times; and when I think it necessary, I
employ her in the kitchen. She says, `Some take Molly
for a desput bad woman; howdsomever I have gone
into
her house agin and agin, and found her on her knees
at prayer. To be sure she comes and goes like sulky
soap,and she is a sort of witch, I believe. At any
rate she has a kind of half-crazed way with her.'
You would have laughed one of your heartiest
laughs, if you had been here last week, when this poor
washerwoman came to make her complaints against the
whigs.
`Don't you think, madam,' said she, drawing in her
breath, with violent sobs, `don't you think, they have
torn the nice checked apron you gin me, all to pieces.'
Then turning to the Lieutenant Governor, with a
profound
courtesy, she added, `If there's justice in the land,
it ought to reach such fellows, your honour.'
We asked what provocation there was for such an
injury, and who was guilty of it. `Why, you see, I took
a few pence of the money you gin me for my labour,'
said she, `and I went to Mr. Loveking's shop, and
bought me a quarter of a pound of nice Bohea. There
was an evil looking lad on the door-stone, when I went
in; and I noticed he followed me, and kept his eye on
me. The next day, I had jest made me a comfortable
dish of tea, and set down to drink it, when the first thing
I know'd an egg come hard against my temples.
Before
I could look up, another fell into my cup of tea,
and spilled it all over the floor. Thinks I to myself,
some of the whig lads are playing their tricks; so I
catched up my canister of tea and put it up chimly, out
of sight; and I stept out of the way of the window,
and chucked my black airthen teapot into my pocket.
I'm a sizeable woman, you know, and they'd never mind
what was in my pocket, so long as the pleets of my
gownd kivered it. So I thought myself safe; but to be
sure, in comes one of the young dogs, and gives a
thundering
knock on the chimly, and down falls my canister.
Jest as I stooped to pick it up, they throwed a stone at
my pocket, and broke the tea-pot into a thousand bits;
and they shook the tea all out of my canister, and
shoveled the ashes over it,and they played foot-ball
with my tea-cups, till they broke 'em fine enough to
scour knives with. You may be sure I was as mad as
if a line of clothes had fell down jest as I got my
washing
out. I called 'em all the rascals in the country,
and they made a great clamour about the tea tax, and
the rights of man. If it is the rights of man, I think,
your honour, it is the wrongs of woman; and if there
is sich a thing as justice in the land, I ought to have it.'
The story is good for nothing, even in her own
words, unless you could have heard her whining and
whimpering, and seen her visage of wrath.
We gave her tea and money; and pacified her with
promises. But what can the magistrates do? These
things grow worse and worse, every day. We should
have another house pulled down about our ears, if they
knew your uncle had sent to request military assistance
from the king. When the royal troops come, Governor
Bernard will bear all the blame.
Doctor Byles was gifted with the power to speak truth
once in his life, when he said, `He is a well-meaning
gentleman. His heart is on the right side, as old
Townsend
,
that is dead and gone, once said; but he is as
clever a cat's-paw as ever took hot nuts out of the fire.'
I should not dare to write thus, if I were not sure
of putting my letter into the hands of a trust-worthy
Englishman myself; for do you know your last letter to
my brother-in-law was intercepted, and printed full
length in the Boston Gazette? What you wrote about
Charles Townsend and the taxation bill is every syllable
that can interest the rebels; but they have placed it all
before the public. However, it is all of a piece with
that scandalous paper. I do not know what the world
is coming to, when kings have not the power to stop such
proceedings. Boston is like a house on fire over one's
head. If they continue so outrageous, I think your
uncle
will conclude to reside altogether at his country seat
in Milton.
As for St. Dunstan,if I had not known the legend
about him, suffer me to remind you, that it is not
respectful
or decorous in you to attempt to teach your
seniors.
We talk much about our adopted niece. If you
have any love or gratitude for us, give us a legal title to
relationship, before you depart for America. I live
upon
the hope of seeing you and your husband soon.
Your loving aunt,
Sally Sandford
.
Boston,
Oct. 6th, 1768.
Lucretia was on her way to New England, before this
letter reached Grosvenor Square. The reader will
readily imagine that Miss Sandford had her own reasons
for urging a step, which she would otherwise have
thought very improper. This union had always been
the most cherished wish of her heart. She, as well as
Lucretia, had long supposed Miss Osborne's affections
fixed on Captain Somerville; and in the few visits she
had lately paid her, it was impossible not to notice her
declining health. These circumstances, united to what
Miss Fitzherbert had written, gave rise to uncomfortable
fears.
The matron was not cruel at heart; but she
sometimes
thought to herself, Brother Hutchinson will
break his heart to have Lucretia's large property go
wholly out of the family. It does seem to be a pity for
Lucretia to run the risk of losing her bright prospects,
for the sake of a puny little girl, who will not live long
to enjoy any thing, whether or no,for she has had
consumption handed down to her both from the father's
and the mother's side, for ten generations.
As for Colonel Fitzherbert, he might well have envied
Tantalus and Ixion their torments. Henry Osborne
said truly, ambition was his guiding star,the shrine
at which he sacrificed both affection and principle. Yet
even in this, he was inconstant. His feelings,
chamelion-like
,
took their colouring from surrounding objects; and
whatsoever was present with him, was, for the time,
most important. If his heart had ever known genuine
affection, Miss Osborne certainly had inspired it; but
when he was aware of Lucretia's vast expectations,
when he witnessed the splendour and influence of her
high-born uncle,when he saw her admired in the first
literary circles, and daily becoming more polished by
intercourse with the fashionable world,he regretted
the tie that bound him to her humble friend. By
degrees
,
Grace, in her pale and placid beauty, was
forgotten
;
or if memory sometimes presented her image, and
with it many a proof of recollected love,he thought
of her only as an obstacle in the way of his prosperity.
But when the world supposed him at the very summit
of good fortune, it may well be imagined his situation
was any thing but enviable. He respected Lucretia,
and he had deceived her by the most direct falsehood.
He loved Grace Osborne,yet he must either lose the
much coveted prize just within his grasp, or be married
to another, in the immediate vicinity of her whom he
had so shamefully wronged.
Could he have seen Grace, wasted as she was by
lingering illness, and utterly cheerless in her faithful
affection
,
his better nature would have prevailed; and he
would have besought forgiveness with the earnestness of
a repentant sinner. But he had resolved to avoid her
sight entirely. His mind was a chaos of fear and
conjecture
,and
only one hope floated distinctly on its
surface; viz. that the impression he had made might
be as easily erased as the one he had received; and
that pride and delicacy would keep his secret.
CHAP. XVIII.
Oh! what can sanctify the joys of home,
Like hope's gay glance from troubled ocean's foam?
The Corsair
.
In
the October following, the regiments, with several
ships of war, arrived in Boston harbour, and drew up
as if to blockade the town. In a few days, the barracks
at the Castle, the Town House, and Fanueil Hall were
filled; and a long line of tents, here and there
surmounted
by the red cross standard, stretched across our
beautiful
Common. Wherever the eye turned, it rested on
British uniforms;wherever the bright sun glanced, it
was reflected by British steel. There is no language
that can describe how the souls of men were goaded
and maddened in this hour of trial. The hum of
business
and of pleasure ceased; the wrath that had
hitherto
expended itself in flashes of wit, or hasty ebullitions
of feeling, now retreated to garrison the heart,and
left men stern, silent, and reserved; the step of youth
lost its buoyancy, and became firm, bold, and heavy,
like the platoon tread of battle; even the exuberant glee
of boyhood was checked; and the very air seemed
like the suppressed breathing of a curse.
A fortnight after the ships of war had drawn up
around the entrance of the harbour, a merchant-vessel,
bearing the national flag of England, passed through the
21
centre of their line on her way to Boston.
Handkerchiefs
were seen waving on the deck, and brief smiles
were exchanged, as the brig rapidly cut her way through
the waters. The two men-of-war occupied by Colonel
Fitzherbert's troops, fired a heavy salute as she passed,
for the betrothed wife of their commander was on board.
Lucretia had preferred accompanying a few friends
in the London Packet, to an escort so warlike as that
which attended her lover. A separation of eight
or ten weeks had of course taken place; but the
moment
the brig was recognised by the national vessels,
one of them lowered a boat,the packet slackened sail,
as it was swiftly rowed toward her, and ten minutes
after
,
Colonel Fitzherbert was on board.
When Lucretia saw his tall, elegant figure, when she
listened to the voice that had, for the last two months,
been heard only in her dreams, all her doubts and cares
were forgotten; and she received him with a warm and
frank affection, which she made no attempt to conceal;
but his brow was troubled,he seemed absent and
uneasy
,and
though unbounded in his gallantry, it was
too much like the heartless obsequiousness of habit.
You have seen all our friends? said Lucretia,
her very plain face brightening with eagerness and joy
as she spoke.
I have, and every one is impatient for your arrival.
I almost began to be jealous of your superior
importance
,
when I found every welcome cut short by
inquiries
and lamentations for you.
Lucretia playfully threw her handkercief to his face,
as she smiled, and said, Aunt Sandford is just as
precise
,
impatient, and good-hearted as ever, I suppose;
and quite as learned with regard to the comparative
value of Mecklin and Brussels?
I have heard no disputes of that nature, replied
the Colonel; but her arguments with Doctor Byles
are as acid as ever. Last evening they had some
altercation
about grammar; at the close of which she
told him she thoroughly disliked people that were
always
in the imperative mood. `And I for my part,'
rejoined the Doctor, `have no patience with a person
who is forever in the accusative case. It is a pity she
has not an active verb for an husband.'
Has your good uncle altered any? and does he lose
his temper with my insubordinate countrymen? asked
Miss Fitzherbert.
Oh, you know uncle Hutchinson well enough, said
he, in a confidential tone. The more uproar the better
sport for him, as long as the tea is consigned to his sons,
and commissions given to his nephews. He does but
act from the motives that stimulate us all, in every
pursuit
.
All mankind are selfish; and the greater their
hypocrisy, the more credit they get for benevolence and
patriotism.
We will not develope the train of association in Miss
Fitzherbert's mind, but her expression saddened, and
her voice was hurried, as she asked, Have you seen
the Osbornes?
I met Henry in the street, rejoined he; but the
interviews between whigs and dragoons are not likely
to be the most cordial in the world; and when he had
given this laconic answer, his lips compressed firmly, as
if they were never more to open.
Is it possible you have not called there? inquired
Lucretia.
Colonel Fitzherbert's face was even redder than his
uniform; and he angrily answered, I have not called,
madam. I have political as well as personal reasons;
and you know them both. It is a subject upon which
I have desired you never to speak. Methinks you take
it upon you somewhat early to regulate my motions.
Miss Fitzherbert did not attempt to reply. The tears
started to her eyes, and she turned away to conceal
them.
A plague on her jealousy, thought the Colonel.
I shall lose her at this rate. Confound it! that ever
I should place myself in a dilemma, where I can neither
take a decided stand, nor retreat with honour.
Pardon me, Miss Fitzherbert, said he, aloud. If
you knew half the insults that have been heaped upon
his majesty's troops in this rebellious town, you would
not wonder that I speak of Bostonians with some
asperity
.
I assure you, dearest Lucretia, I did not mean to
wound your feelings.
The offence that I cannot find it in my heart to
forgive
you, Frederic, must indeed be of a deep die, she
replied.
As she finished speaking, she joined a group of ladies
on the quarter-deck, and the conversation became
general
,
until the vessel drew up to the wharf. The
Lieutenant
Governor was standing beside his carriage at the
landing, waving his handkerchief in signal of welcome.
Lucretia's heart rose painfully high, as scenes so well
remembered and beloved came upon her view. It
seemed to her as if the packet would never reach its
destined point; and scarcely had its motion ceased, ere
she was on shore, enfolded in the arms of her uncle.
After the first congratulations were over, he observed,
Our telescope has been in great demand for several
days. We descried the packet before it passed the
castle; and hastened to receive you. The carriage has
been in waiting an hour; for Madam Sandford could
not believe that winds and waves would be no more
favourable to you than to other mortals.
Lucretia begged that they might be detained no
longer
than was necessary; and Colonel Fitzherbert having
promised soon to follow with the servants and baggage,
they gave their parting salutations to the ladies on board,
and ordered the coachman to drive on.
Our traveller felt a sort of bewildered and
incredulous
sensation, when she found herself whirled along in
the self-same carriage, and through the self-same streets,
which she had two years before traversed with such
totally different feelings.
She had then formed many plans for the single life
on which she thought herself firmly and forever
resolved
;
she had returned the affianced bride of the very
man for whose sake she had made the resolution. She
was then anxious and frightened at the weight of
splendour
she saw in prospect; it now sat easily and
gracefully
21*
upon her; and so great was her improvement in
mind and manners, that few would have recognised the
American orphan, in the richly dressed and highly
cultivated English heiress.
The changes that had taken place in Boston, seemed
to Lucretia even greater than her own. The whole
face of that thriving and happy population was indeed
most sadly changed. The troops, in their gorgeous,
flame-coloured uniform, were extended in long lines, or
scattered in groups, throughout the town. Cannon were
placed in front of Fanueil Hall, and sentinels with
gleaming
bayonets paced to and fro in front of the building.
The citizens, in their plain, republican dress, eyed their
gaudy oppressors with an angry scowl, and passing to
the other side, shunned them as if they were a `
pestilence
walking at noon-day.'
Lucretia had heard much of the increasing disorders
in her native land; but she was not prepared for a sight
like this; and her native generosity and high ideas of
freedom, for a moment overcame the influences that
surrounded her.
The Spanish have insulted England, she said,
and the government have paused to deliberate, and
condescended to reason with them; but when
Americans
remonstrate, it seems they are answered in a voice
of thunder. Methinks the revenue must be costly that
is extorted at the point of so many bayonets.
It is but for a short time, answered Hutchinson;
and the army lack employment just now. We have
only to show these rebels what England can do, and
they will then submit with as good a grace as possible.
Miss Fitzherbert had no attention to give to such
discussions
at that moment,for the home of her youth
was before her.
Jethro flourished his whip, and the horses gave a
bound, as if they partook of her impatience.
To press her earliest friend again and again to her
heart,to ask a thousand questions,to call the
servants
around her, and bid them welcome,seemed but
the work of a moment.
After the first joyful agitation was over, Miss Sandford
followed her to her dressing room. Why, you are
quite a different being, said she, taking her by the arm,
and carefully examining her dress, from the ornamented
India comb, to the embroidered hem of her travelling
habit. I declare how much good it does some folks
to travel.
My heart is not changed, replied Lucretia. I
hope it will never be chilled. Is Grace Osborne well?
That is just what I want to speak with you about,
replied Miss Sandford. You could not have received
my answer to the letter you wrote me in August?
No, I did not, dear madam; but what of Grace?
I was going to scold at you for your silly conduct;
but it seems you did not receive my letter; and we are
really glad to have you married here;only, taking one
thing with another, I think it would have been far better
to have had the wedding before you left Fitzherbert
Hall.
Well, dear aunt, I will talk of all this another time.
What were you going to say of Grace?
Why, my child, I do not think it is proper for you
to ask Colonel Fitzherbert questions about her. It only
offends him.
Heaven knows, I would sooner suffer myself, than
give him pain at any time, replied Lucretia; but
why should that offend him, aunt Sandford?
Why, from all that I can gather, there was some
foolish business at Mr. Osborne's; but then it was a
frolic of youth,nothing was ever meant by it. Grace
told me last week that she would not marry Colonel
Fitzherbert, even if he wished it. I do not believe a
word of that; but then it shows plainly enough that she
cares nothing about him. So if she does look a little
paler than she did when you went away, don't imagine
she is dying for love.Consumption has run in her
family for years.
Oh, Aunt, exclaimed Lucretia, why didn't you
tell me she was ill before this?
She is not ill,that is, not very ill; only a little
thinner than she was two years ago. I dare say she
will be well as ever before the winter is gone.
Lucretia gave her a most anxious and distressed look.
She saw that her aunt wished to prepare her for
something
,
which she had not the courage to reveal. All her
native impetuosity rushed to her heart. I must see her
nowthis very hour, said she. Oh, how I shall wish
I had never seen England;and without regarding the
arguments, tears, and remonstrances of the matron, she
caught her bonnet,flew down stairs, and with hurried
step hastened to the well remembered dwelling of her
friend.
A loud and rapid knock indicated her impatience.
How do you do, Phbe? said she, as the servant
opened the door. Is Miss Grace at home? tell her
Lucretia Fitzherbert is here.
Miss Osborne's writing-desk was open on the library
table, and a book in which she had just been writing
lay upon it.
The wind blew the leaves as Lucretia entered the
room, and she noticed one page all blistered with tears.
It was several minutes before Grace made her
appearance
.
She was trying to compose herself for the
dreaded
,
though much wished-for interview. Presently a
light step was heard, and an instant after, she was
sobbing
upon the neck of her long absent friend.
Her form was attenuated almost to a shadow of her
former self, and the bright red spot on her cheek
proclaimed
too well, that to her, the world had little more
to offer.
Lucretia saw the dreadful truth at a single glance;
and when she drew her closely to her heart, that heart
ached almost to bursting.
Poor Grace had vainly endeavoured to nerve her
gentle nature for the trying scene. Her early friendship
her bright and happy dream of love,allall were
conjured up too vividly before her. Both wept, longer
and more violently than joy ever weeps;and when the
first tumult of emotion had at last subsided, neither of
them dared trust her own voice to express feelings so
deep and complicated.
After a very long silence, Lucretia brushed back her
disordered hair, and making an effort to be cheerful,
said, Where is your father and Henry, dear Grace?
They have gone to Cambridge, to remain until
night, she replied.
A thrill ran through Miss Fitzherbert's whole frame.
That voice had still the spirit of melody within itbut,
oh, how feeble, how hollow were its tones!
Then I will stay with you all day, if you can send
word to aunt Sandford.
It is kindvery kind in you to remain with me,
when so many other friends are wishing to see you,
said Grace.
I
never was unkind, she replied, pressing her hand
earnestly; and unable longer to crowd back the subject
that was ever uppermost in her heart, she burst into
tears, and exclaimed, Oh, dearest Grace, if you had
but told me!
Her friend looked up inquiringly. The idea that
Lucretia suspected the truth, now, for the first time,
flashed upon her mind; and without reply she buried
her face in her handkerchief.
Another long pause was interrupted by Miss
Fitzherbert
,
who in a frenzied tone, said, Tell me, Grace,
and tell me truly,did Colonel Fitzherbert offer you
marriage before he left America?
He never offered it, answered Miss Osborne.
How then could he tell me you had rejected him?
Grace tried to smile, as she answered, How came
you to doubt the word of your destined husband? It is
a sad thing, Lucretia.
If you think so, rejoined her friend, speak but
one word, to tell me those doubts are unfounded. Can
you, ought you in conscience to conceal any thing from
me, in a case where the whole happiness of my life is
at stake?
Grace gazed at her for a moment with intense
expression
,
as if she would have gladly laid down her life
to speak that one consoling word, could she have spoken
it truly; then with a convulsed motion, she covered her
face with both her hands, and wept aloud.
I wish you both happy, said she, in a voice stifled
with sobs; and if you cannot be so otherwise, forget
that such a creature as Grace Osborne ever lived.
I, for one, cannot be happy on such conditions,
replied Lucretia. In accents of exceeding tenderness,
she added, You are ill, dear Grace;very ill and
wretched.
I am ill, but not wretched, answered Miss Osborne.
Consumption is handed down to our family through
many generations; but `the cup that my Heavenly
Father
hath given me to drink, shall I not drink it?'
Truly
it is offered at an early age; but religion sweetens
the draught.
Colonel Fitzherbert still loves you, said Lucretia.
He has struggled with his affection, but he cannot
conquer
it; for he never hears you mentioned without deep
emotion. Were I to tell him all, he would return to
you; I know he would,for he is kind and generous,
with all his faults. Could you forgive him, and live for
his sake?
The shrinking delicacy of Grace revolted at the idea;
and, forgetful of her caution, she exclaimed, Could
you remind a lover of his broken vow? When he had
turned from you, could you pluck him by the sleeve,
and entreat him for one kind glance?
Oh, my God! exclaimed Lucretia, springing on
her feet, and pacing the room in the agony of her
spirit
,
it
is
true;it
is
true.
Grace pitied her from her inmost soul. She pressed
her hand to her lips, twined her wasted arms round her
neck, and tried every soothing endearment that
friendship
and compassion could suggest.
It was not long before Lucretia assumed her native
firmness and energy. This subject is too distressing
to us both, said she. How well I have loved him,
and what a wreck this is to all my hopes, mortal can
never know. Neither of us is to blame. You did not
tell me of this before I left America, because you well
knew how much my own feelings were entangled. Had
I known it earlier, I would sooner have died than have
given such a stab to your peace; and you, in your
disinterested
kindness, would willingly have gone to your
grave, and left me in ignorance of it. I have only one
question more to ask; if Colonel Fitzherbert were again
free, would you marry him?
Grace was silent a moment; and there seemed to be
a slight conflict of feeling; but in her pure and well
principled mind, it could not last long. With a steady
voice, she answered, No.I could not respect a man
whose principles had ever wavered. I could not
entrust
my happiness to one whose affection for me had
once been shaken. It is a grievous disappointment to
find duplicity where we had expected truth; but love
cannot remain when confidence has fled. His
attachment
to you will no doubt continue; for your mind is
capable of reflecting all the light of his.
And you have truly expressed your decided
sentiments
?
said Lucretia.
I have.
Then we will never more speak of it, dear Grace.
With affected calmness, Miss Fitzherbert then asked
some general questions about her work, her books, &c.
but the conversation soon became languid. Lucretia
leaned her head on her hand in silence, watching the
various fantastic figures formed by the glowing embers;
and as Grace looked steadly at the same object, the
tear that would not drop, rested on her long, drooping
eye-lash, like liquid pearl.
You must excuse me, Lucretia, if I retire to my
bed, said she. I am weak, and a trifle wearies me.
She rose, and attempted to walk,but again sunk
into the chair from extreme debility.
Lucretia and Phbe supported her to her couch. For
an hour or more, her friend continued to walk softly
about the chamber, now and then pausing to bathe her
head, or whisper some word of kindness.
22
Phbe prepared food; but though Miss Fitzberbert
had tasted very slight refreshment since her arrival, it
was with difficulty she constrained herself to eat a few
morsels, just to satisfy the kind-hearted servant.
You see I am restless, dear Grace, said she. I
cannot feel easy any where just now; and you will be
more calm if I leave you.
You will come again, soon? said Grace, warmly
pressing her hand.
Lucretia stooped down and kissed her fading cheek;
To-morrow, and next day, and every day, my dear
girl, said she.
When she descended to the library, she walked the
room slowly for several minutes, endeavouring to collect
her scattered thoughts, and decide on the course of
conduct
she was to pursue.
Miss Osborne's book still lay on the writing-desk,
open at the blistered page. Curiosity was powerfully
excited, and, without trusting herself to think of the
impropriety
of such an action, she eagerly read its
contents
.
It appeared to have been dated on the same day
that she had received Lucretia's letter of November
15th; and indicated a powerful struggle in the mind of
the conscientious girl.
In one line she expressed a resolution to make her
friend acquainted with Colonel Fitzherbert's real
character
;in
the next, she seemed to doubt whether this
purpose had been formed from a sense of duty, or from
pride, resentment, or some other lurking evil of her
nature.
On the first page of the book was pinned the billet
that had accompanied Somerville's rose. Grace, secure
in the absence of all her family, had unguardedly left
her desk open; and her friend's unexpected visit had
driven it entirely from her memory.
Lucretia was not, till now, aware how strongly she
had hoped that her fears were all ungrounded;but
here was confirmation strong. The sparkling cup of
happiness was indeed broken at her feet.
Colonel Fitzherbert had spent the afternoon at
Governor
Hutchinson's, in a state of mind scarcely more
enviable than that of Montezuma, when stretched on
his bed of flaming coals. Apprehension, remorse,
ambition
,
and avarice, were all struggling within him for
victory. It was one of those eventful moments in life,
when character and destiny seem to be entirely
placed
in the hand of circumstance. His affection for
Grace sometimes returned upon his heart, like a bird of
calm, not to be driven away by the lowering storm.
He had been told that Lucretia's sudden visit was
owing
to her slight illness. Vanity, or something better,
whispered that he might possibly be the cause; and for
a moment the fresh garland of youthful love seemed
preferable to wealth's glittering chain. His conscience
whispered to him that he was a knave; and reason
plainly told him he was a fool. His fault had no tinge
of spirit in it. It was base and cowardly. He had
sought to attain his wishes by means not only
unjustifiable
,
but strangely impolitic; and now, while unbending
pride forbade him to take a single step to extricate
himself
,
he saw his happiness and his worldly prosperity
suspended by threads equally brittle.
However, he compelled himself to reject all thoughts
except Lucretia's princely fortune. He was alone in
the parlour when she entered; and having studied his
part, he performed it well.
Raising her hand to his lips, he complained that, after
having been separated so long, she should leave him
thus abruptly.
Whatever Lucretia's feelings were, her manner was
polite, though melancholy, and fairly baffled all
conjecture
.
After talking upon subjects of general interest, the
Colonel at length ventured to speak of their marriage.
With a constrained smile, Lucretia answered, I
leave that matter entirely to you and Aunt Sandford. I
promise to conform to any arrangement you choose to
make.
This was more than he had hoped. He had
expected
to hear doubts stated, if not to be loaded with
reproaches
;
and the ready acquiescence which lightened
his heart of such a load of apprehension, utterly
bewildered
him. It is then as I hoped, thought he;
Grace no longer cares for me, and she has kindly and
delicately concealed what she no doubt considers a
mere boyish freak.
Once the thought crossed his mind, that Lucretia
knew all, but could not persuade herself to relinquish
him. If it was so, he certainly was not disposed to
quarrel with such strength of affection, at that moment.
His vanity was flattered, and his feelings gratified by
such exclusive preference. The admiration she had
evinced during their first acquaintance, which he then
thought somewhat too undisguised, was now
remembered
with pleasure; and with no little exultation he
recalled
to his mind, how often a single remark from him had
made her deaf to all the eloquence and flattery that
surrounded
her in England. He well knew that this was
no stratagem,no trick of policy. It was the natural
movements of a glowing heart, unpractised in
concealment
;
and it did awaken gratitude that almost bordered
on affection.
Madam Sandford was even more surprised, rejoiced,
and puzzled; Governor Hutchinson, ignorant of his
nephew's `hair-breadth 'scapes,' was warm and sincere
in his congratulations; and all, save the heart of
Lucretia
,
`went merry as a marriage bell.'
She passed a sleepless, mlserable night. To love
and doubt is torment enough;but to love, and yet
know we are the victims of cold, selfish, deceitful
policy
,
is `anguish unmixed, and agony pure.'
22 *
CHAP. XIX.
My laddie's sae mickle in luve wi' the siller,
He canna hae luve to spare for me.
Burns
.
We
pass over the very pathetic meeting between
Lucretia and the elder Mr. Osborne, as well as her
various
interviews with Grace; and leaving sundry
unimportant
matters to the reader's imagination, we hasten
on to the first of December,the eventful day fixed
upon for this most inauspicious wedding. The bride
seemed to be the only one totally indifferent concerning
the great preparations that were making for her
marriage
.
Indeed, she kept herself almost entirely
secluded
,
even from her own family. This conduct Madam
Sandford attributed to a proper, maidenly reserve; and
the Colonel considered the rents of her vast English
estates
much more worthy subjects of calculation, than
her views and feelings possibly could be.
Thus the whole management devolved upon Madam
Sandford; and truly it could not have fallen into more
able hands.
Her arrangements were altogether splendid,such
as were well worthy of the sole descendant of the
aristocratic
house of Fitzherbert.
The rooms were tastefully festooned with evergreens
and artificial roses; in front of two large lamps were
placed the armorial bearings of Somerville and
Fitzherbert
,
richly painted on glass; a full band of music
was stationed near the house; and at a very early hour
in the evening, the whole mansion was brilliantly
illuminated
.
Such regal magnificence had never before been
seen in the Coloay; and every avenue was crowded
long before the rooms began to fill with company. The
British officers, in full uniform, their plumes glancing
beneath the rich flood of light that streamed from the
chandeliers, added much to the general enchantment of
the scene.
When Doctor Byles, in his canonical robes, followed by
his wife and daughter entered, the throng respectfully
made way for him to pass into the inner room. There
was Governor Hutchinson in his richest garb, seated in a
chair covered with blue velvet; there was Miss Sandford
smiling and courtesying to her visiters,trying with all
her might to be tranquil, but ever and anon moving about
to see that the transparencies were rightly fitted to the
lamps, or that the paper ornaments were safe from fire;
there too, in a few moments, appeared Lucretia
Fitzherhert
by the side of her bridegroom,glittering in silks
and jewels, yet pale, anxious, and agitated,more like a
victim decorated for sacrifice, than the joyful bride of
the man she loved. A signal was given as they
entered
,
and the band from without struck up one of their
boldest and most exhilarating tunes.
Doctor Byles seemed in high spirits. I never
before
saw Mars in such close attendance upon Hymen,
said he. If the Englishman you spoke of, Miss
Fitzherbert
,
could be present at this time, I think he would
never repeat his question, whether Massachusetts was
on the
Pacific
coast.
The music surely is not of a warlike character,
said Colonel Fitzherbert, smiling.
Why, not exactly to be sure; but who ever heard
of Cupid's sounding a trumpet? For my own part, I
wish there was a law passed against playing upon any
wind instruments, except
words
.
That exception would touch you nearly, to be sure,
replied Hutchinson. But if the English parliament
should interfere with the concords as well as the
discords
of these loyal provinces, they would be louder
than ever in their complaint of grievances.
I am sure, answered the clergyman, glancing
round on the gaudy uniforms, if Doctor Willard
himself
were here, he could not deny that New England
grievances are
red-dressed
.
That is a bad joke, rejoined Miss Sandford. You
make use of two D's.
And who, I pray you, madam, has a better right to
two D's than myself? By the way, I believe it is time
for me to act in my clerical character. Shall we
proceed
to the ceremony?
Governor Hutchinson looked toward the bride and
bridegroom, and bowed assent.
Oh, what a moment that was for Lucretia! Her
colour
went and came, as rapidly as the lightning flickers
in an over-charged cloud. During the prayer which
Doctor Byles uttered for the happiness and prosperity
of those he was about to unite, the death-like paleness
of her cheek, and her lip, cold, damp, and quivering,
betrayed emotion deep and agonizing. When he
paused
,with
a quick gasp, and a start, sudden as that
which precedes a violent death, she said, Stop, sir!
I can never be the wife of Colonel Fitzherbert. That
he sought me for my wealth only, deserved my silent
contempt;that his falsehood has broken a generous
heart, justifies this public expression of scorn. Her
eyes were fixed with intense expression, her cheek
glowed, and her stature seemed to rise with the
loftiness
of her feelings, as she left the apartment.
Every degree of surprise and curiosity which the
human countenance is capable of expressing, was at
that moment visible. The bridegroom listened to her
unexpected declaration, and watched her retiring figure,
with a look strangely complicated and embarrassed. All
eyes were fixed upon him during this momentary
confusion
.
But brief space, however, was given to the eager
gaze of wonder and curiosity. His proud heart, stung
to the very core with shame, and his naturally violent
temper maddened into fury, Colonel Fitzherbert rushed
out of the house, and was not again seen there that
night.
The clergyman remained motionless with
astonishment
;
the hum of voices grew loud and general; some
of the ladies smiled, some sneered, and all were busy
in conjecturing the causes of this singular catastrophe.
Many of the officers reddened with anger; but not a
few said, Hang it, I like the girl's spirit.But if a
man had offered this insult to our Colonel, he would
have needed forty lives to answer for it.
The company soon began to consider that under such
circumstances, it was highly proper for them to depart;
and one after another went away, until the mansion was
entirely left in its solitary glare and unheeded splendour.
There are few scenes so very desolate as a brilliantly
lighted room in which the sound of mirth and music has
ceased, and the echo of footsteps died away. It is like
gems and garlands on the still, cold corpse; like vases
and statues in the desert. A mysterious hand writes
upon the wall soul
has
been here,and we shudder
at its meaning.
Governor Hutchinson and his sister were not present
to hear the eager inquiries, the shrewd conjectures, and
the malicious whispers of their departing guests; for
they had both followed Lucretia, the instant she left the
room. In her chamber they found the agitated girl
with her face concealed in the pillow, sobbing, as if the
rushing tide of feeling would burst the proud heart that
had so long shut in its waters. Excitement may nerve
us with artificial strength, but springs wound too tightly
must either snap, or rebound with sudden, painful
swiftness
.
Miss Sandford began to sob out, Oh, Lucretia!
but Governor Hutchinson interrupted her by saying, in
a stern voice, Lucretia Fitzherbert, what do you mean
by this disgraceful conduct?
His peremptory manner roused all the latent fire of
one, who had, of late, been more accustomed to
command
than to obey.
She hastily brushed away the tears, and answered,
with much dignity, I meant, sir, to convince your
nephew that my friends are not to be wronged, nor
myself
insulted, with impunity
What insults,what wrongs? inquired
Hutchinson
.
He broke his plighted faith to Grace Osborne, sir;
and then offered to my wealth the heart he would never
have given to me.
The Lieutenant Governor looked toward his sister for
an explanation.
There was some silly business. I believe, said Miss
Sandford. He gave her a ring, or something like
that.
And for this, you are willing to have your name a
by-word and a reproach among all the British officers?
said the angry uncle. For this you have given up an
alliance of which you had so much reason to be proud?
I know not, sir, what reason the house of
Fitzherbert
have to be proud of an union with the house of
Somerville, replied Lucretia, somewhat haughtily.
Methinks their rent-roll is not as large, nor their
ancestry
as noble. The high colour subsided from her
face, as she added, But it was not things like these I
thought of. I loved Somerville, because I knew he
possessed
exalted talents, and because I supposed that he
possessed stern integrity, and a high sense of honour.
I was deceived,my friend was injured,and I am now
amply revenged.
Miss Sandford was seated during this speech, and
kept her feet and head moving rapidly, to express her
impatience and indignation. I see it is nothing to you
if my heart does break, said she;and then to think
of all this lost trouble and expense.
I am sorry that you should have taken so much
trouble, dear aunt, rejoined Lucretia; but as for the
expense, there is gold enough in my desk to pay you
for ten such weddings, and it is all your own.
And this is your gratitude, is it, madam? said
Governor Hutchinson, eyeing her with excessive
displeasure
.
Lucretia Fitzherbert,one of two things
you must do,either implore the Colonel's pardon, and
marry him this night, or quit my house forever.
You think more meanly of him than I do,
answered
Lucretia, her lip slightly curling with contempt. I
do not believe he would marry the daughter of Crsus,
after she had held his name up to public odium, as I
have done. My pardon he may ask if he chooses; but
to him, I have no atonement to make. I will not,
however
,
annoy his uncle with my presence. The heiress
of Edmund Fitzherbert can be at no loss for a home.
She took her cloak, and made a motion to throw it
over her shoulders.She hesitated one moment,and
melting into tears, threw herself on her knees before
them, as she said, Yet I would not part in anger.
You were both kind to me when I had no other friends;
and there are debts, money can never pay. Bless me,
before I go.
From henceforth we are strangers to each other,
rejoined Governor Hutchinson; and without deigning to
bestow another word, he retired to his own room.
But you will, aunt Sandford, said Lucretia, in a
tone of entreaty. You were ever kind to me; and
as she spoke, she hid her head in the matron's lap, like
an indulged and repentant child.
Miss Sandford, much affected, parted the ringlets,
which had been most carefully prepared for this eventful
evening. Only say, dear Lucretia, that you will
marry
him, whispered she.
Marry
him!
exclaimed Lucretia, rising
indignantly
.
I would as soon marry my footman,aye, sooner;
for he has some nobility of soul about him.
Then I cannot, and I will not say, God bless you,
replied the offended maiden.
Lucretia watched her as she stalked out of the
apartment
in high displeasure,and her soul, ever rapid and
vehement in its changes, sprung back elastic from the
momentary touch of remorse.
A Fitzherbert is not to be twice insulted, said she,
and calling for her servants, she ordered one to pack a
trunk of clothes, and another to ask Governor
Hutchinson
if the carriage might be ordered to Queen-street.
Answer was returned that any thing which might
facilitate
Miss Fitzherbert's departure, was entirely at her
service. Lucretia bit her lip at this instance of civil
rudeness; but she concealed her resentment, and
merely
said to the servant, Bring the horses to the back
door, Richard; and avoid the main street.
23
The fear of meeting Colonel Fitzherbert in his
present
exasperated state, or of encountering the curious
gaze of some lingering remnant of the wedding party,
occasioned these orders.
Could the crowd have that night discovered the
wonderful
particulars with which all Boston rung for weeks
after, Lucretia would unquestionably have found the
popular excitement very troublesome during her short
ride.
Many, who from the neighbouring streets had
witnessed
the commencement of this gala scene, had
deeply
and bitterly reproached the American girl who could
find it in her heart to bestow an immense fortune on
one of the hateful oppressors of her native country;
and could they have known how ingeniously the
haughty
Briton had been humbled, they would have drawn
her carriage in triumph.
As it was, however, every body had gone to their
homes, lost in conjecture and amazement. The streets
were almost entirely deserted; and as Lucretia and her
servants passed along on their way to Mr. Osborne's,
they scarcely noticed a human figure, save the sentinels,
who, with shouldered arms, slowly paced their
accustomed
rounds.
Mr. Osborne and his son were the only ones waking
in Queen-street, when Miss Fitzherbert arrived; and it
may well be believed that their astonishment almost
amounted to terror, when the exiled bride came into
their presence so unexpectedly.
Lucretia in a tone of sportive authority told them,
they must perforce, without asking any questions, grant
a lodging to her and her train, for several days;and
then, whispering to the old gentleman, she promised, as
soon as the servants were disposed of, to tell him all.
Upon this hint, Phbe was called,a cheerful fire
kindled in the kitchen, and all necessary arrangements
speedily made for her attendants. As soon as something
like quiet was restored, Lucretia gave a brief outline of
the events which had recently passed,together with
the causes that led to them.
The detail unfolded much that the father and brother
had never known. I was aware that Captain
Somerville
was much pleased with my sister's beauty, said
Henry; and I saw too plainly how fast his insinuating
manners gained on her inexperienced heart, but I never
supposed he made a serious declaration of attachment.
And from some indications we have noticed, we
have both suspected the cause of her unusual
depression
,
continued Mr. Osborne; and though we never
knew that he directly sought her love, we could not but
blame the vanity that had so thoughtlessly gratified itself
at the expense of another's peace. I have ever taught
Grace to speak freely to me, and I cannot but wonder
at her reserve on this subject.
I had cautioned her against Somerville's influence,
replied Henry; and she well knew that neither of us
trusted in his religious principles. Of late, I could not
seek her confidence,the painful subject too evidently
wounded the dear girl.
When Lucretia gave a minute account of the letter,
the ring, and the rose,when she mentioned the
falsehood
that had been told to her at the commencement of
her ill-fated engagement, and the uniform course of
duplicity
which Colonel Fitzherbert had afterward
pursued
,
the good old man never uttered one word of
reproach
against the wretched being who had destroyed
the health and happiness of his only daughter.But
when in animated terms, she told how keenly she felt
the wrongs her friend had suffered, and how thoroughly
she despised their author, Mr. Osborne gave her a look
of speaking tenderness, and Henry, of most delighted
admiration.
Miss Fitzherbert had resolved not to see Grace, until
the ensuing morning; but before she retired to rest,
Phbe came with a message from her young lady,
begging
her to look in upon her, if she only gave time to
say good night.
Lucretia could never deny any thing to the little
beauty; but she kissed her affectionately, and said,
You must not talk to-night; indeed you must not,
dear Grace.
I will not, she replied. Phbe has told me the
meaning of all this. She paused a moment, and
looked
on the full, round moon, which, through an opening
in the curtain, shed its holy light on her seraphic
countenance
;then,
pressing Lucretia's hand most
earnestly
,
she added, It was alone for my sake, I know; but
I do wish you could still have loved and respected him.
It was but one fault, Lucretia; and the best of us need
forgiveness.
Her friend put her finger to her lip, in signal of
prohibition
,and
smiling on her with unutterable
tenderness
,
bade her good night.
The next day, Doctor Willard called as usual,and
finding that Grace had passed a restless night, and was
then sleeping, he was about to depart; but seeing Miss
Fitzherbert on the stairs, he sprang forward with all the
ready frankness that characterized his manner, and
clasping her hand in both of his, exclaimed, You are
a fine, noble-spirited girl, Miss Fitzherbert. I like you
for this transaction,by my soul, I do.
The best of it all, observed Mr. Osborne, stepping
from his library, is, that she has promised to remain
constantly with Grace.
The Doctor warmly congratulated his friend on so
valuable an accession to his family, and entered into a
very pleasant and animated conversation,in the course
of which he observed that Colonel Fitzherbert had
thrown up his commission, that the resignation had been
given in to General Gage that very morning; and
lastly
that Governor Hutchinson had had one short
interview
with his nephew, in which the latter had desired
to have his property collected and sent on to the South,
whither he had departed as secretly and expeditiously
as possible. As this information came from Doctor
Byles, there was every reason to suppose it true. That
reverend gentleman, however, gave them no
opportunity
to make personal inquiries. He was highly
indignant
at what he styled Lucretia's absurd conduct, and
ever after treated her with extreme coldness.
23 *
For reasons sufficiently obvious, this subject was
seldom
alluded to in the domestic circle at Queen-street;
and Lucretia had now no intercourse whatever with
Governor Hutchinson's family; nevertheless, she heard
once or twice in the course of the season, that Colonel
Somerville (as he now chose to be called) remained at
the South, plunged in every excess of dissipation.
CHAP. XX.
The girl was dying.Youth, and beauty, all
Men love, or women boast of, was decaying;
And one by one, life's finest flowers did fall
Before the touch of death, who seem'd delaying,
As though he'd not the heart at once to call
The maiden to his home.
Barry Cornwall
.
Grace
, agitated by these events, and her slight form
daily becoming more shadowy, seemed like a celestial
spirit, which having performed its mission on earth, melts
into a misty wreath, then disappears forever.
Hers had always been the kind of beauty that is
eloquence
,
though it speaks not. The love she inspired,
was like that we feel for some fair infant which we would
fain clasp to our hearts in its guileless beauty; and when
it repays our fondness with a cherub smile, its angelic
influence rouses all there is of heaven within the soul.
Deep compassion was now added to these emotions;
and wherever she moved, the eye of pity greeted her,
as it would some wounded bird, nestling to the heart in
its timid loveliness.
Every one who knew her, felt the influence of her
exceeding purity and deep pathos of character; but
very few had penetrated into its recesses, and discovered
its hidden treasures. Melody was there, but it was too
plaintive, too delicate in its combination, to be produced
by an unskilful hand. The coarsest minds felt its
witching
effect, though they could not define its origin;like
the servant, mentioned by Addison, who drew the bow
across every string of her master's violin, and then
complained
that she could not, for her life, find where the
tune was secreted.
Souls of this fine mould keep the fountain of love
sealed deep within its caverns; and to one only is
access
ever granted. Miss Osborne's affection had been
tranquil on the surface,but it was as deep as it was
pure. It was a pool which had granted its healing
influence
to one, but could never repeat the miracle,
though an angel should trouble its waters.
Assuredly, he that could mix death in the cup of love,
which he offered to one so young, so fair, and so true,
was guilty as the priest who administered poison in the
holy eucharist.
Lucretia, now an inmate of the family, read to her,
supported her across the chamber, and watched her
brief, gentle slumbers, with an intense interest, painfully
tinged with self-reproach. She was the cause of this
premature decay,innocent indeed, but still the cause.
Under such circumstances, the conscience is morbid in
its sensibility,unreasonable in its acuteness; and
the smiles and forgiveness of those we have injured, tear
and scorch it like burning pincers.
Yet there was one, who suffered even more than
Lucretia
,though
he was never conscious of giving one
moment's pain to the object of his earliest affection.
During the winter, every leisure moment which Doctor
Willard's numerous avocations allowed him, was spent
in Miss Osborne's sick chamber; and every tone,
every
look of his, went to her heart with a thrilling
expression
,
that seemed to say, Would I could die for
thee. Oh, would to God I could die for thee.
Thus pillowed on the arm of friendship, and watched
over by the eye of love, Grace languidly awaited the
returning spring; and when May did arrive, wasted as
she was, she seemed to enjoy its pure breath and sunny
smile. Alas, that the month which dances around the
flowery earth, with such mirthful step and beaming
glance, should call so many victims of consumption to
their last home.
Towards the close of this delightful season, the
invalid
,
bolstered in her chair, and surrounded by her
affectionate
family, was seated at the window, watching the
declining sun. There was deep silence for a long while;
as if her friends feared that a breath might scare the
flitting soul from its earthly habitation. Henry and
Lucretia
sat on either side, pressing her hands in mournful
tenderness; Doctor Willard leaned over her chair, and
looked up to the unclouded sky, as if he reproached it
for mocking him with brightness; and her father
watched
the hectic flush upon her cheek, with the firmness of
Abraham, when he offered his only son upon the altar.
Oh, how would the heart of that aged sufferer have
rejoiced
within him, could he too have exchanged the
victim!
She had asked Lucretia to place Somerville's rose on
the window beside her. One solitary blossom was on
it; and she reached forth her weak hand to pluck it;
but its leaves scattered beneath her trembling touch.
She looked up to Lucretia, with an expression which
her friend could never forget,and one cold tear slowly
glided down her pallid cheek. Gently as a mother
kisses her sleeping babe, Doctor Willard brushed it
away; and turning hastily, to conceal his quivering lip,
he clasped Henry's hand with convulsive energy, as he
whispered, Oh, God of mercies, how willingly would
I have wiped all tears from her eyes.
There is something peculiarly impressive in manly
grief. The eye of woman overflows as readily as her
heart; but when waters gush from the rock, we feel
that they are extorted by no gentle blow.
The invalid looked at him with affectionate regret, as
if she thought it a crime not to love such enduring
kindness
;
and every one present made a powerful effort to
suppress painful, suffocating emotion.
Lucretia had a bunch of purple violets fastened in
her girdle,and with a forced smile, she placed them
in the hands of her dying friend.
She looked at them a moment with a sort of
abstracted
attention, and an expression strangely unearthly, as
she said, I have thought that wild flowers might be
the alphabet of angels,whereby they write on hills
and fields mysterious truths, which it is not given our
fallen nature to understand. What think you, dear
father
?
I think, my beloved child, that the truths we do
comprehend, are enough to support us through all our
trials.
The confidence of the christian was strong within
him, when he spoke; but he looked on his dying
daughter
,
the only image of a wife dearly beloved,and
nature prevailed. He covered his eyes and shook
his white hairs mournfully, as he added, God in his
mercy grant that we may find them sufficient in this
dreadful struggle.
All was again still,still, in that chamber of death.
The birds sung as sweetly as if there was no such thing
as discord in the habitations of man; and the blue sky
was as bright as if earth were a stranger to ruin, and
the human soul knew not of desolation. Twilight
advanced
,
unmindful that weeping eyes watched her
majestic
and varied beauty. The silvery clouds that
composed
her train, were fast sinking into a gorgeous
column
of gold and purple. It seemed as if celestial
spirits
were hovering round their mighty pavilion of light,
and pressing the verge of the horizon with their
glittering
sandals.
Amid the rich, variegated heaps of vapour, was one
spot of clear, bright cerulean. The deeply coloured
and heavy masses which surrounded it, gave it the
effect
of distance,so that it seemed like a portion of
the inner heaven. Grace fixed her earnest gaze upon
it, as the weary traveller does upon an Oasis in the
desert
.
That awful lustre which the soul beams forth at
its parting, was in her eye, as she said, I could almost
fancy there are happy faces looking down to welcome
me.
It is very beautiful, said Lucretia, in a subdued
tone. It is such a sky as you used to love to look
upon, dear Grace.
It is such a one as
we
loved, she answered.
There was a time when it would have made me very
happy; butmy thoughts are now beyond it.
Her voice grew faint, and there was a quick gasp,
as if the rush of memory was too powerful for her weak
frame.
Doctor Willard hastily prepared a cordial, and offered
it to her lips. Those lips were white and motionless;
her long, fair eye-lashes drooped, but trembled not.
He placed his hand on her side;the heart that had
loved so well, and endured so much, had throbbed its
last.
With a countenance as pale as the lifeless being
beside
him, Doctor Willard whispered, Your daughter
is dead!
One deep, piercing groan burst from the bosom of
the bereaved father,and it was echoed by a faint
shriek, as they all involuntarily knelt beside the corpse.
For many minutes, no sound was uttered by any one.
The quick, convulsive motion of the foot, and the
handkerchief
,
which rose and fell on the throbbing temples,
alone betrayed the grief that was storming within their
souls.
At length Mr. Osborne arose, and observed that it
was necessary they should leave the room.
Father, brother, and lover kissed that pale brow as
they passed. Thus,thusdear, loved one, must
we part, said Doctor Willard; and he rushed out of
the house with the swiftness of one goaded on by the
sting of anguish.
It was years before he could hear Grace talked of
with composure. His footsteps were deeply marked
around her grave; and not even the terrible scenes in
which his ardent soul was afterward actively engaged,
could drive her from his memory. A miniature was
copied from her portrait,and when the body of the
young patriot was afterward buried on the field of
battle
,
this valued relic was found encrusted in his heart's
blood.
In the ebony desk of the deceased, was discovered
The Rape of the Lock, which had been the gift of
her faithless lover, during their earliest acquaintance;
the ring, which had broken at their parting; and a
letter
to be delivered to him after her death. It was as
follows:
Dear Frederic,
If the frank avowal that you are still very dear to
my widowed heart, requires any apology, let
approaching
death be my excuse.
Methinks that my turf pillow will be as down, if you
know that my last prayer was breathed for you,my
last wishes for your happiness. The heart that you
once thought too cold, dearest Frederic, has never
reproached
him that crushed it.
I have pitied you,wept for you,and prayed for
you; but the ghost of our once plighted love, ever
spoke to me like a voice from the tomb,and it would
not let me blame you.
24
I do not think you were to me a hypocrite. I do
believe you loved me. But it is not strange that I
should have been forgotten in the midst of a busy,
tempting world. The flower that we pluck, may be
very fragrant; yet the remembrance of its sweetness
passes away, even before the frail thing withers;the
bird's wild note is music to human ears,yet to-morrow
it is as if it had never been;and woman's affectionate
smile is even as they are, in the memory of man. But
she may not thus forget her dream of love. Her heart
distils the fragrance, and echoes the sounds that are
gone; yea, even her very thoughts take root in
affection
.
I love the books that you have read; and for
your sake, their ideas have become my own. I cannot,
if I would, escape from your image. It is seated by our
fireside,it is walking in our paths,it is stamped on
every page I open.
When the grass grows above my grave, and the
violet
weeps and dies there,shall you ever think of me?
Yea,I know you will think of me; and think of me
too, as you did on the day we parted. Alas! how little
either of us then thought it was forever.
Should you come to look once more upon scenes,
which our short acquaintance has rendered very dear to
me,you will find your rose blossoming in the window
where you have so often been seated,and the book in
which you last read to me, placed by its side. These
will speak for her who will then have no voice to
welcome
you; and when you ask the forgiveness of that
dear, good old man, whose grey hairs are going down
to the grave in sorrow, he will say to you, `As my
Heavenly Father forgiveth me, even so do I forgive
you.' You too will think of God; and thus will sorrow
lose its sting. You will weep such bitter, scalding
tears as I did when I was first deserted; but you will
think of me with a gentle sigh,and my spirit will hover near, and whisper, `We meet in Heaven.' Farewell.
Grace Osborne
.
We will not attempt to portray the sorrow that
pervaded
Mr. Osborne's desolate home. The painter,
called
upon to represent a father's grief, despaired of
success
,
and wisely shrouded the convulsed features in a
mantle.
Honest Dudley and his wife were the only ones who
were loud and boisterous in their lamentations; but the
peculiar circumstances of Miss Osborne's death excited
universal interest; and the sternest nerves quivered
when the lifeless remains of so much loveliness were
lowered in the ground. The event no doubt produced
much greater sensation on account of political
fermentation
.
She whom they followed to the grave, was the
only daughter of a man that had ever firmly vindicated
the rights of America; and she had been cut down, in
the full bloom of youth and beauty, by the cruelty of a
haughty foreigner,a pampered connexion of
Hutchinson
,an
insolent military oppressor. Some urged
Mr. Osborne to seek redress for his wrongs; others
talked
loudly of revenge; but the soul of the old man was
sick within him, and he would turn away from them
with loathing, and in the privacy of his own closet he
would pour forth his sorrows to the God who heareth
prayer.
Governor Hutchinson had great kindness of feeling,
though it had been too much chilled by ambition and
avarice. This sad catastrophe was sudden to him; and
it affected him deeply. Madam Sandford, too, forgot
all her disappointed schemes in unfeigned contrition for
the prejudices she had indulged. The result of all this,
was a long letter from Governor Hutchinson, thanking
Lucretia for various munificent presents, conjuring her
to return to them, and begging forgiveness for the hasty
resentment which had separated them from one they
loved so much.
When Miss Fitzherbert showed this epistle to Mr.
Osborne, he drew her affectionately to his bosom, and
said, You shall do just as your heart dictates, my dear
child. Yet for her sake, you are dear to me as a
daughter
;
and who shall bathe the old man's throbbing head,
or smooth his pillow, when you are away? Above all,
who shall talk to me of her that is gone, and give relief
to the troubled soul by sharing all its griefs?
You still have Henry left, my dear sir, replied
Lucretia, with a tearful smile.
True; and the blessing of heaven will rest on that
dutiful son and affectionate brother; but the voice of
woman sooths the mourner, and the cordial is more
healing when prepared by her hand. Nevertheless, as
you will, dear friend of my beloved daughter.
Wherever
you are, my affection and my blessing will rest
upon
you.
Lucretia kissed away a tear before it had time to fall,
and immediately answered the benefactors of her youth,
by saying, that her love and gratitude had never abated,
that she should think much of them, and visit them
often, but that her heart was weary of splendour,that
she loved the quiet home of Mr. Osborne, and thought
it her duty to remain with him during the remainder of
his pilgrimage.
About three weeks after Grace's farewell letter was
despatched to Somerville's supposed residence, a young
man, wild and hurried in his manner, called upon the
sexton, and requested the key of Mr. Osborne's tomb.
With weak, irregular steps, he entered that house of
death, and raised the lid of the coffin last placed there.
Convulsed and shuddering, he started back! The
imagination
shrinks from mortal decay,yet it conveys a
moral which beauty should remember.
The stranger dared not trust himself with another look.
He leaned on the coffin, for a few minutes, as if utterly
unconscious of existence. Not a sigh, not a tear,
relieved
the bursting anguish of his heart. His eye
accidentally
rested on the inscription:
Grace Osborne; aged 19. Departed this life May
27th, 1769.
He sprung forward, as if an adder stung him,and
throwing himself on the ground, clasped the sod to his
forehead, as if to cool its burning agony. It was here
that the sexton found him, and after a tedious effort, he
persuaded him to lean on his arm, and suffer himself to
be led to a neighbouring hotel. The next day he was
24*
gone. He had sought acquaintance with no one, and
no one knew his name; but he was always supposed to
be Frederic Somerville Fitzherbert.
Four weeks after this mysterious visit, the Baltimore
paper announced that a young man had died at the
King's Head tavern, in a high fever, and very delirious.
A postscript added, that letters were found among his
papers, some directed to Captain Frederic Somerville,
and others to Colonel Frederic S. Fitzherbert.
Governor Hutchinson immediately repaired thither.
The nephew of whom he had once been so proud, had
indeed fallen a victim to his own fluctuating principles
and misguided feelings.
A will was found, in which his small property,
consisting
of about two thousand pounds, was left to Henry
Osborne. In this document was inclosed the following
fragment:
Much injured Friend,
Your sweet sister is dead! Well, I shall not long
survive her. No matter what I think of;I have
horrible
thoughts sometimes: but I shall not long survive
her. What money I have, I will leave to you. It is
the only atonement that I can now make for all my
errors
all
my cruelty. I have plunged into dissipation;
but the glance of beauty has made me writhe in agony.
I have looked on where others were happy; but at my
approach, every bud of joy withered. I am the
branded
outcast of heaven. Every eye glances at me in
hatred
.
I know not what I write. Sense, memory, every
thing, lies buried in that cold, distant grave. I wish I
could pray,but my stubborn knee will not bend, and
my proud heart rises in defiance of Almighty power.
From His eye I cannot flee,and it frowns upon me in
tremendous wrath. I carry my hell within me.
Here this wild epistle broke suddenly off. Miss
Osborne's
letter was found among his papers; but whether
he had received it before this was written,and
whether
it soothed or maddened him, seemed wholly
uncertain
.
Those whom he had so deeply injured, wept when
they heard of his death. If he had sinned, he had
likewise suffered; and the grave covers all.
Among his papers was a journal, which in many
places
betrayed a willingness to return to the object of his
first affection, and a thorough conviction that it would
be entirely useless.
In one place he mentioned Lucretia,said she had
treated him as he deserved,that he had ceased to
breathe her name with curses, and that his respect and
kind wishes would ever follow her.
It is not in the nature of man to stand at the grave
even of an enemy, and hate the handful of dust that
lies beneath him; and, oh, how bitterly do we
remember
any pain we may have given those we once loved,
whatever was the provocation.
All the wrongs Lucretia had endured, were forgotten.
She only remembered her youthful lover, splendid in
his talents,ardent and generous in his feelings.
Were he but alive, thought she, I could
welcome
even insult from his lips,nay, kneel to thank him
for one look,though that look were hatred.
CHAP. XXI.
The time is coming now, and the weird's dree'd, and the wheel's turning.
Guy Mannering
.
The
hatred that subsisted between the citizens of
Boston, and the troops sent to compel them to
submission
,
grew every day more rancorous. There seemed
likely to be no end to insults, abuses, and petty
stratagems
of malice. At length, a soldier having received
a blow from some one of the lower orders of people,
implicated his companions in the quarrel. This led to
new and repeated vexations; and on the fifth of March,
1770, the populace, exasperated beyond further
endurance
,
armed themselves with clubs, and ran to
King-street
,
shouting, Drive out the rascals! they are not
fit to breathe the air of a free country!
The sentinel at the barracks called out the guard to
his assistance; and had they not been restrained by
their officers, they would have rushed on the citizens
with furious slaughter.
Stand back! and form a line! said Captain
Preston
,
waving his sword as he spoke; and obedient to
military orders, they formed one long, firm phalanx, and
stood as motionless as pieces of ancient armour.
Infuriated by the calm contempt, which this stillness
indicated, the multitude rushed on to the very points of
their bayonets.
Fire, cowards! fire! was the general shout.
Aye, spill blood! cried the shrill voice of Molly
Bradstreet, who was at that moment towering along the
side-walk. Spill blood, red from the hearts of your
brethren;but do it at your peril. You'll live to see
it fearfully avenged.
Hush, woman,hush, for Heaven's sake, exclaimed
John Dudley; there will be horrid work here,
before
the sun goes down.
The villains lack courage to fire on freemen,
answered
she, in her loudest, and most insulting tones.
Yes, they dare not! they dare not! was echoed
by the crowd.
A deep, half-smothered sound of wrath ran along the
troops; and an instant after the fatal words were spoken,
a volley of musketry rent the air. The clashing of
clubs and bayonets,the loud rolling of drums,the
violent din of bells,the screamsthe imprecations
the curses, and the howlings of the multitude, were
terrible
beyond all description; yet even above them all,
might be distinguished the piercing shrieks of the
wounded
,
and the groans of those who grasped the earth in
their last, mortal agony.
The witch, to whose mysterious conduct we have so
often alluded, was among the number of the dying.
There she lay, upon the cold, slippery earth,looking
upward with an intense expression of pain,her bright
red cardinal fluttering at her side, like the outspread
banner of a fallen chieftain. In a most imploring voice,
she called out, Wherever Lucretia Fitzherbert is,
carry me there,oh, carry me there. Honest John
Dudley heard the name she mentioned, and drew near
to understand the nature of her request; but as he
stooped to listen, a ball grazed his ear, and sunk deep
into his shoulder. Staggering he fell back, and his head
rested on the wounded side of the expiring woman.
The discordant uproar increased,the clang of bells
grew louder and louder,the heavy tramp of horses
mingled with the vociferations of the mob; and
Hutchinson
was heard expostulating with the soldiers at the
very top of his voice.
How dared you fire without orders? said he.
Because we would not brook the insolence of these
low-born rebels, was the reply.
The fierce altercation died away upon the ear of the
two unfortunate beings we have mentioned. How long
they remained insensible they knew not; but when they
recovered, Doctor Willard was standing over them,
binding up their wounds.
The first words the woman uttered were,
Fitzherbert
!
Fitzherbert! Will nobody carry me there.
In compliance with her request, she was placed on
one of the litters, which had been hastily prepared, and
conveyed to Queen-street.
Henry Osborne had, on the first alarm, joined the vast
multitude collected in King's-street; but his father, at
Lucretia's earnest request had remained at home,
listening
to the distant tumult with the most intense anxiety.
When he saw the litter stop before his door, he ran out,
and eagerly inquired, Is it Henry? Is it my only son?
Has he gone too?
No, my dear sir, answered Doctor Willard; it
is a poor crazy woman, who has fallen a victim to this
accursed soldiery.
Oh, what a scene of horrors is this, rejoined Mr.
Osborne. I knew it must be so, but I little thought
my old eyes would live to see it.
Yes, the blow is struck, said Doctor Willard;
and the wound will fester long, before it heals. The
rascals say we dare not fight.By Heaven, I hope I
shall die up to my knees in blood.
While this brief conversation took place between the
gentlemen, the wounded woman was removed from the
litter to a bed prepared for her reception. Doctor
Willard
,
after careful examination, gave it as his opinion,
that if the ball were speedily extracted, her life might
possibly be saved.
It is better otherwise, said the wretched woman,
casting a searching glance around the apartment; but
will she not come to see me die?
Lucretia entered just as she finished speaking,
bringing
with her some cordial she had been preparing. The
sufferer raised her withered hands, and looked upward
with an expression of fervent gratitude.
Send them all away, whispered she, as Lucretia
offered her the cup; I have somewhat to say to you.
As soon as her wish was intimated the physician and
the servants withdrew; and even before the door had
closed, she clasped Lucretia's hand in hers, pressed it
to her lips, and kissed it again and again with frantic
joy. I had not hoped to die thus, she said. I have
lived, sinned, and suffered alone; and even thus did I
think to depart.
Miss Fitzherbert would have taken this for the ravings
of insanity,but the remark she had heard her make on
her way to Hollis-street church, the day Mr. Whitfield
preached there; her conduct at Mr. Wilson's funeral;
and her emotions when viewing the portrait, formed a
strange and puzzling coincidence.
Poor woman, said she, what can occasion the
interest you take in me?
The invalid looked up as if imploring from her that
compassion and tenderness which the rest of the world
denied her. Could you, said she, endure the
thought that you were related to such an outcast in
creation
as I am?
I could welcome any thing to my heart that was
connected with a mother I have been taught to love and
respect, replied Lucretia.
Oh, Lucretia Fitzherbert, rejoined this mysterious
being, may the end of your pilgrimage be more
cheerful
than mine has been. It is a sore thing to the heart
to live in this wide world, and know there is not a
single
soul cares when or how you leave it. To feel that
those for whom you would sacrifice life and limb,yea,
heart and soul, would consider you as a blot upon their
fair name,a vile weight to sink them into the mire of
poverty and shame. You will hate me,you will hate
me.
Had you no children? inquired Lucretia, in a
tone of heartfelt pity.
I had.Your mother was my child.
But, said Lucretia, in a faltering voice, my
mother and Gertrude May were not sisters?
No, they were not. But you have not a drop of
Fitzherbert blood in your veins. She covered her
eyes with both her hands, as she spoke, as if she feared
to see the effect her tidings produced.
Lucretia was, for an instant, deadly pale; and she
grasped her grandmother's arm in a manner that
expressed
more plainly than words could have done, the
intensity
of her feelings,the eagerness of her curiosity.
I must, said the old woman, attempting to rise,
but writhing with pain, as she again fell back upon the
pillow, I must tell my crime while I have the strength.
Time is precious now; for never will these old eyes
witness the rising of another sun. Matilda Howe and
my Gertrude were companions. She married Captain
Fitzherbert, about the same time that Harry Wilson
said he married Gertrude. I was not in Halifax at that
period. I always had a wandering, restless spirit after
my husband left me;but I learned afterward that
Wilson
was jealous of the Captain; and she drew her
breath hard as she spoke,there was some dreadful
business.
I took you from my dying daughter, when you were
six weeks old, and went to pour forth my griefs to the
kindhearted
Mrs. Fitzherbert. She was sick with a fever,
and the babe that is now Mrs. Percival, lay sleeping
in her cradle. God forgive me for the wicked deed!
Trouble had shattered my poor mind; but I was an
ambitious
25
woman to the last. The daughter of Captain
Fitzherbert, I thought, would be rich and respectable,
but who could tell what would become of Harry
Wilson's
poor child. Satan tempted me,and I yielded.
You are Gertrude Wilson. Can you forgive me?
She spoke in accents hurried and frantic,
occasionally
interrupted by violent spasms. Lucretia could not
look upon the poor wretch with any thing like
resentment
;
but a consciousness of degradation, and shame
for the gross imposture that had been practised, troubled
and confused her mind,and she wept in silence.
I knew it would be so, said the old woman,
bursting
into tears. I knew you could not forgive me for
telling you the unwelcome tidings;but, oh, my child,
it was a heavy weight,and I could not carry it down
to my grave. No other mortal is privy to it; and the
secret which pride has kept so long, death will keep
forever. You need not be disgraced in the eye of the
world.
I do not mourn that you have told me now,
replied
Lucretia; but that you had not told me years
before. It is dreadful to think that I have wronged
another
,and
that all my honours and enjoyments have
been the fruits of deception. But let that pass away.
I will atone for it, and never remember it against you,
my grandmother.
Oh, that I should ever live to hear that blessed
sound, said the aged woman. Raise up my head,
let me look at you, and die in your arms.
Lucretia did as she desired,and in the depth of her
pity, she even imprinted a kiss on the wrinkled forehead
of one, whose guilt and sufferings had all been for her
sake. But my motherwas she murdered? said
she, in a shuddering tone.
Your father confessed it on his death-bed; but
Gertrude
made me believe she died of an accidental wound.
The heart of woman is a strange thing. It will live for
years on the remembrance of kindness; and like a
lamb, it will fondle upon the hand that stabs it.
And my father? Did you see him afterward, till the
day he died?
Once he came to my old hut at the foot of
Rattlesnake
Hill, to have his fortune told. I learned the black
art of a Scotch woman. I don't know whether there
was any thing in it, but things would sometimes come to
pass as my books foretold. There was nobody in the
world to love me, and so I had a mind they should fear
me; and it was pleasant enough to see, how strong as
well as weak were slaves to my power.
Your father had been gone many a long year,
nobody
knew where; and well I guessed for no good
purpose
.
I knew him at first sight, for hatred has a
memory
like love. I knew by his actions that he was the
murderer of my child. I said I would be revenged,
and I had it in my heart to kill him; but he was your
father, and I could not go through with it.
Here the invalid seemed exhausted with the extreme
exertion she had made; and Lucretia, alarmed at the
rapid changes in her countenance, hastened to call the
physician. Say one thing before you go, exclaimed
the old woman; lest when you come back, I should
not have ears to hear it. I have been a poor, wronged,
half crazed, and furious creature; but I am calm now;
and I shall soon be calmer still. I have staid away from
you months and years, in my solitary pilgrimage,
because
I would not come among your proud friends to
disgrace you; but love was sometimes too strong for
me, and I would plod many a weary mile but to look on
you, and hear the sound of your voice. Can you
forgive
your old grandmother?
I do, I do, replied Lucretia. She was about to
add that she hoped she would yet live many years, happy
and respectable; but an unbidden feeling rose up to
prevent her utterance; and surely in one whose pride
of rank had been so peculiarly fostered by education and
circumstances, this tinge of the world's vanity might be
forgiven.
When Miss Fitzherbert descended to the parlour, she
was startled to find the Doctor engaged in fastening a
bandage around Henry's arm. It is a mere trifle,
said young Osborne, inwardly rejoicing at the injury
which had procured him such a look of anxious
affection
.
Father has gone up to see honest Dudley, who
has a far worse wound; but the Doctor says he will
recover.
Yes, he will do well enough, replied Willard; and
if all the country were made of such stubborn stuff as
he is, we should soon gaze at the sterns of those
infernal
war-ships, and see the last blush of the red cross
flag upon our waters.
The time will come, said Henry. The land is
wide awake, and the good cause gains ground.
True, rejoined the Doctor; even Miss Lucretia
Fitzherbert has become a proselyte; and surely she
would not, without powerful
reasons
.
Lucretia blushed deeply. I told you, said she,
that the poor woman above stairs is very weak.
Indeed
you must go to her. I will take care of Mr.
Osborne's
arm.
You had better take good care of it,for the right
hand is on it, you know, said the Doctor, with a very
sly glance, as he closed the door after him.
Though Henry had said his wound was so very slight,
he now began to think it necessary for his kind nurse to
examine it, and tighten the bandages,then it was a
long time before the handkerchief which supported it was
rightly adjusted; and no doubt he would have resorted
to a thousand other artifices to secure the presence and
attentions of a beloved object, had not Lucretia very
decidedly said she must return to the sick stranger, and
leave Phbe in attendance upon him.
She met Doctor Willard, just leaving the chamber.
It is all over with the poor old creature, said he.
I feared she would die as soon as the wound was
opened.
The physician did not know how to account for the
agitation which this news produced. It did indeed bring
relief to Lucretia's mind to know that the unhappy being
had gone beyond the reach of earthly suffering, and
that the shame of such a connexion was spared her;
25 *
but this feeling was deeply mingled with self-reproach.
Had she lived, no sympathy could possibly have existed
between them; yet it seemed very heartless to rejoice
at the death of one to whom she was so nearly allied
by nature. To feel that we ought to give our affections
where it is utterly out of our power, is painful indeed;
and if we fail from the impossibility, it is long before our
own hearts excuse it.
The day following these melancholy occurrences, the
citizens met together, and after a short consultation, sent
a message to the Lieutenant Governor, signifying that
there was every thing to fear from the excited state of
the populace,and that the army must be removed from
Boston without delay. Governor Hutchinson had had
sufficient proof of the spirits he had to deal with;
accordingly
,
he gave orders that the troops should
immediately
embark for Castle William. Not satisfied with
this atonement for the injuries they had suffered, the
inhabitants resolved to express their indignation, sorrow
and compassion, by celebrating the obsequies of the
slain in the most public and honourable manner. True,
none of them were much superior to the miserable
woman
whose strange story had produced such an
unexpected
change in the prospects of Lucretia Fitzherbert;
but they were fellow-citizens, slaughtered by the hand
of violence and oppression. On the morning of the
8th, business was universally suspended, many of the
windows were hung with black, and all the bells of
Boston
,
Charlestown, and Roxbury, joined in one funeral
toll. Long files of carriages and horses, followed by
an immense train on foot, were seen winding their way
toward King-street, where the multitude of human heads
seemed like the waves of the ocean, making the brain
dizzy with their numbers. Thus was the mother of
Gertrude May conveyed to her last home.
When the fraud which had placed Lucretia in the
possession of rank and fortune, was first disclosed to her,
it seemed like some bewildered dream. The more she
thought on the subject, the more the value of what she
was about to lose increased in her estimation. It must
be confessed, she was sorely tempted to conceal the
disgraceful
truth,but none of Lucretia's faults had a tinge
of meanness or hypocrisy; and she would have scorned
to purchase a crown at the expense of generosity and
candour. Accordingly she frankly disclosed all the
circumstances
to her astonished friends, a few days after
her grandmother's death.
There is no end to the wonders in your life, my
dear girl, said Mr. Osborne. Many a heroine of
romance does not meet with half your reverses.
And few living heroines, rejoined Henry, have
come forth so stainless from the midst of trials and
temptations.
It does indeed argue no weak virtue, my child,
said Mr. Osborne, to decide rightly, with so much
promptitude, in a case like this. But let us hear your
letter to Mrs. Percival.
Lucretia opened the paper, and read as follows:
My dear Mrs. Percival,
It is long since I have written to you,longer than
I once thought it ever would be; but heart-trying scenes
prevented it, after my return from England; and when
their bitterness had passed away, I was too much
depressed
to make any mental exertion.
I received your husband's letter, thanking me for
the picture which I sent him on account of its extreme
resemblance to you.
That mystery is now solved. You, of course,
recollect
Polly May, generally called Molly Bradstreet,
who behaved in so singular a manner at the funeral in
Roxbury. She was my grandmothernot yours. The
papers will give you an account of the bloody affray
between the soldiers and citizens in this oppressed town.
She was passing through King-street at the time, and
was mortally wounded. On her death-bed she
confessed
that she exchanged us, during our infancy. This
explains the resemblance, which, I have been told,
troubled
my poor father in his dying moments. This
accounts
for the indifference my grandmother evinced
toward you, and the eager interest she always took in
every thing that concerned me. You may well believe
that I am deeply ashamed as well as grieved, to think
that I have visited England, and associated with the
rich, the powerful, and the learned there, under the
mask of an impostor:but I was innocent in my
ignorance
,and
I have long since learned that conscious
rectitude of purpose will enable us to go through the
most fiery trials which this changing world can offer.
None of your vast capital has, of course, been
expended
.
The large sums that have, for four years past,
supported
me in luxury, will, I trust, be returned to you at
some future season; though I confess I do not know
where I am to procure the means. I will write
immediately
to my agent in England, whom I would
recommend
to you as a faithful and disinterested man. The
sooner a legal transfer of property is made, the better.
If you can gather any particulars concerning my
grandmother
,
I wish you to write them. She appeared to
me to have uncommon strength of mind, and ideas
somewhat above her station.
I am very affectionately,
Gertrude Wilson
.
Queen-street,
March 10th, 1770.
A few weeks after, the following answer was
received
:
Much respected Madam,
We know not at which to admire most,the sudden
change that puts us in possession of such wealth,or
the noble integrity that could voluntarily relinquish it.
Do not insult us by talking of what you have
expended
.
If my beloved wife had always known
herself
as Lucretia Fitzherbert, she would have rejoiced
to give genius like yours every opportunity to improve
itself. Few could have travelled in England to so much
advantage and very few have so richly deserved all the
enjoyment that could be found there. Never mention the
subject again, I beg of you;it seems as if you thought
we had not souls to appreciate your generous character.
You write as if you supposed this transfer of property
would leave you poor. My uncle Townsend's fortune
was ample for New England; though a mere trifle
compared
with what we all considered yours. Do you
forget
that his estates were all left to Gertrude Wilson, in
case Edward Percival did not marry her? And how, I
pray you, can Edward Percival comply with any such
requisition? However, I shall soon be in Boston to
attend
to this business. We will then exchange our
respective
rights and titles; and, be as disinterested as
you will, you shall not go beyond me.
I made many inquiries concerning Mrs. Polly May,
when I returned to Canada, at the close of the year
1765, but I could never obtain much information. She
was, as you say, a woman of uncommon strength of
mind; by means of which she obtained an almost
unbounded
influence over the vulgar and the superstitious.
She was a favourite servant in a rich English family at
Halifax, I have been told; and received from them an
education rather above the common stamp. A wild
young Englishman, who visited this family, was
captivated
with her beauty, and married her privately. He
left her; and soon after he returned to his native
country
,
he married the daughter of a Scottish nobleman.
She went over in search of him,was treated with
great cruelty and scorn,and returned a poor,
passionate
,
insane creature. She never took much care of her
child; though in her intervals of reason, she treated
her with distracted fondness. This daughter was very
beautiful; and it is not strange that under such
circumstances
,
she grew up vain, giddy, and headstrong. She
was your mother;but you know her story, and I will
not dwell upon its horrors.
There are things to lament in the character of these
people, most surely; but their faults ought not to throw
a shadow on their posterity. True majesty of soul, like
yours, madam, can derive no additional lustre from the
adventitious circumstances of wealth and station.
Lucretia
(when shall I learn to call her so) desires her
sincerest
love.
I am with great respect and admiration,
Edward Percival
.
Montreal,
April 9th, 1770.
Mr. Percival soon after came to New England, as he
had proposed; and all necessary arrangements were
made with as much delicacy and generosity as possible.
Lucretia assumed the name of Gertrude Wilson; and
again appeared in the newspapers far and wide as the
heroine of a wonderful and romantic story.
CHAP. XXII.
It was not with the bands of common love
Our hearts were knit together; they had been
Silent companions in those griefs which move
And purify the soul; and we had seen
Each other's strength and truth of mind, and hence
We loved with passion's holiest confidence.
During
the first year after Colonel Fitzherbert's
death, Lucretia (whom we must now call Gertrude
Wilson) suffered much more acutely than Grace had
ever done. But her superior strength of constitution
and of character resisted the fierce attacks which for a
while threatened to destroy them. The wounds in
youthful hearts heal slowly,but they will heal. Time
had his usual soothing power; and though Gertrude was
never afterward the same gay, laughing creature,
overflowing
with life, and health, and genius, she gradually
became cheerful, and even animated. Her mind was
now like a fine old painting, the dazzling brilliancy of
which had become delightfully mellowed by the touch
of time.
Blessings are frequently wafted to us on the wings of
disappointment; and the hand from which we shrink,
often has healing in its touch. Affliction had done for
Gertrude what the music of Amphion did for Thebes,
when the confused materials of grandeur which lay
scattered about in magnificent profusion, arose at the
voice of his lyre, and formed themselves into one
beautiful
and harmonious whole. In early life, she had
bowed
too devoutly at the shrine of talents, heedless
whether
,
or not, it stood on the firm pedestal of virtue; but
experience had taught her that the greatest gifts might
be most shamefully perverted. Genius is the electric
fluid of the soul.Alas! that the mysterious and
erratic
power which purifies the intellectual air, should ever
leave scathe and blackening on the heart.
Wealth, with all its imposing pageantry, and rank with
its embroidered baldrick and blazing star, had been
idols before which her imagination had bowed with
scarcely inferior homage; and she had proved their utter
insufficiency to satisfy the soul in its hour of trial; nay,
she had been driven from their sunny paths, and found
happiness in more shaded and sequestered walks. All
these lessons, severely as they were taught, had
produced
a good effect. She now began to estimate men
and things according to their real value,to appreciate
qualities according to their usefulness, not according to
their lustre.
No one was more pleased with these changes than
Henry Osborne, for no one had watched her singular,
and somewhat dangerous course, with such fearful,
anxious
affection. She too, acknowledged herself
pleasantly
disappointed in his character. Traits of mind which
she had not supposed to exist, were found, upon intimate
acquaintance, to be like the hues of the rainbow, so
equally blended as to be inconspicuous, until the power
of friendship drew them forth in separate and striking
beauty.
It can readily be imagined what would be the result,
when two young people, never disagreeable to each
other
,
sympathized in the same griefs, shared the same
duties
,
26
read the same books, and frequented the same
walks.
Mr. Osborne had resolved to keep the anniversary of
Grace's death, during his life time. Her portrait was
hung with evergreens,little mementos of her were
brought forward; and they talked of her as they would
of an absent friend. The twenty-seventh of May
returned
for the second time since the dear one had gone
out from among them; and no other change had taken
place in that affectionate household. When Henry
entered
the library early in the morning, he found the
ebony writing-desk open, and the work-box by its side,
just as they were wont to be before his lovely sister had
fallen a victim to her ill-judged, but too constant
attachment
.
His eye glanced from them to Gertrude, as if to thank
her for the arrangement which had so noiselessly called
up visions of the past.
I like your father's manner of celebrating this day,
said Gertrude. She who never gave any of us pain
while living, ought not to have her memory cherished
with sighs and tears.
True, replied Henry; she is an angel in heaven;
and, if blessed spirits can know sorrow, it is fitter she
should weep for us, than that we should mourn for her.
Yet I can hardly think of her as in another world. When
I look at that vacant chair, in which she used to sit, I
almost fancy that I see her beautiful golden hair hanging
over it. When I gaze on her portrait, it seems to smile
upon me, as she was wont to do, when I uttered your
praises. What a host of recollections these trifles have
called up. Here is a branch of cedar, which the dear
girl gathered at Castle William, the night before the
stamped paper had arrived there. Do you remember
that sail, Gertrude?
I do indeed, replied she; and, oh, what changes
have taken place since then. How altered are all my
thoughts and feelings
Do you recollect, said Henry, that you once
promised if I would wait a few years, you should learn
to be collected and prudent,just as calm as the river
in summer's moonlight?
Yes, I remember it well, rejoined Gertrude,
smiling; and have I not become almost a Quaker,
Friend, I should say, I suppose?
I would have you something more than a
friend
,
answered he, with very peculiar emphasis.
Upon this hint they spake. Many kind things
were said, and in very tender accents; but it is foolish
to describe such scenes;volatile as ether, the spirit
evaporates the moment you give it air.
Suffice it to say, that Gertrude's second nuptials, in
every respect so strikingly different from her first, had
a termination as pleasant as those were unfortunate.
Her hopes of happiness were now built on a firm
foundation
,that
of strict principles and long-tried affection;
and they were fully realized. Mr. Osborne, his long,
white hair streaming over his shoulders, and his
countenance
beaming with calm enjoyment, seemed like a
benignant
spirit come down to shed his blessing on an
earthly union. And it was blest,blest in mutual love,
respect and confidence,blest too, in the good old age
of a parent so justly dear to them both.
Governor Hutchinson and Miss Sandford, with whom
Gertrude had always kept up a friendly intercourse,
were present at the wedding. The old lady with all
her foibles, had a warm heart; and she kissed the bride
affectionately, as she said, I told you so. I told you
so. I said you would marry him, that night he gave
you such a lecture at our house.
Governor Hutchinson was rather more cold, though
very polite in his congratulations. If the truth must be
told, he regarded the daughter of Harry Wilson, a
pirate and a murderer, as quite an unimportant
personage
,
compared with the rich descendant of the
Honourable
Edmund Fitzherbert, of Tudor Lodge. That
illfated
politician, forgetting, like too many statesmen, that
a straight line is the shortest, whether in morals or
mathematics, daily made himself more unpopular
among his fellow citizens. His projects of personal
aggrandizement were frustrated, and his adherents
baffled
in all their schemes.
As the troubles of the Revolution increased, he
thought it prudent to seek quiet and safety in the
mother
country. Accordingly, a few years after the period
of which we speak, he sailed for England, accompanied
by his sister-in-law, and a charming family, whom we
have not introduced to our readers, because they had
not the slightest connexion with our story.
As soon as Mr. and Mrs. Percival could arrange their
affairs, they embarked for Great Britain; from whence
they afterward sent many a generous present to their
friend Mrs. Osborne.
They spent their time between Tudor Lodge and
Fitzherbert Hall; and Edward Percival had the
satisfaction
of seeing his young wife the blazing star of
fashion
and of beauty,yet as exemplary, as docile, and as
affectionate, as she was when she first left the Convent
of St. Vallier. She often sent to Mrs. Osborne the
most urgent invitations to revisit England; and
flattering
letters from the first literary characters, contained
the same earnest request; but Gertrude had now
devoted
all the light of her understanding, and all the warmth
of her affections, to the happiness of her excellent
husband
.
The political horizon soon became more stormy
in its aspect; and Henry could not think of leaving
America, at a time when she needed all the firmness,
the talents, and the courage of her sons. During the
whole of the bloody period which followed, he rendered
important services in the senate and the field; and
when he returned to his anxious family, in 1784, after
a long absence, the elder Mr. Osborne gave him a
blessing
warm from the heart of the father and the patriot;
and when Gertrude came, with her group of smiling
cherubs, to welcome him to his happy home, he pressed
them warmly to his heart, as he said, The bride was
dear; but how much dearer is the wife!
THE END.Honoured Sir,
A friend of mine, who has lately returned to
England
,
accidentally mentioned meeting Miss Fitzherbert
at your house. May I ask who this Miss Fitzherbert
is? I have been in my native country but a short time,
I am a bachelor,and my health is exceedingly
precarious
.
It is therefore important that I should know
her history and connexions immediately.
Copley is now in New England, and I should like
to have him take her picture for me. I will pay all
expenses, whether the event be as I hope, or not.
Omit no particulars concerning her father, and have all
the documents well authenticated.
I am your obedient and humble servant.
Edmund Fitzherbert
.Lieutenant-Governor, Member of the Council,
Commander of the Castle, Judge of Probate, and Chief
Justice of the Supreme Court! you are hereby
commanded
to appear under the Liberty-tree within one
hour, to plight your faith, that you will use no more
influence against an injured and an
exasperated
people.
Nemo
.Dear Madam
.
I hardly know how to account for the diffidence
I feel in addressing you. The usual exaggerated
language
of affection would, I well know, appear ridiculous
to you; and coldness or reserve is but ill suited to the
present state of my feelings. The declaration that I
have been for years most sincerely and devotedly
attached
to you, may not perhaps be entirely unexpected;
and I once hoped it would not be entirely
disagreeable
.
You do not owe your influence over me to a
sudden freak of fancy; it results from a long and
intimate
knowledge of your character. Yet I will not
flatter
you, by saying I consider you faultless;on the
contrary, I think you have defects, which may prove
very dangerous to yourself and friends, unless timely
corrected. But I cannot imagine a character more
elevated than might be formed from a mind so vigorous,
and a heart so generous and candid as yours.
How largely I think you would contribute to domestic
happiness, is proved by the step I have now taken.
Whether the lovely garland of hope, that my heart has
so long been weaving, is to be scattered to the winds,
depends on your answer. At all events, ever your
affectionate friend, and obedient servant,
Henry Osborne
.Dear Niece,
I have only time before this vessel sails, to tell you,
that the important papers,certificate of marriage,
birth, &c., came duly to hand. Evidence is ample and
satisfactory. There is no doubt that your father was my
dear, but very headstrong nephew,though your
miniature
shows not a shadow of family likeness. I rejoice
to see by your letter, that you have been educated as a
Fitzherbert should be. As a trifling acknowledgement
of this kindness, present the articles that accompany
this, to Governor Hutchinson and his sister. A voyage
at this season would be cold and dangerous, but as soon
as the spring opens, you must make for England.
Your loving uncle,
Fitzherbert
.
Grosvenor-Square, London,
Sept. 28th. 1765.Dear Grace,
This flower, pure and beautiful as yourself, was
purchased for you. Will you accept it from your
faithful
lover? Will you cherish it for his sake, during the
tedious absence to which he is doomed?
Your beauty and fascinating gracefulness, will
attract
others as powerfully as they have me; and amid
the attentions of some more favoured lover, I may
perchance
be forgotten.
Were I sure that my memory would be fostered in
the recesses of your heart,that my image alone would
be enshrined there, I should have no other boon to ask
of indulgent Heaven.
If the ring which accompanies this is permitted to
encircle your snowy finger, I shall consider it as a tacit
promise of all I have dared to hope. If not, the world
has nothing to offer, for which I care to live.
Ever most ardently and devotedly yours,
Frederick Somerville
.TO MISS GRACE OSBORNE.
Dear Grace,
Here I am, in the favoured land of the brave, the
intelligent, and the free. Yet even while I now repeat
it, I scarcely credit it. I feel as if I were walking in
my sleep; and it is only when I look out upon the
princely buildings around me, that I can realize I am
indeed
in London. Our voyage was very pleasant, with
the exception of sea-sickness. That, however, is a tax
we must all pay to
lord
Neptune for rocking us in his
cradle somewhat too roughly. (Pardon me. I forget
that the odious word
tax
is banished from the American
vocabulary.)
It was not until we came within sight of this ancient
city, that I felt the desolate sensations of an exile from
my native land. We cast anchor in the evening, among
a forest of tall black masts. The bowsprits threw their
grim shadows on the water, and seemed like so many
ugly sea-monsters, grinning defiance at each other.
The very stars looked terrific in their sublime beauty.
I gazed on them till I could almost imagine the Great
Bear shook his shaggy head above me, and that the
various fantastic shapes with which Chaldean
imagination
has peopled the zodiac, were frowning upon me in
their wrath.
Far off in the distance twinkled the many hundred
lights of London; and among all the busy haunts they
illuminated, poor Lucretia had not a single friend. It
was a sad, sickening thought, dearest Grace,and my
heart yearned for beloved America. I fancied you
seated at your work-table, listening to Henry as he read
some newly arrived volume, and the tears started to my
eyes.
Captain Somerville saw that I was melancholy, and
he did all he could to cheer me. We sat leaning over the
stern of the vessel, until a late hour, talking of you, and
watching the motion of the little boat as it rose and fell
with the rippling tide. The shore on either side was
noiseless as death; and the creaking of the rigging, and
the loud, protracted Hoa up Hoy of the distant
sailors
alone reminded us that they were from New
England.
Very early in the morning, a message was sent to
uncle
Fitzherbert,and according to aunt Sandford's
directions
,
I dressed myself as splendidly as possible; for
I must acknowledge, I felt exceedingly anxious
concerning
17
my reception. At our usual breakfasting hour,
Captain Somerville came to my cabin, and told me that
a carriage and four, with servants in the Fitzherbert
livery, were on the bank of the river. A boat was
immediately
sent from the vessel, and a footman returned
in it, bringing an invitation to Captain Somerville and
myself to breakfast at Tudor Lodge. Had you seen
my equipage, you would not wonder that my eyes were
a little dazzled. Phaeton himself might have been proud
of the horses; the servants were in rich liveries of grey
and silver; the polished harness glittered in the morning
sun; the Fitzherbert arms were gorgeously blazoned on
the pannels of the carriage; and the carriage itself was
much more superb than any thing I had ever seen in
New England.
We were whirled along by villas, hospitals, and
hotels
,any
one of which seemed to me sufficiently
magnificent
for a royal palace.
The coachman stopped before a large, noble-looking
building of Portland stone, with a piazza in front,
supported
by a range of Corinthian pillars. In a state of
dizzy incredulity I was handed up the steps, and paused
in the drawing-room until my arrival was announced.
After considerable delay, during which my heart
throbbed high with expectation and anxiety, I was
ushered
into the presence of my uncle. He received me
with great pomp and etiquette, scated in his crimson
velvet chair, in a morning robe of the same materials.
For the moment, I only remembered that he was the
first of my kindred I had ever seen, and I would have
rushed into his arms and wept. However, I
immediately
discovered that an oriental
salam
would be much
more acceptable to him. Indeed it was too evident that
my personal appearance disappointed him; but when
Captain Somerville introduced me, he took my hand
with stately courtesy, and bade me welcome to England.
Mrs. Edgarton, a distant relation, of middle age,
whose polished manners indicate habitual intercourse
with the fashionable world, superintends his
establishment
.
She seems intelligent and cultivated; but she
too is cold, dignified, and reserved.
The papers are full of the arrival of Miss Lucretia
Fitzherbert, the newly discovered American heiress,
niece of the Honourable Edmund Fitzherbert of Tudor
Lodge.
What would the world say, if they knew that, with
`all my blushing honours thick upon me,' I often
retire to my chamber, to think of Boston, and give
vent to my tears as they start up from their
fountain
of bitterness. Wealth is a glittering and much
coveted bauble; but the heart cannot nestle in it,
and cling to it, in its hour of loneliness. What do I
care for Turkey carpets, Parisian mirrors, and Chinese
vases, when every being around me is as chilling as the
tessellated marble of our grand saloon? Splendour may
please the unsated eye, but it cannot relieve a heart
bursting with the full tide of unemployed tenderness.
Do not think by this that I am unhappy. It only means
that I am not yet used to stiffened elegance and
magnificent
formality.
You cannot imagine with how much delight I have
accompanied my uncle around London and its environs.
The city itself, so varied in its beautyso crowded in
its grandeur. Then there is such lifesuch energy
such never-ceasing bustle. It is well called the heart of
Britain; for it seems heaving and bounding with the
vitality
of a whole empire. Of the suburbs, I am almost
tempted to say nothing; for I despair of giving you an
idea how lovely are the scenes among which the Thames
has spread the silver drapery of his couch. Turrets
and steeples peer above the foliage, as if on tiptoe to
view the dimpled course of this majestic river; clusters
of ancient elms dance gracefully to the wayward music
of the winds; venerable oaks stand like a firm phalanx
in their towering strongth; the fragile willows bend over
their watery mirror, sad and drooping, as if
passion-stricken
with their own shadows; and the blossoms are
so abundant in their luxuriant beauty, that one would
think Flora, enamoured of the spot, had flung all her
garlands there in frolic. The goddess, however, is not
so partial in the distribution of her favours. Your
American pastures are doubtless covered with wild
flowers. The Violet lifts up its timid blue eye in
supplication
,
as if loath to be crushed, even by your fairy
foot; the Anemone is gradually changing its rose-tint to
the purest white, like maidens outgrowing their
youthful
blushes; and the beautiful Trillium bows its starry
head beneath its dark green leaves, like a scared and
petted infant hiding its bashful face behind a mother's
sheltering arm.
Oh, when I think of all our pleasant rambles, our
unreserved
communications, and our playful disputes, it
seems as if my heart would burst its tenement, and
bound forward to meet you. I told Somerville so, this
morning; and I thought he sympathized in my
impatience
most warmly.
By the way, he called to take me to Westminster
Abbey,the first public place I have visited since my
arrival.
If Henry had not told you about it again and again, I
would inform you how I stood in the Poets' Corner, and
`held high converse with the mighty dead;' what
exultation
I felt when I saw that the sceptre had fallen
from the powerless hand of Queen Elizabeth,that
self-same cruel hand that signed the death warrant of
the beautiful Mary Stuart; and how, amid all this `pomp
and circumstance' of morality, the figure of Mr.
Nightingale
,
shielding his beloved wife from the impending
dart of death, was the only thing that touched me with
melancholy. I was indeed powerfully excited by the
whole scene. Association seems to hold her court in
this mansion of departed glory; and as her magic
fingers
touch the octaves in the human soul, imagination
runs rapidly over the intermediate notes. When I came
from the long and gloomy labyrinths of this ancient
abbey
,
I felt as if I had actually been in Elysium, talking
with kings, heroes, statesmen, and poets. Why did not
Henry tell us how his heart ached when he passed from
that still, solemn sanctuary of the dead, into all the
tumult
of this noisy city? But then he never speaks with
17 *
enthusiasm; unless, indeed, you rouse him up about
American taxation. Well! perhaps the glowing
embers
,
kept alive on the secret shrine of Apollo, burned
with more intense and consuming heat, than Cybele's
torches, flaring on the midnight air.
I shall never have done, if I write all I wish to say;
for the thoughts rush into my mind so furiously that they
push each other down in their course. Most sincere and
respectful affection to your good father; and to all my
friends the kindest wishes they can desire from me.
Write soon, and remember to speak of Gertrude
Percival
.
Do not forget me, dearest Grace, nor suffer any
one I love to forget me.
With heart-felt, soul-felt affection for you all, I am
as ever,
Lucretia Fitzherbert
.
Grosvenor Square,
June 10, 1766.TO MISS LUCRETIA FITZHERBERT.
Dear Lucretia,
We last week received your long and affectionate
letter. I was delighted, but not dazzled, with your
picture
of London. I love my own quiet chamber better
than I should marble saloons or Corinthian piazzas.
Yet our humble mansion has been sad enough since you
left us. My father's health fails daily; and long, long
before you return to us, Lucretia, I fear the dear
venerable
old man will have gone to his last home. It
grieves me to think of it. Yet why should they whose
lives have been stainless, and their purposes all holy,
shrink from the hand that enrobes them with
immortality
.
Young as I am, there are times when I would lay
down my weary, aching head, and sleep, never more
to wake in this cold world, as cheerfully as the tired
infant presses the soft pillow of its cradle.
I know this is not the right spirit. Those who would
take up the cross and follow their Divine Master, must
be resigned to live as well as to die. Yet how hard it is
to endure life, when those we have loved are dropping
around us like the leaves of autumn;when the smiles
that have been as sunshine to the soul, have left it all
dark and lonely; and tones that have been dear, yea,
very dear to us, are heard no longer. I am foolishly
melancholy just this moment; and I am childish enough
to dip my pen in my heart.
My father's sickness and uncommon depression of
spirits casts a shadow over every hing. Not only has
it rendered our dwelling dismal,but the sky does not
seem so blue, nor the grass so green, as it did last
summer
.
You, I dare say would make some sparkling
metaphor concerning such a state of things; but I have
not the gift. Henry smiled when I showed him your
letter, and said it did one as much good to read any
thing of yours, as it did to see a bed of tulips blown
about by the wind. You see that he has imagination,
my dear friend. He has enthusiasm, too,though few
discover it. Ought I to tell you, or ought I not, that when
he returned your letter, I found what you had written
of him cut out? He seems in excellent spirits,always
doing something to make us happy and cheerful; but
there are things the heart never forgets, you know, how
calmly soever it may remember them. I have not seen
him roused on the subject of taxation lately. Indeed
the times are now so peaceful and quiet, that it is
seldom
mentioned even when Doctor Willard is here. By
the way, I read a part of your letter to him; and I
assure
you, his expressive black eyes grew brighter and
brighter at every line. I wonder he was not captivated
with you, Lucretia,you are so very much like each
other. You cannot tell how solicitous he is concerning
our good father,how anxious about every symptom,
how enlivening in his conversation whenever the invalid
can bear it,and how still, kind, and careful, when his
spirits are exhausted. It is very painful not to repay
the love of a heart so generous and tender; and when
day after day I meet the same affectionate glance, and
hear the same mild, insinuating tones, it seems such a
deep and stinging reproach to my ingratitude, that I
half believe it possible;but the affections are
stubborn
things and are not easily bent according to our
wishes.
I have received two letters from Gertrude since you
left. They reside at a beautiful country-seat, not far
from Montreal; and they have both sent the most
urgent
invitations for us to visit them this summer. She
has improved wonderfully in her hand-writing. `Who,'
she asks, `can do otherwise, when Edward Percival is
the instructer?' Still her letters are as stiff, straight,
and precise as Madam Sandford. Will you pardon the
comparison? With regard to Canada, even if my father
were well enough, I should not have spirit sufficient to
make the exertion. Long may they live to enjoy their
romantic attachment. Mr. Percival has sent me a very
neat and handsome set of jewels. I thanked him,
because
I knew he meant it kindly; but I shall never wear
them. If you had not a variety much more elegant, I
would send them to you. Do you know Henry has at
length persuaded me to have my portrait taken? Yes,
there I am in our little breakfast parlour, smiling as
graciously
as if I looked on absent friends. My brother
says, `Tell Lucretia I am the same sincere
well-wisher
;'
and my father adds, `You must leave a corner of
your paper, that I may try to hold a pen long enough to
give her my blessing.' In order to comply with his
request
,
I must close by saying,
I am your very affectionate
Grace Osborne
.My dear Child,
Never was `news from a far country' more
welcome
than your letter. None of us knew how dear you
were, till you were gone from us. Poor Grace goes
from room to room, and looks at every memento of you
with such utter sadness, that one would think you were
actually in your grave; and when she hears a knock,
she will sometimes start,and then check herself, as
she says, `I was thinking Lucretia was at the door.'
Alas! how apt we all are to give the freshness and
vigour
of our affections to earthly objects, and thus have
nothing to offer our Heavenly Father, but `the lame, the
halt, and the blind.' The heathen offered the fairest
flowers and the choicest fruits to their gods, and shall
we, on whom the gospel has shone, do less than they?
While the cup of life is sparkling at your eager lips, do
not forget the kind hand which offered it. Remember,
my dear, there is a friend on whom to rely when all
others fall us. There is no public news of importance.
It has pleased the Lord to give us peace, if not security.
One `burning and shining light' has been removed from
us. I mean the much lamented Doctor Mayhew. I
need not talk of his talents to one who heard his
eloquent
sermon on the repeal of the Stamp Act; but of
his piety, his integrity, his industry, and zeal, I would,
had I strength, write for hours. During his short life,
he did much in the cause of civil and religious liberty.
I do not believe there ever was mortal man that more
faithfully served his country and his God. Alas! that
he left not his mantle behind him.
I have written this at many different times, and with
great pain, my dear girl. My heart says more; but my
trembling hand will not convey it. Yet a little while
longer, and the soul will drop its burden of clay. I can
only add, God bless you,even with the greatest of all
blessings,a disposition to do his will.
Your affectionate father,
James Osborne
.
Queen st.
August 1st, 1766.TO HIS HONOUR THOMAS HUTCHINSON.
Dear Uncle,
I delivered your letters according to their directions;
and I do not hesitate to say that the general opinion here
is entirely in favour of your views. It is, however,
very difficult to ascertain what course will be taken, for
never was there such a heterogeneous, unintelligible
mass as the present ministry. They are made up of the
shreds and patches of all political opinions,a confused
jumble of every shade and hue of whiggism.
The Marquis of Rockingham did indeed come into
the government at a peculiarly difficult crisis. The
Regency Bill of course made an enemy of Lord Bute,
because the public chose to implicate him in its
odium
;
the Duke of Grafton has forsaken their standard,
because he is offended at their treatment of Wilkes;
Chatham is as wavering and inconsistent as ever, and his
powerful friend, the excellent Duke of Cumberland,
died soon after his administration began. On the whole,
it is evident that another transformation will soon take
place. Pitt seems to have the power to lord it over
king and parliament; how he will exert his influence
nobody knowsunless he has some conjecture himself,
which his undecided character renders very doubtful.
That confoundedly clever lawyer, young Burke, gashes
him deeply in the public papers. The articles in
question
possess abundance of good sense as well as cutting
irony. The resolution against general warrants, passed
in the House of Commons, has brought Wilkes back to
London. He is here threatening to annoy the
government
,
or make his fortune out of its fears. The plan of
American taxation is by no means given up. Charles
Townsend is as eager for it, as he is for office. He
thinks to make it go down, by giving it a different name.
He has not, like me, seen an American mob, heard Otis
speak, and Doctor Willard talk. You will judge what
views he and others entertain by the letters and
documents
that accompany this.
Mr. Fitzherbert talks much of what you have done
for his niece; and seems to think he cannot load me
with favours enough to evince his gratitude. He is a
formal, and somewhat fastidious old man; but when the
crust is once broken, he proves to have a warm heart.
He is a professed connoisseur in female beauty,and he
was of course disappointed in Miss Fitzherbert. He
is unbounded in his hospitality, and his servants' hall
shows much of the prodigality of feudal times. I shall,
if possible, induce him to keep open doors for the choice
literary spirits that are now clustering together in this
18
metropolis. This will bring Lucretia forward to the
best advantage; and perhaps we all love our friends
better when we have reason to be proud of them. I
can see that her vivacity and good sense gain upon his
affections daily. She is indeed a fine girl. No one
can know her without admiring her.
The mystery concerning the report of Mr.
Fitzherbert's
death is all explained. When you sent to
England
in 1760, to inquire concerning Lucretia's
connexions
,
he was very sick at Manilla, and a profligate
relation
of his palmed the story upon his creditors, in order
to relieve himself from temporary embarrassment. Mr.
Fitzherbert is so indignant at this unfeeling deception,
that he will not consent to see him.
There is a great intimacy between Mr. Fitzherbert
and the Marquis of Rockingham. He procured Burke
the situation of private secretary to his lordship.
I send you an elegant edition of Swift, lately
published
,which
please to accept.
Respects to Madam Sandford,and kind
remembrance
to Doctor Byles and the Osbornes.
I am your humble and obedient servant.
Frederic Somerville
.
Piccadilly,
June 12th, 1766.TO MISS GRACE OSBORNE.
Dear Grace,
How very seldom you write; and how wo-begone
are your epistles. Do not think me heartless with
regard
to your father's sickness. Indeed, I have felt most
keenly for you and for him; but I have not the least
doubt that the fine, clear climate of Canada will restore
him; and even if the event should be the worst that we
can fear, you must not thus mourn away your young
existence. When you wrote last, you were just on the
point of starting for Montreal; and I assure you I
envied
you the excursion. I wish I could have visited
Gertrude before I came to England. Not only because
I loved her more than I ever loved any one in so short a
time; but I am really ashamed when asked about
Niagara
and the Lakes, to say that I have never seen them.
People here are not aware how very unusual it is for
American ladies to go out of sight of their own
chimnies
;
and as for space, they do not seem to imagine
there is such a thing on the other side of the Atlantic.
They would ask a Vermontese about the Blue Ridge,
or a Georgian about Niagara, as readily as I should
question a Londoner about St. Paul's, or beg a
description
of Snowdon from a Welchman born and bred
within
sight of its cloud-kissing peak.
During the whole of last winter we had the finest
collection of company in the world. Johnson, Burke,
Sir Joshua Reynolds, Garrick, and Goldsmith, spent an
evening with us, almost as regularly as they did at the
Turk's Head, Gerrard-street, Soho. The mere contact
of such great minds is enough to inspire one with genius.
I have the good fortune to be a favourite with that
famous
cynic, Samuel Johnson;principally, I believe,
because I treat him with the most profound reverence,
and never contradict his opinions. To Sir Joshua, I
could listen forever,because he talks of what I
understand
and love. He has described half the fine
paintings
in Italy so vividly that I imagine I have seen them.
Burke is becoming famous as a speaker; and if he is
half as delightful in parliament as he is in the
drawing-room
,
I do not wonder at his fame. `His talk,' says
Johnson, `is the ebullition of his mind; he does not
talk from a desire of distinction, but because his mind
is full.' It would amuse Henry to hear the political
disputes between these two great men. Johnson sneers
about `whig dogs,' speaks of America as an uncivilized
land,and says it would puzzle any one to tell what
good the discovery of it has done the world. Burke
contends that our country will eventually be one of the
greatest on the globe,and says that if Britain ever
loses her American Colonies, she will part with a jewel
worth her whole regalia. It is curious to observe how
sharp contention will call forth passions, which we little
folks can hardly imagine to exist in such mighty minds.
These great men remind me of Alfred's horse, cut in
the side of a chalk-hill in Berkshire. At a distance, it
looks like a fine warlike steed; but as you approach it,
all its fine proportions are lost; and at last you begin to
doubt whether it be really an animal, or merely a surface
accidentally indented by wind and storm. Among all
the geniuses to whom I have been introduced, Goldsmith
is my favourite. He loves a broad laugh, but never a
malicious one; and his constant flow of humour
originates
in fulness,not in vacuity.
We shall soon return to the city. I must say I
regret
to leave our country-seat; for thickly as this
beautiful
island is gemmed with mansions and parks, cottages
and gardens, it can boast few spots so cultivated and so
varied. The Thames sparkles before it, like a broad,
bright line of silver on the green robe of Summer. In
the distance are seen the verdant hills of Kent and
Surry
;
around whose majestic brows the setting sun daily
twines his topaz coronet of light. In every direction
the foliage is delightfully interspersed with majestic
domes, venerable turrets, and light, airy, graceful spires.
Boats of all sizes and descriptions, from the eight-oared
barge to the slender skiff, are gliding up and down the
river, like a troop of wild swans on the Potomac, giving
life and motion to its slumbering beauty.
19*
Within doors, I can feast my eye on a fine gallery
of paintings. Here are the pictures of Rembrandt,
steeped in sunshine; the gods and goddesses of Guido,
more like the seraphs of a Christian heaven, than the
deities of Olympus; and the sublime productions of
Raphael, beaming with an expression of soul, which his
pencil alone could give. But there is one picture here
that seems to me like dreaming of a distant friend,
troubling while it pleases me. I is among the family
portraits which decorate my bed-chamber; and was
taken, I am told, for my grandmother Fitzherbert. It
is Gertrude Percival to the life! The same high,
intellectual
forehead; the same Aurora freshness of
complexion
;
the same majestic contour of neck and
shoulders
.
I do not know how they would compare together;
but I thought the likeness so striking, that I have
employed
Sir Joshua Reynolds to make me a copy to bring to
America. What associations that name awakens! how
much the very sound makes my heart leap toward you.
Yet my affections cling to good old England. I love
her country scenes embosomed in forests, and garlanded
with flowers; I love the rapid pulsation of her mighty
capital; I love to gaze on her far-stretching galaxy of
genius; and, `last, not least' I love the bravery,
frankness
,
and hospitality of her sons.
One other association knocks at my heart, dearer
than all that taste or reason can furnish. It was here I
first heard declarations of love from the only man I ever
wished to please. There was a time when you
indulged
yourself in a little gentle raillery about my sliding
heart;and why, dear Grace, did you cease to be
unreserved
on the subject? I once supposed that Captain
Somerville had a powerful advocate in your own feelings.
Was it so? and did you reject him from the dictates of
judgment? Or are you still a stranger to that mysterious
affinity which draws two young souls toward each other?
Perhaps timidity was the only enemy our patriotic young
friend had to contend with; and after all that is past
and gone, Mrs. Willard may stand ready to greet Mrs.
Somerville, on her return to America.I forgot, when I
said Mrs. Somerville,for uncle will not consent to our
marriage, unless the Captain will take my family name;
and he is now going through the necessary forms for
that purpose. I wish you could have a share in the
ceremony that gives me a hand invaluable to my heart,
though it proved unacceptable to yours.
When you write again, I trust your father will be
quite recovered. You do not know how grateful I am
for the kind wishes he always sends me. Kiss his
venerable forehead, and tell him that, to such a generous
creditor, I shall never be a bankrupt in affection. I
thought happiness had dried up the fountain of my tears;
but your last letter was so sad that I wept in spite of
myself.
Ever yours with all the intense affection I am
capable
of feeling.
Lucretia Fitzherbert
.
Fitzherbert Hall,
Nov. 15, 1767.TO MISS LUCRETIA FITZHERBERT.
Dear Lucretia,
I found your letter dated November 15th, waiting our
arrival, when we returned from Canada. Gertrude and
I wrote you a crowded epistle last autumn; I wonder
you had not received it before you wrote. She is very
happy. Indeed her affectionate heart deserves it. Had
she been a sister in very truth, she could not have
loved me more, or been more kindly attentive to my
father.
I have heard you speak of people in whom delicacy
and refinement seemed like instinct. Mrs. Percival's
certainly is so. She perceived that images and pictures
of the saints distressed my good father (his soul you
know entereth not into their strange worship)nothing
was said;but the morning after our arrival, I noticed
they had all disappeared. I cannot tell such fine stories
about my Canadian excursion, as you tell of England.
I was ever seated at my father's bed-side, or supporting
his arm as he walked. You will think this was
wearisome
;
but I assure you it is like cordial to the spirit to
meet affection in the languid eye of sickness, and to see
blessings and thanks quiver on lips that have not strength
to utter them. Truly, I would not have exchanged my
solitary task for all the treasures of Burke's eloquence,
or Goldsmith's wit. Your speaking of pictures reminds
me of a Magdalen which an Italian artist painted for
Mrs. Percival. It would doubtless appear mean to your
practised eye; but it found its way to my heart. The
countenance is pale and melaneholylike one who has
loved and been forsakenone who has early learned
that the flowers of earth wither away; but there is
devotion in the uplifted eye, which speaks of better
hopes than this vain world can offer. So purely did it
breathe of celestial joys, that my spirit fluttered like a
captive bird,and I would fain have gone away and
slept the last quiet sleep.
My father is recovering fast. A gentle light beams
from his eye, and his step is firm even as it was wont to
be, when you and I and all of us were happy together.
Long long, Lucretia, may you enjoy the scenes
you love so well, and the society you so well know how
to adorn. I am often selfish enough to wish you were
here. However, the luxuriance of the park and the
green-house must be yours;enough for me, the
trembling
little wild flower that breathes its fragrance at my
feet. Blessings on its innocent beauty! It smiles
through a delicious existence, and at the end of one
brief season droops its dying head on the bosom of the
turf that nourished it. Why should we envy them?
Are not mortals as fragile as they? I love flowers.
They speak of nature, and they speak of God. I would
rather have them cluster around my grave and moisten
it with the dew-drop of morning and evening, than to
repose beneath the cold, heavy monuments of
West-minster
Abbey.
May you ever be happy, dear Lucretia;
particularly
may you be fortunate in that important stepthe
only one, save death, which can never be retraced.
Your allusion to Doctor Willard was very painful to me.
My heart is not cold and unfeelingperhaps it has
thought on domestic happiness too deeply,too fondly;
but the day dream has vanished.
My kind remembrance to your intended husband.
The blessing of Israel's God be with you.
Your affectionate
Grace Osborne
.Queen st.,
June 30th, 1768.
TO MISS SALLY SANDFORD.
Dear Aunt,
I last week received a package from Boston,
containing
letters from uncle Hutchinson, Grace Osborne,
and yourself.
Many thanks for your bridal sash. I shall most
certainly wear it at the important time for which it was
designed.
Captain Somerville now writes his name Frederic
Somerville Fitzherbert. I was sorry uncle's family
pride required this sacrifice. There seems to be
something
degrading in the bridegroom's losing his name
instead
of the bride. However he seems resolved to
repay this acquiescence by the most rapid promotion.
He is now Colonel of his Majesty's 14th regiment of
dragoons. I have repeatedly told you, that uncle is one
of the most formal, precise men in the world. You
would have been amused with his reception of Captain
Somerville, the day he came to make proposals in due
form. It was at an hour when he did not usually receive
visiters; Mrs. Edgarton had just placed the bolster of
the couch so that he could recline comfortably; and I,
like a dutiful niece, stood ready to read the newspaper,
which had just been brought in,when the servant
entered
,
and, making a low bow said, `Captain
Somerville
is in the library, wishing to speak with your
honour.'
`Show him up, John.'
`He wishes to speak with you alone, if it pleases
you.'
I guessed his errand,for I had heard some
intimation
of it in the picture gallery, the day before. My uncle seemed to suspect too; for he chucked me under
the chin, as he rose, and said, `These nieces are dear
creatures to an old, ease-loving man.'
Captain Somerville afterwards told me that when he entered the library, he made one of his most stately
bows, and inquired, `What is your business, sir?'
`I came to speak of your niece,and to ask
permission
'
`Tomorrow at four o'clock, post meridian, I will give
you an audience, sir. You are aware this is not my
hour of business;'and with another haughty
inclination
of the head, he left him to his meditations.
Captain Somerville, somewhat daunted by his
repulsive
manner, came at the appointed time. Without
answering his salutation, or even requesting him to be seated, uncle said in a hurried, business tone, `Are you willing to take the name and arms of Fitzherbert?'
After a moment's hesitation, Somerville replied in
the affirmative. `Follow me then,' said he; and he
led the way to the gallery, where I was seated, copying
a Flemish landscape. He threw the door open with an
air of great importance, pointed to a vacant seat, and
said, `Whatever you value in this apartment is yours.'
If my uncle had mistaken the real nature of his
business, it would have been very embarrassing; as it
was, however, there was no mistake about the matter.
You would be surprised to see how much I have
improved in my painting. Somerville is a great
amateur
,
you know; and there is no exertion too great for
a woman who loves. I have actually improved more
within the last three months than I ever did in my whole
life.
Uncle Fitzherbert is evidently much pleased with
my approaching marriage; and from uncle Hutchinson's
letter, I should judge he was well nigh mad with joy.
I do not exactly know why it is,but I do wish the
wedding could be deferred until I have visited America.
My friends here will not consent to it, I know;
especially
as I should find it difficult to give them any very
good reasons for it. If I must tell the truth, I have
certain
undefined apprehensions about Grace Osborne.
She seldom mentions Captain Somerville in her letters
which is very strange, considering how much he was
with us, in the winter of '65,and how obviously she
was a favourite. Once indeed, she requested me to tell
him that the rose-bush he had given her was flourishing.
When I mentioned it, one of those dreadful shadows
passed over his face, and the blood seemed starting
from his temples. `Tell Miss Osborne,' said he, `that
no flower can be fairer than herself.' These
circumstances
brought to my recollection that when we parted,
there were certain very expressive glances about a
broken ring, which I had never seen before. As
Captain
Somerville had then treated me with nothing more
than gallantry and politeness, I was confirmed in my
supposition that they were betrothed to each other.
After our engagement, I once ventured to say to him
that I had thought him very much fascinated by a certain
friend of mine in Boston. That darkening frown,
always
so terrible to me, again came over his face. `She
is a most beautiful creature,' said he; `and you will
forgive me, Lucretia, if I did love her, since she did not
consider my love worth her acceptance. I have long
ceased to regret it; for I am convinced she has not
mind enough to make me happy.' I began to vindicate
Grace,but he interrupted me with an earnest, almost
authoritative request, never to mention the subject to him
again. This interdiction might originate in wounded
pride. But why was the rose kept? From whence
came the ring? During the winter he spent with us,
my own heart taught me how to judge of another; and
I would then have risked my life that Grace loved him
with all the pure, deep tenderness of which she is
capable
.
Her letters seem to come from a weary and
broken spirit; and she dwells upon the peacefulness of
the grave with a sort of sickening impatience very
remarkable
in one so contented and devotional. If my
rank and wealth have purchased me his hand, while his
affections are lingering in America, mine will indeed be
splendid misery.
20
I loved Grace at that early age when the soul sends
forth its waters in warm and gushing torrents. I have
seen her the idol of every circle, while I, poor and
homely, was neglectedI have seen Love pass by me,
and shower his wreaths among her beautiful flaxen hair
but she never was the less dear to me; and if I now
supposed that her breaking heart was a steppingstone to
Hymen's altar, my own would burst, ere I trod upon it.
In your last letter, you sneered at the possibility of her
having refused such a match;but you do not know
her, aunt Sanford I never saw one who had such
power
to curb and to endure. If she doubted the firmness
of a man's principles, or feared her father's
disapprobation
,
she could tear an image from her heart, if every
fibre bled at the parting.
However, in one fortnight I shall be a wedded wife;
and I ought not to indulge any doubtings and misgivings;
for I never had reason to doubt Colonel Fitzherbert's
integrity. (It is the first time I have thought to give
him his new title.)
I have introduced all my acquaintance, in town and
country to you, I believe,unless Miss Anne Pitt be
excepted,whom I have not met till very recently.
She is the sister of Lord Chatham, and almost as
celebrated
as he is. Mr. Burke told me he thought her the
most perfectly eloquent person he ever saw. There is
indeed a charm in every thing she says. Her ideas
have great beauty; and she mingles her syllables in a
liquid cadence which gives to the English tongue the
far-famed softness of the Tuscan.
Last Sabbath, I went to Stepney old church, St.
Dunstan,a pile venerable for its extreme antiquity.
An inscription on one of the corner-stones imports that
it was brought from the ruins of Carthage. Colonel
Fitzherbert laughed at me for paying court to St.
Dunstan
just at this time. You know he consecrated a
fountain, which ever after had the blessed effect of
making wives obedient. The servant has just come up
to say that Sir Joshua Reynolds and Garrick are below.
I may thank you and uncle Hutchinson that I am not a
disgrace to the society in which fortune has placed me.
Good night. August 14ththe anniversary of Oliver's
mob,and of something far more importantviz. of
the evening on which I was introduced to Captain
Somerville
.August 24th,
1768.
How mutable are all human prospects! My last
lines were written on the 14th; and uncle Fitzherbert
was then in fine health, and animated to a remarkable
degree. On the night of the 15th, he was suddenly
attacked
by violent convulsions. The fits continued with
increasing power until the third day,when, with
anguish
that cannot be described, I saw the only relative I
had on earth stretched on the bed of death. I have never
before seen Mrs. Edgarton subdued by emotion; but now
I am obliged to exert all my fortitude to support her.
Alas! I shall never again be idolized as I was by that
dear old gentleman. He seemed to consider me the
prop of his house,the stay and support of his age.
Why did my heart ever accuse him of coldness and
formality?
Colonel Fitzherbert wrote all the particulars of his
death to uncle Hutchinson, immediately after his
decease
;
but grief and the pressure of cares, to which I
have been unaccustomed, have hitherto prevented my
writing to you. Mrs. Edgarton has 5000; and all
the servants have legacies. To every thing else I am
sole heiress.
All preparations for the wedding are, of course,
delayed
.
It was the earnest request, indeed the command,
of my dying uncle, that the marriage should be
solemnized
in three or four weeks at the utmost.
I thought this arrangement very heartless and
unfeeling
.
I therefore told Colonel Fitzherbert that I
thought it best to go to America with several ladies of
my acquaintance, who sail in September; and added
my resolution to be married at the house where we first
met.
At first, he urged me, with all possible eagerness,
to comply with my uncle's request; then offered to
throw up his commission, and remain in England, until
the period of mourning had expired: and when he
found that I continued firm in my purpose, he flew into
the most violent rage, and said he should not consider
the engagement binding, if I chose to display my
obstinacy
in this way. I answered, it was very well. He
was left entirely to his own choice in that matter.
He went away in great anger. The next day,
however, he called to apologize, and to express his
reluctant
acquiescence. I had rather die than doubt him;
but all this powerful emotion does increase my
suspicions
,and
yet they do not amount to suspicions, either.
You will be displeased, I know;but I must, Aunt
Sandford, I must have confidence in the man I marry.
I merely wish to see Grace, and satisfy my doubts.
Doubts, do I say? I will not suffer myself to doubt the
word of Colonel Fitzherbert; and if, as I believe, no
blame can be attached to him, I assure you I love him
too well to require from him any romantic sacrifice.
You have often wished to be present at my wedding;
I trust you will not be angry if your wish is gratified.
Give my grateful, fervent affection to uncle
Hutchinson
.
I have been collecting a library more splendid
than the one destroyed by the mob; which I intend to
bring with me.
Most affectionately your dutiful niece,
Lucretia Fitzherbert
.TO MISS LUCRETIA FITZHERBERT
.
Silly Girl,
I am indeed angry with you. In my day, a child
of six years old would have been whipped and sent to
bed, for taking such foolish whims. Is a man of
Colonel
Fitzherbert's rank and talents, and the nephew of
your greatest benefactor, to be treated in this
unbecoming
manner, because a simpleton of eighteen chooses to
talk about dying, as if it was a matter of pleasure or
convenience? I suppose brother Henry had scolded
her,or papa had frowned on the trembling little one.
20*
As for the ring and the flower,they weigh nothing at
all in my mind. If girls of the present day will suffer
a gentleman to see as plain as daylight that they are
living
and breathing only for him, what can you expect
from human vanity? I dare say Colonel Fitzherbert
made up the story about her rejection, wholly from
motives
of delicacy and generosity. I am not surprised
that he was in a passion when he found you refused to
obey your uncle's dying command.
To say nothing about the foolish jealousy you
indulge
,are
you not ashamed to cross the seas with a
regiment of soldiers? In the days of my youth, a single
lady would have thought twice before she undertook any
thing so grossly improper; but blushes are out of fashion
now-a-days, I find.
My indignation may have betrayed me into
unlady-like
expressions; and perhaps it may have made me
seem very indecorous with regard to Mr. Fitzherbert's
death. You no doubt feel his loss very severely,and
under any other circumstances, a year ought certainly
to be given to his memory; but your destined husband
loves the army too well to quit it; he is ordered to
America; and you are anxious to accompany him. As
for staying in England unmarried, at the head of such a
large establishment, it would neither be pleasant nor
proper. To be sure, you have no thoughts of the last
scheme.You must forsooth see Grace Osborne, and
ask her if she is willing you should marry her old
favourite
.
Such whims might pass in a girl of fifteen,
who had never read any thing but romances; but for
one of your good sense, great advantages, and
uncommon
attainments, it is highly ridiculous;and let me
tell you, that to set your judgment against your elders
in this way, is paying a poor compliment to those who
brought you up. Come to America as Mrs.
Fitzherbert
,
and you will find all hearts open to receive you.
There is no chance to send this letter, for a week
or more. I earnestly hope you will not have taken any
rash step before you hear from me. I mentioned in my
last, that your portrait by Sir Joshua Reynolds had
safely arrived;and who do you think came, a few
days since, and craved permission to see it? Assuredly
no other than Molly Bradstreet, or Polly May, as she
styles herself. She marched in with a very
unceremonious
stride,looked earnestly at the picture for a few
moments, then threw herself into your uncle's chair, and
burst into tears, moving her right hand up and down all
the while, as if beating time to some funeral dirge.
When she arose, I ventured to ask her what interest
she took in that young person. She looked at me very
keenly for a moment, and turned away as she answered,
`I knew her mother in Halifax; and she did me many a
kind turn, while she' (pointing to your picture) `was a
baby.'
She would neither eat nor drink in the house, and
hurried out of it, as if afraid to trust herself to look
back. Mr. Hutchinson seemed to think of nothing else
for two or three days,and he finally went off in search
of this mysterious creature; but she could not be found.
A woman who lives near her has been here to get
work, several times; and when I think it necessary, I
employ her in the kitchen. She says, `Some take Molly
for a desput bad woman; howdsomever I have gone
into
her house agin and agin, and found her on her knees
at prayer. To be sure she comes and goes like sulky
soap,and she is a sort of witch, I believe. At any
rate she has a kind of half-crazed way with her.'
You would have laughed one of your heartiest
laughs, if you had been here last week, when this poor
washerwoman came to make her complaints against the
whigs.
`Don't you think, madam,' said she, drawing in her
breath, with violent sobs, `don't you think, they have
torn the nice checked apron you gin me, all to pieces.'
Then turning to the Lieutenant Governor, with a
profound
courtesy, she added, `If there's justice in the land,
it ought to reach such fellows, your honour.'
We asked what provocation there was for such an
injury, and who was guilty of it. `Why, you see, I took
a few pence of the money you gin me for my labour,'
said she, `and I went to Mr. Loveking's shop, and
bought me a quarter of a pound of nice Bohea. There
was an evil looking lad on the door-stone, when I went
in; and I noticed he followed me, and kept his eye on
me. The next day, I had jest made me a comfortable
dish of tea, and set down to drink it, when the first thing
I know'd an egg come hard against my temples.
Before
I could look up, another fell into my cup of tea,
and spilled it all over the floor. Thinks I to myself,
some of the whig lads are playing their tricks; so I
catched up my canister of tea and put it up chimly, out
of sight; and I stept out of the way of the window,
and chucked my black airthen teapot into my pocket.
I'm a sizeable woman, you know, and they'd never mind
what was in my pocket, so long as the pleets of my
gownd kivered it. So I thought myself safe; but to be
sure, in comes one of the young dogs, and gives a
thundering
knock on the chimly, and down falls my canister.
Jest as I stooped to pick it up, they throwed a stone at
my pocket, and broke the tea-pot into a thousand bits;
and they shook the tea all out of my canister, and
shoveled the ashes over it,and they played foot-ball
with my tea-cups, till they broke 'em fine enough to
scour knives with. You may be sure I was as mad as
if a line of clothes had fell down jest as I got my
washing
out. I called 'em all the rascals in the country,
and they made a great clamour about the tea tax, and
the rights of man. If it is the rights of man, I think,
your honour, it is the wrongs of woman; and if there
is sich a thing as justice in the land, I ought to have it.'
The story is good for nothing, even in her own
words, unless you could have heard her whining and
whimpering, and seen her visage of wrath.
We gave her tea and money; and pacified her with
promises. But what can the magistrates do? These
things grow worse and worse, every day. We should
have another house pulled down about our ears, if they
knew your uncle had sent to request military assistance
from the king. When the royal troops come, Governor
Bernard will bear all the blame.
Doctor Byles was gifted with the power to speak truth
once in his life, when he said, `He is a well-meaning
gentleman. His heart is on the right side, as old
Townsend
,
that is dead and gone, once said; but he is as
clever a cat's-paw as ever took hot nuts out of the fire.'
I should not dare to write thus, if I were not sure
of putting my letter into the hands of a trust-worthy
Englishman myself; for do you know your last letter to
my brother-in-law was intercepted, and printed full
length in the Boston Gazette? What you wrote about
Charles Townsend and the taxation bill is every syllable
that can interest the rebels; but they have placed it all
before the public. However, it is all of a piece with
that scandalous paper. I do not know what the world
is coming to, when kings have not the power to stop such
proceedings. Boston is like a house on fire over one's
head. If they continue so outrageous, I think your
uncle
will conclude to reside altogether at his country seat
in Milton.
As for St. Dunstan,if I had not known the legend
about him, suffer me to remind you, that it is not
respectful
or decorous in you to attempt to teach your
seniors.
We talk much about our adopted niece. If you
have any love or gratitude for us, give us a legal title to
relationship, before you depart for America. I live
upon
the hope of seeing you and your husband soon.
Your loving aunt,
Sally Sandford
.
Boston,
Oct. 6th, 1768.Dear Frederic,
If the frank avowal that you are still very dear to
my widowed heart, requires any apology, let
approaching
death be my excuse.
Methinks that my turf pillow will be as down, if you
know that my last prayer was breathed for you,my
last wishes for your happiness. The heart that you
once thought too cold, dearest Frederic, has never
reproached
him that crushed it.
I have pitied you,wept for you,and prayed for
you; but the ghost of our once plighted love, ever
spoke to me like a voice from the tomb,and it would
not let me blame you.
24
I do not think you were to me a hypocrite. I do
believe you loved me. But it is not strange that I
should have been forgotten in the midst of a busy,
tempting world. The flower that we pluck, may be
very fragrant; yet the remembrance of its sweetness
passes away, even before the frail thing withers;the
bird's wild note is music to human ears,yet to-morrow
it is as if it had never been;and woman's affectionate
smile is even as they are, in the memory of man. But
she may not thus forget her dream of love. Her heart
distils the fragrance, and echoes the sounds that are
gone; yea, even her very thoughts take root in
affection
.
I love the books that you have read; and for
your sake, their ideas have become my own. I cannot,
if I would, escape from your image. It is seated by our
fireside,it is walking in our paths,it is stamped on
every page I open.
When the grass grows above my grave, and the
violet
weeps and dies there,shall you ever think of me?
Yea,I know you will think of me; and think of me
too, as you did on the day we parted. Alas! how little
either of us then thought it was forever.
Should you come to look once more upon scenes,
which our short acquaintance has rendered very dear to
me,you will find your rose blossoming in the window
where you have so often been seated,and the book in
which you last read to me, placed by its side. These
will speak for her who will then have no voice to
welcome
you; and when you ask the forgiveness of that
dear, good old man, whose grey hairs are going down
to the grave in sorrow, he will say to you, `As my
Heavenly Father forgiveth me, even so do I forgive
you.' You too will think of God; and thus will sorrow
lose its sting. You will weep such bitter, scalding
tears as I did when I was first deserted; but you will
think of me with a gentle sigh,and my spirit will hover near, and whisper, `We meet in Heaven.' Farewell.
Grace Osborne
.My dear Mrs. Percival,
It is long since I have written to you,longer than
I once thought it ever would be; but heart-trying scenes
prevented it, after my return from England; and when
their bitterness had passed away, I was too much
depressed
to make any mental exertion.
I received your husband's letter, thanking me for
the picture which I sent him on account of its extreme
resemblance to you.
That mystery is now solved. You, of course,
recollect
Polly May, generally called Molly Bradstreet,
who behaved in so singular a manner at the funeral in
Roxbury. She was my grandmothernot yours. The
papers will give you an account of the bloody affray
between the soldiers and citizens in this oppressed town.
She was passing through King-street at the time, and
was mortally wounded. On her death-bed she
confessed
that she exchanged us, during our infancy. This
explains the resemblance, which, I have been told,
troubled
my poor father in his dying moments. This
accounts
for the indifference my grandmother evinced
toward you, and the eager interest she always took in
every thing that concerned me. You may well believe
that I am deeply ashamed as well as grieved, to think
that I have visited England, and associated with the
rich, the powerful, and the learned there, under the
mask of an impostor:but I was innocent in my
ignorance
,and
I have long since learned that conscious
rectitude of purpose will enable us to go through the
most fiery trials which this changing world can offer.
None of your vast capital has, of course, been
expended
.
The large sums that have, for four years past,
supported
me in luxury, will, I trust, be returned to you at
some future season; though I confess I do not know
where I am to procure the means. I will write
immediately
to my agent in England, whom I would
recommend
to you as a faithful and disinterested man. The
sooner a legal transfer of property is made, the better.
If you can gather any particulars concerning my
grandmother
,
I wish you to write them. She appeared to
me to have uncommon strength of mind, and ideas
somewhat above her station.
I am very affectionately,
Gertrude Wilson
.
Queen-street,
March 10th, 1770.Much respected Madam,
We know not at which to admire most,the sudden
change that puts us in possession of such wealth,or
the noble integrity that could voluntarily relinquish it.
Do not insult us by talking of what you have
expended
.
If my beloved wife had always known
herself
as Lucretia Fitzherbert, she would have rejoiced
to give genius like yours every opportunity to improve
itself. Few could have travelled in England to so much
advantage and very few have so richly deserved all the
enjoyment that could be found there. Never mention the
subject again, I beg of you;it seems as if you thought
we had not souls to appreciate your generous character.
You write as if you supposed this transfer of property
would leave you poor. My uncle Townsend's fortune
was ample for New England; though a mere trifle
compared
with what we all considered yours. Do you
forget
that his estates were all left to Gertrude Wilson, in
case Edward Percival did not marry her? And how, I
pray you, can Edward Percival comply with any such
requisition? However, I shall soon be in Boston to
attend
to this business. We will then exchange our
respective
rights and titles; and, be as disinterested as
you will, you shall not go beyond me.
I made many inquiries concerning Mrs. Polly May,
when I returned to Canada, at the close of the year
1765, but I could never obtain much information. She
was, as you say, a woman of uncommon strength of
mind; by means of which she obtained an almost
unbounded
influence over the vulgar and the superstitious.
She was a favourite servant in a rich English family at
Halifax, I have been told; and received from them an
education rather above the common stamp. A wild
young Englishman, who visited this family, was
captivated
with her beauty, and married her privately. He
left her; and soon after he returned to his native
country
,
he married the daughter of a Scottish nobleman.
She went over in search of him,was treated with
great cruelty and scorn,and returned a poor,
passionate
,
insane creature. She never took much care of her
child; though in her intervals of reason, she treated
her with distracted fondness. This daughter was very
beautiful; and it is not strange that under such
circumstances
,
she grew up vain, giddy, and headstrong. She
was your mother;but you know her story, and I will
not dwell upon its horrors.
There are things to lament in the character of these
people, most surely; but their faults ought not to throw
a shadow on their posterity. True majesty of soul, like
yours, madam, can derive no additional lustre from the
adventitious circumstances of wealth and station.
Lucretia
(when shall I learn to call her so) desires her
sincerest
love.
I am with great respect and admiration,
Edward Percival
.
Montreal,
April 9th, 1770.